OVERSIGHT  OF  AVIATION  SAFETY 

S.  HRG.  110–1146 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON AVIATION OPERATIONS, 

SAFETY, AND SECURITY 

OF THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

SECOND  SESSION 

APRIL  10,  2008 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

75–107 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2012 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

SECOND  SESSION 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Vice  Chairman 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 
ROGER  F.  WICKER,  Mississippi 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Policy  Director 

CHRISTINE D.  KURTH,  Republican  Staff  Director,  and  General  Counsel 

PAUL NAGLE,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

SUBCOMMITTEE  ON  AVIATION  OPERATIONS,  SAFETY,  AND  SECURITY 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia, 

Chairman 

JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas,  Ranking 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 
ROGER  F.  WICKER,  Mississippi 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on April 10, 2008  ..............................................................................
Statement of Senator Hutchison  ............................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Statement of Senator Inouye  ..................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Statement of Senator Klobuchar  ............................................................................
Statement of Senator Lautenberg  ..........................................................................
Statement of Senator McCaskill  .............................................................................
Statement of Senator Rockefeller  ...........................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Statement of Senator Snowe  ...................................................................................
Statement of Senator Stevens 
................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

WITNESSES 

Chealander, Hon. Steven R., Member, National Transportation Safety Board 

Barimo,  Basil  J.,  Vice  President,  Operations  and  Safety,  Air  Transport  Asso-
ciation of America, Inc.  ........................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Brantley, Tom, President, Professional Aviation Safety Specialists, AFL–CIO  .
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
.
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Sabatini,  Nicholas  A.,  Associate  Administrator  for  Aviation  Safety,  FAA;  ac-
companied by Hank Krakowski, COO, Air Traffic Organization, FAA  ...........
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Scovel  III,  Hon.  Calvin  L.,  Inspector  General,  U.S.  Department  of  Transpor-
tation  .....................................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

APPENDIX 

Casanovas,  Karen  E.,  Executive  Director,  Alaska  Air  Carriers  Association, 
prepared statement  ..............................................................................................

Response to written questions submitted by Hon. Daniel K. Inouye to: 

Hank Krakowski  ...............................................................................................
Nicholas A. Sabatini  .........................................................................................

Page 
1 
53 
54 
57 
57 
68 
62 
71 
1 
1 
65 
55 
56 

43 
45 
34 
35 
26 
27 

2 
5 

9 
11 

85 

88 
87 

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

OVERSIGHT  OF  AVIATION  SAFETY 

THURSDAY,  APRIL  10,  2008 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON AVIATION OPERATIONS, SAFETY, AND 
SECURITY, 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

U.S. SENATE, 

The  Subcommittee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  10:19  a.m.,  in 
room SR–253, Russell Senate Office Building, Hon. John D. Rocke-
feller IV, Chairman of the Subcommittee, presiding. 

Washington, DC. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN D. ROCKEFELLER IV, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM WEST VIRGINIA 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. I apologize to everybody. 
The four of us will forego our opening statements, and I hope the 
others  will  too.  I  plan  to  make  mine  at  some  point.  But  we  are 
faced with an 11 o’clock vote, and it strikes me that there is a very 
strong  connection  between  hearing  each  of  the  witnesses  make 
their  statements  and  then,  in  return,  ensuring  that  all  members 
will have 7 minutes to question rather than 5 minutes to question. 
And that is about as fair as I can get for the moment. 

So  we  will  start  out.  We  have  Mr.  Nicholas  Sabatini,  Associate 
Administrator  of  Aviation  Safety  at  FAA,  and  I  have  some  nice 
questions  for  you.  Mr.  Hank  Krakowski,  Chief  Operating  Officer, 
Air  Traffic  Organization,  ATO;  the  Honorable  Calvin  Scovel,  De-
partment  of  Transportation  Inspector  General,  in  other  words,  the 
IG; the Honorable Steven Chealander. Did I say that right—— 

Mr. CHEALANDER. Yes, sir. 
Senator  ROCKEFELLER —of  the  National  Transportation  Safety 
Board,  a  position  which  used  to  be  held  by  this  lady  here  Senator 
Hutchison. And Mr. Tom Brantley, President, Professional Aviation 
Safety  Specialists;  and  Mr.  Basil  Barimo,  Vice  President  of  Oper-
ations and Safety, Air Transport Association. 

[The prepared statement of Senator Rockefeller follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN D. ROCKEFELLER IV, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM WEST VIRGINIA 

The  Federal  Aviation  Administration’s  lax  oversight  of  Southwest  Airlines  has 
cast  a  serious  pall  over  the  agency’s  ability  to  execute  its  core  mission—the  safety 
of the Nation’s aviation systems. 

It  is  our  job  today  to  ask,  is  this  just  an  isolated  incident  as  some  at  the  FAA 
and Southwest contend, or is this part of a larger, systemic problem facing both the 
agency and the industry? 

When it comes to the safety of the air traveling public, the American people have 
put  their  trust  in  the  men  and  women  of  the  Federal  Aviation  Administration  and 

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

2 

the  mechanics  of  the  commercial  airlines.  They,  like  many  of  us  in  Congress,  look 
to them to make sure that the planes that take the skies are safe. 

But in recent weeks, that that trust has been put to the test—first, with the dis-
turbing reports surrounding the lack of FAA oversight over Southwest, and the rev-
elations involving the FAA’s Southwest Region office. 

Almost  nightly,  there  are  news  stories  of  major  commercial  airlines  grounding 
hundreds  of  flights  for  maintenance  inspections  which  result  in  tens  of  thousands 
of frustrated and stranded passengers. 

Bottom  line—each  passing  day  brings  more  questions,  and  not  enough  answers. 
Despite the growing questions surrounding the FAA’s oversight of the airline indus-
try, the White House and Department of Transportation remain inexplicably silent. 
When the Administration should be assembling a task force to investigate this issue 
and make recommendations for improving aviation safety, the Administration seems 
content to disregard the concerns of the traveling public. 

The  FAA  has  taken  some  steps  to  rebuild  the  public’s  confidence  in  the  agency’s 
core mission of maintaining the safety of the Nation’s aviation system. And moving 
forward,  the  FAA  needs  to  take  a  good  long  look  at  itself  to  begin  to  understand 
how  internal  failures,  and  the  agency’s  external  relationships  with  commercial  air 
carriers, contributed to current situation. 

Many,  including  myself,  have  long-criticized  the  agency  for  being  too  close  to  the 
industry  it  regulates.  In  1996,  to  stave  off  efforts  to  privatize  the  agency,  Congress 
grudgingly  accepted  provisions  that  would  allow  the  FAA  to  operate  more  like  a 
business—in the hopes that it would cost less to operate. 

Well, the FAA is not a business. It’s a government agency. The FAA does not pro-
vide commercial services. It provides public goods—air traffic control, aircraft certifi-
cation, and safety oversight. We pay taxes for these services. 

Clearly,  it’s  time  to  start  thinking  about  the  FAA  differently.  Toward  that  end, 
we  need  the  FAA  to  operate  as  the  most  efficient  and  effective  government  agency 
it  can  be.  It’s  a  subtle  distinction,  but  one  that  I  think  is  incredibly,  deeply  impor-
tant.  Bringing  about  institutional  change  is  never  easy,  but  I  think  that  this  Com-
mittee and the aviation community must make it a priority. 

The air traveling public wants solutions—and they want to be reassured that our 

Nation’s aviation system is still the safest in the world. 

No  doubt,  many  of  our  witnesses  will  remind  the  Committee  that  there  has  not 
been  a  fatal  airline  accident  in  almost  2  years,  and  that  statistically  this  is  the 
safest  time  to  fly.  I  don’t  disagree—but  I  still  have  serious  concerns  that  there  are 
an  increasing  number  of  safety  challenges  facing  the  FAA  and  the  industry  that, 
left unaddressed, could lead to a catastrophic accident. 

For instance, the number of serious runway incursions remains unacceptably high 
and  is  trending  in  a  troubling  direction.  We  have  all  read  and  seen  stories  of  near 
misses at our Nation’s airports. Let’s be honest, had it not been for the quick-think-
ing  and  actions  of  a  few  air  traffic  controllers  and  pilots,  our  Nation  would  have 
had one, if not several, major accidents claiming the lives of hundreds of people. 

I don’t mean to be dramatic, but I’m afraid that our aviation system is operating 

on borrowed time. 

Airlines take the right action 99 percent of the time when it comes to safety. But, 
that’s  not  good  enough.  As  we  all  know  too  well,  the  margins  of  error  in  aviation 
are far too small. It is the 1-percent that can result in tragedy. Our incredible safety 
record is fragile enough at the moment that we need to be working together to make 
sure we maintain and strengthen the world’s finest aviation system. 

And Mr. Sabatini, we will start off with you. 
Is that all right with the members? 
Senator INOUYE. Fine. 
Senator ROCKEFELLER. I want the panel to be able to be finished 
by  the  time  we  have  to  go  vote.  Then  we  can  come  back  and  we 
will have a select number of statements. 

Please proceed. 

STATEMENT OF NICHOLAS A. SABATINI, ASSOCIATE 

ADMINISTRATOR FOR AVIATION SAFETY, FAA; ACCOMPANIED 
BY HANK KRAKOWSKI, COO, AIR TRAFFIC ORGANIZATION, FAA 
Mr.  SABATINI.  Good  morning,  Chairman  Rockefeller,  Chairman 
Inouye,  Senator  Hutchison,  and  Senator  Stevens.  I  appreciate  the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

3 

opportunity  to  appear  before  you  today  to  discuss  some  of  the 
FAA’s  many  important  safety  initiatives  and  how  they  contribute 
to  extending  the  safest  period  in  aviation  history.  With  me  today 
is  Hank  Krakowski,  the  Chief  Operating  Officer  of  the  Air  Traffic 
Organization at the FAA. 

Let  me  first  begin  by  describing  how  we  have  achieved  this  un-

precedented record of safety. 

We did not get here by accident. We did not get here by happen-
stance.  We  did  not  get  here  by  good  luck,  and  it  is  not  a  miracle. 
We got here because of the hard work and dedication of thousands 
of  aviation  safety  professionals  in  the  industry  and  in  the  govern-
ment, including many of the people in this room. 

But while the FAA takes great pride in the fact that on-board fa-
talities  have  dropped  to  a  rate  of  about  1  fatal  accident  in  every 
15 million passenger flights, neither Hank nor I nor the other com-
mitted aviation safety professionals we deal with are satisfied with 
these numbers. 

I recently ordered a special emphasis surveillance, essentially an 
audit of the safety programs, the first phase of which was just com-
pleted.  We  found  we  had  achieved  99  percent  safety  compliance, 
but  it  is  the  other  1  percent  that  keeps  me  up  at  night  and  it  is 
that 1 percent we are trying to achieve. 

Last week, Acting Administrator Sturgell and I announced a five- 
point  plan  that  addresses  the  issues  of  responsibility,  account-
ability,  communication,  and  ethics  among  our  workforce  to  ensure 
that our oversight issues with Southwest Airlines are not repeated. 
These initiatives will help ensure that our rules are being followed 
and  reemphasize  to  our  workforce  the  importance  of  consistency 
and adherence to national policy. 

While the FAA has hundreds of safety initiatives ongoing at any 
given moment, I would like to highlight two areas that I know are 
of  interest  to  this  subcommittee:  our  oversight  of  aircraft  mainte-
nance and our efforts to reduce runway incursions. 

As  we  have  previously  discussed  with  this  committee,  the  FAA 
has  changed  the  way  we  oversee  aircraft  maintenance,  moving  to 
the  Air  Transportation  Oversight  System,  or  ATOS,  model,  which 
goes beyond simply ensuring regulatory compliance. This oversight 
approach leverages FAA inspector workforce experience and knowl-
edge  by  focusing  their  oversight  on  areas  that  will  maximize  the 
safety benefits. Our inspectors develop safety surveillance plans for 
each  air  carrier  based  on  data  analysis  and  adjust  plans  periodi-
cally  based  on  identified  risk  and  their  own  random  observations. 
I am happy to report we recently completed moving all Part 121 

air carriers to this oversight system. 

I  am  also  very  aware  of  your  concern  with  U.S.  carriers  having 
more  of  their  maintenance  performed  by  repair  stations  both  for-
eign and domestic. For clarification, when an air carrier uses a con-
tract maintenance provider like a repair station or an engine man-
ufacturer to provide all or part of its aircraft maintenance, that en-
tity  becomes  an  extension  of  the  air  carrier’s  own  maintenance  or-
ganization. The air carrier must define the scope and limitations of 
the outsourced work, ensure that the personnel are competent and 
have  the  necessary  facilities  and  equipment  to  properly  execute 
that  work,  and  supervise  or  direct  the  work  to  ensure  that  the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

4 

work  is  accomplished  and  meets  all  requirements  of  the  air  car-
rier’s maintenance program. 

Additionally,  the  FAA  has  established  a  new  training  course  for 
its  field  maintenance  inspectors  and  supervisors.  This  course  will 
give our entire maintenance inspector workforce the knowledge and 
skills  necessary  to  properly  conduct  surveillance  on  contract  main-
tenance providers. This 4-day course instructs inspectors on how to 
access  the  data  collected  from  the  airlines  and  contract  mainte-
nance providers and then use that data to properly assess the risk 
or potential risk of each contract maintenance provider used by the 
air carrier. 

I would like to turn our discussion now to FAA’s efforts to reduce 
incursions  which  Mr. 

the  number  and  severity  of  runway 
Krakowski can address in further detail. 

Runway safety starts with preventing runway incursions, wheth-
er these mistakes are made by pilots, which is about 60 percent of 
the time; by controllers, about 30 percent of the time; or by pedes-
trians  or  ground  vehicle  operators,  about  10  percent  of  the  time. 
The  FAA  has  an  aggressive  runway  safety  program  that  has  re-
duced the number of serious runway incursions by 55 percent since 
2001.  We  investigate  every  reported  runway  incursion  as  fully  as 
possible  and  use  the  data  mined  from  these  investigations  to  help 
us find the right solutions. 

The FAA has been working with aviation leaders to research and 
implement these solutions. On August 15, 2007, more than 40 rep-
resentatives from a cross section of the aviation industry answered 
the  Acting  Administrator’s  call  to  action  and  agreed  to  an  ambi-
tious plan focused on improving cockpit procedures, airport signage 
and markings, air traffic procedures, and technology. 

The  result  is  that  our  Nation’s  busiest  airports  are  now  being 
equipped  with  runway  surveillance  technology  that  improves  con-
troller situational awareness on the airport movement area. For ex-
ample, Runway Status Lights, which were developed as a result of 
the  NTSB  Most  Wanted  List  of  safety  improvements,  are  a  fully 
automated  system  that  integrates  airport  lighting  equipment  with 
surveillance systems to provide a visual signal to pilots and vehicle 
operators  when  it  is  unsafe  to  enter,  cross,  or  begin  takeoff  roll  on 
a runway. This system is already preventing potential accidents. 

Just  a  couple  of  weeks  ago  at  Dallas-Ft.  Worth,  a  plane  was 
cleared  for  takeoff,  while  at  the  same  time  air  traffic  control 
cleared  another  aircraft  to  cross  that  same  runway  on  a  taxiway. 
The first plane did not initiate its takeoff roll because the pilot saw 
the red lights of the runway status light system. 

In addition to testing other runway safety systems at Long Beach 
Airport and Spokane, Washington, we are also implementing quick 
and  relatively  inexpensive  solutions  such  as  improving  airfield 
markings,  adding  targeted  training  for  controllers  and  air  crews, 
and fine tuning air traffic procedures. 

The  FAA  is  also  seeking  input  from  NATCA  on  revamping  poli-
cies  for  issuing  taxi  clearances  and  working  with  the  union  to  im-
plement  a  voluntary  reporting  system  for  air  traffic  controllers 
similar to the Aviation Safety Action Program, ASAP, with airlines, 
pilots, airport operators, and the FAA. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

5 

The bottom line is that we committed to designing an end-to-end 
system  that  seeks  to  eliminate  runway  incursions  while  accommo-
dating  human  error.  We  all  have  a  role  in  the  solution.  Every  re-
ported runway incursion will be taken seriously, investigated thor-
oughly,  and  analyzed  to  determine  the  causal  factors  in  order  to 
apply  any  knowledge  gleaned  toward  finding  the  right  solutions. 
The  FAA  continues  to  seek  ways  to  improve  awareness,  training, 
and  technologies,  and  we  look  forward  to  working  together  with 
airlines,  airports,  air  traffic  control,  pilot  unions,  and  aerospace 
manufacturers to curb runway incursions. 

Mr.  Chairman,  the  FAA’s  commitment  to  improving  safety  and 
extending the excellent safety record we are currently experiencing 
is our number one priority. I hope that some of what I have shared 
with you today exemplifies that commitment. 
This concludes my remarks, Mr. Chairman. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Sabatini follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF NICHOLAS A.  SABATINI,  ASSOCIATE ADMINISTRATOR FOR 
AVIATION SAFETY,  FAA;  ACCOMPANIED BY HANK KRAKOWSKI,  COO,  AIR TRAFFIC 
ORGANIZATION, FAA 
Chairman Rockefeller, Senator Hutchison, Members of the Subcommittee: 
I  am  pleased  to  appear  before  you  today  to  discuss  some  of  the  Federal  Aviation 
Administration’s  (FAA)  many  important  safety  initiatives  and  how  they  contribute 
to  extending  this  unprecedented  aviation  safety  record.  Some  people  may  dismiss 
claims  like  ‘‘this  is  the  safest  period  ever’’  because  they  have  heard  this  claim  in 
the  past.  For  at  least  the  past  70  years,  aviation  safety  has  improved  by  a  third 
or more every decade. In fact the pace of improvement has accelerated recently and 
we  believe  the  pace  of  improvement  will  continue  to  accelerate  for  the  next  decade 
or more. 

This context is important. Over the past 5 years, onboard fatalities have occurred 
at  a  rate  of  about  1  fatal  accident  in  every  15  million  passenger  flights.  We  see  no 
reason  why  that  figure  cannot  become  one  in  30  million  or  even  one  in  40  million 
flights  within  10  or  15  years.  The  system’s  performance  now  is  so  strong  that  we 
decided  several  years  ago  to  develop  a  new  measure  to  express  the  risk  of  fatality 
in commercial aviation. In addition to traditional data on fatal accidents per 100,000 
flight hours or 100,000 departures, the FAA now uses fatalities per 100 million per-
sons flown as a basic measure of the system’s performance. This includes all fatali-
ties, whether they occur onboard a passenger or cargo flight, or whether they occur 
off the aircraft on the airport surface or elsewhere. 

To  offer  a  sense  of  scale,  immediately  after  World  War  II,  that  measure  yielded 
nearly 1,500 fatalities per 100 million persons flown. By the early 1960s, the meas-
ure had improved to about 500 fatalities per 100 million persons flown. By the mid- 
1990s, that measure had fallen to about 45 fatalities per 100 million persons flown. 
Now,  in  a  typical  year,  we  experience  rates  of  5  to  8  fatalities  per  100  million  per-
sons  flown  and  we  fully  expect  to  reach  long-term  rates  of  4  or  fewer  fatalities  per 
100 million persons flown within the next decade. By comparing that level of safety 
to  where  we  were  just  20  years  ago,  or  even  a  decade  ago,  we  begin  to  get  some 
sense  of  scale  on  how  safe  the  system  has  become—and  it  will  only  continue  to  get 
better over the long term. 

Yet,  although  we  take  great  pride  in  the  results  of  the  efforts  of  aviation  safety 
professionals in both government and industry, we remain ever mindful of the need 
to continue to push ourselves to find ways to improve a system that, by any stand-
ard, is performing remarkably well. 

I  would  briefly  like  to  put  into  context  an  incident  involving  Southwest  Airlines 
that has received a great deal of attention recently. In March of last year, the FAA 
Principal  Maintenance  Inspector  (PMI)  charged  with  overseeing  Southwest  Airlines 
inappropriately,  and  in  violation  of  existing  FAA  policy  and  regulatory  require-
ments,  accepted  a  voluntary  disclosure  under  the  Voluntary  Disclosure  Reporting 
Program  (VDRP).  The  disclosure  was  the  fact  that  46  Southwest  Airlines  aircraft 
had  continued  flight  operations  past  the  due  date  for  a  required  inspection  of  the 
aircraft airframe for cracks. These aircraft had overflown an Airworthiness Directive 
(AD) requiring the inspection. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

6 

Despite  this  determination,  and,  again,  in  violation  of  existing  FAA  policy  and 
regulatory requirements, the airline, even after reporting this safety violation under 
VDRP,  did  not  ground  these  aircraft  immediately,  but  instead  continued  to  operate 
the  aircraft.  Subsequently,  the  airline  conducted  the  required  inspections  and  six 
aircraft  were  discovered  to  have  cracks,  five  of  which  were  ultimately  determined 
to have the type of crack the AD was designed to detect. A total of 1,451 commercial 
operations  were  conducted  by  Southwest  Airlines  in  violation  of  the  law,  putting 
thousands of passengers at risk. That this was done with the implicit consent of the 
FAA PMI overseeing the carrier is beyond my comprehension. 

On March 6, 2008, the FAA issued a $10.2 million proposed civil penalty to South-
west Airlines for its decision to knowingly continue to operate noncompliant aircraft 
in commercial operations. The FAA is in the process of taking appropriate personnel 
actions  with  respect  to  FAA  employees  in  response  to  the  findings  of  the  ongoing 
investigation of this matter. 

Last  week,  Acting  Administrator  Sturgell  announced  a  five  point  plan  that  ad-
dresses the issues of responsibility, accountability, communication, and ethics. I be-
lieve  these  initiatives  will  help  ensure  that  our  rules  are  being  followed  and  reem-
phasize  to  our  workforce  the  importance  of  consistency  and  adherence  to  national 
policy. 

Also,  on  March  13,  2008,  to  ensure  that  what  happened  with  Southwest  Airlines 
was an isolated problem and not a systemic one, I ordered a Special Emphasis Sur-
veillance,  the  first  phase  of  which  has  just  been  completed.  While  a  second,  more 
comprehensive phase is ongoing, our initial findings validate that our systems safety 
approach  of  oversight  is  working  as  intended.  We  expect  to  complete  the  second 
phase  by  June  30th  and  will  continue  to  analyze  the  incoming  data  to  discover  if 
and where other problems in the system exist and to immediately correct any prob-
lems identified. 

As  the  FAA  addresses  these  issues  of  responsibility,  accountability,  communica-
tion,  and  ethics,  we  also  have  hundreds  of  safety  initiatives  ongoing  at  any  given 
moment.  As  we  continue  to  examine  the  broader  issue  of  aviation  safety  in  this 
hearing,  I  will  focus  my  remarks  on  two  areas  that  I  know  are  of  interest  to  this 
Subcommittee,  our  oversight  of  aircraft  maintenance  and  our  efforts  to  reduce  run-
way incursions. 

When  FAA  last  testified  before  this  Subcommittee  on  safety  oversight,  we  dis-
cussed  how  the  agency  has  changed  the  way  we  oversee  aircraft  maintenance.  We 
moved  from  a  paradigm  where  FAA’s  inspectors  were  required  to  complete  a  pre-
scribed number of oversight activities to one where we used the Air Transportation 
Oversight  System  (ATOS)  model,  which  goes  beyond  simply  ensuring  regulatory 
compliance. The goal of the oversight model is to foster a higher level of air carrier 
safety  using  a  systematic,  risk-management-based  process  to  identify  safety  trends 
and  prevent  accidents.  ATOS  has  improved  safety  because  it  identifies  and  helps 
manage  risks  before  they  cause  problems  by  ensuring  that  carriers  have  safety 
standards built into their operating systems. 

This  oversight  approach  leverages  FAA’s  inspector  workforce  experience  and 
knowledge  by  reducing  the  likelihood  of  repeating  inspections  of  the  same  aircraft 
or  function,  unless  deficiencies  were  found  in  prior  inspections  of  the  aircraft  or 
function. Our inspectors develop safety surveillance plans for each air carrier based 
on data analysis, and adjust plans periodically based on identified risks. For exam-
ple, with the cost of fuel increasing daily so many of our legacy carriers are dealing 
with how to manage these unexpectedly large costs. In light of this reality, FAA in-
spectors  can  adapt  their  surveillance  plan  to  increase  their  focus  on  areas  that 
might be at risk due to rising fuel costs, such as flight planning, dispatch, and fuel 
loading.  Additionally  the  system  can  be  adjusted  when  emphasis  areas  need  to  be 
addressed such as our recent efforts to review Airworthiness Directives. I know that 
the Inspector General (IG) agrees with the FAA that it is a priority that our inspec-
tors  have  the  tools  and  information  necessary  to  be  flexible  in  our  oversight  of  car-
riers as their financial and operational situation changes. 

I  also  know  that  the  IG  agrees  with  us  that  our  new  approach  to  oversight  is  a 
better  way  to  make  the  best  use  of  agency  resources  as  well  as  to  improve  safety. 
We recently completed moving all air carriers to this oversight system. In 2005, we 
committed to a transition plan to move all remaining FAR Part 121 air carriers op-
erating  under  ATOS  by  the  end  of  calendar  year  2007.  This  was  no  small  under-
taking. At the time we had only 16 air carriers that were under ATOS. I am happy 
to report we have met this goal and that all Part 121 carriers have made this most 
important  transition.  Additionally,  we  have  improved  upon  the  original  system  and 
successfully implemented those improvements. The initial reactions to the modifica-
tions and improvements we have made have been extremely positive. However, our 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

7 

work is not done. We must now be vigilant in using the system to manage identified 
risks, and take appropriate actions. 

This change in oversight recognizes that FAA cannot be expected to provide qual-
ity  control  for  every  airline  or  effectively  police  millions  of  flights.  The  safety  laws 
that  Congress  passes  and  the  regulations  we  implement  all  place  the  responsibility 
for  safety  on  the  airlines.  The  FAA  has  regulatory  oversight  responsibilities  to  en-
sure  that  air  carriers  comply  with  safety  standards  and  requirements.  The  FAA’s 
role  is  an  important  one,  and  we  see  the  new  approach  under  ATOS  as  providing 
more  effective  and  efficient  use  of  our  resources.  By  focusing  on  risk  we  can  deter-
mine  how  well  the  airline  is  managing  its  processes  and  whether  or  not  the  proc-
esses are performing as designed to meet the safety standards. Our inspection tools 
are  designed  to  collect  data  for  these  purposes.  Our  oversight  systems  engage  air 
carriers in the management of their safety issues. 

I  am  very  aware  of  your  concern  with  U.S.  carriers  having  more  of  their  mainte-
nance performed by repair stations, both foreign and domestic. I want to clarify the 
roles and responsibilities of air carriers, repair stations, and the FAA. When an air 
carrier  uses  a  contract  maintenance  provider  (a  certificated  Part  145  repair  station 
or a non-certificated provider) to provide all or part of its aircraft maintenance, that 
maintenance provider’s organization becomes an extension of the air carrier’s main-
tenance  organization.  The  air  carrier  must  define  the  scope  and  limitations  of  the 
outsourced  work,  provide  the  applicable  sections  of  the  carrier’s  maintenance  man-
ual,  ensure  that  the  personnel  are  competent  and  have  the  necessary  facilities  and 
equipment to properly execute that work, and supervise or direct the work to ensure 
that the work is accomplished and meets all requirements of the air carrier’s main-
tenance  program.  We  are  reviewing  how  we  could  clarify  how  an  air  carrier  can 
demonstrate  that  all  of  its  maintenance  has  been  properly  performed,  regardless  of 
whether  it  is  done  by  the  carrier  itself  or  by  another  entity.  We  may  pursue  rule-
making on this issue in the near future. 

Additionally,  the  FAA  has  established  a  new  training  course  for  its  field  mainte-
nance  inspectors  and  supervisors.  This  course  will  give  our  entire  maintenance  in-
spector  workforce  the  knowledge  and  skills  necessary  to  properly  conduct  surveil-
lance on contract maintenance providers. This is a four-day course that instructs the 
inspectors  how  to  access  the  data  collected  from  the  airlines  and  contract  mainte-
nance  providers  and  then  use  that  data  to  properly  assess  the  risks  or  potential 
risks of each contract maintenance provider used by the air carrier. 

I  am  confident  that  the  changes  we  have  made  in  our  oversight  philosophy  and 
the work we continue to do with input and assistance from the aviation community, 
Congress,  and  the  international  community  has  contributed  to  this  historically  safe 
period  of  commercial  aviation  safety.  Our  safety  oversight  must  keep  pace  with  the 
industry as it changes and I believe we are well positioned to accept that challenge. 
Turning  to  another  of  the  FAA’s  top  priorities,  I  would  like  to  discuss  FAA’s  ef-
forts to reduce the number and severity of runway incursions. Runway safety starts 
with preventing runway incursions, whether these mistakes are made by pilots, con-
trollers or ground vehicle operators. 

Recently,  the  National  Transportation  Safety  Board  (NTSB)  and  the  Government 
Accountability  Office  (GAO)  have  issued  recommendations  on  areas  where  the  FAA 
could  make  improvements  in  runway  safety.  In  November,  the  NTSB  announced 
that improving runway safety will remain on the Board’s ‘‘Most Wanted’’ list of im-
provements for 2008. FAA believes that the technologies we are now testing and de-
ploying  will  be  responsive  to  address  the  problem  of  runway  incursions.  Also,  the 
GAO reported on how the FAA has taken steps to address runway and ramp safety. 
We appreciate the work that the GAO and NTSB have done, and we welcome their 
analysis and feedback. The FAA has actively and consistently invested in programs 
and technology development to address this serious aviation safety issue. 

An aggressive and effective FAA runway safety program has reduced the number 
of serious runway incursions by 55 percent since 2001. In Fiscal Year 2007, we saw 
a  25  percent  reduction  in  serious  runway  incursions  from  2006:  there  were  24  seri-
ous  runway  incursions  (referred  to  as  Category  A  and  B  incursions)  during  61  mil-
lion  aircraft  operations,  a  significant  reduction  from  the  31  incursions  in  FY  2006 
(and  the  53  incursions  in  FY  2001).  But  while  we  have  made  improvements  with 
the  most  serious  categories  of  the  runway  incursions,  overall  runway  incursions  in-
creased in FY 2007 to 370, up from 330 in FY 2006. While most of these incursions 
are  Category  C  and  D  incidents,  which  pose  little  or  no  risk  to  the  public,  the  in-
crease in incursions and the fact that serious incursions are still occurring, prompt-
ed  the  Acting  Administrator  to  issue  a  ‘‘Call  to  Action’’  on  runway  safety  last  Au-
gust. 

On  October  1,  2007,  the  FAA  adopted  the  definition  of  runway  incursion  as  used 
by the International Civil Aviation Organization (ICAO), a United Nations organiza-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

8 

tion charged with promoting safety and security in international aviation. This new 
definition,  which  FAA  helped  develop  for  ICAO,  is  much  more  inclusive  and  counts 
every  single  mistake  made  on  the  airport  operational  surface,  even  if  another  vehi-
cle,  pedestrian  or  aircraft  is  not  involved.  As  a  result,  we  will  have  more  data  to 
analyze trends and improve safety. 

The  FAA  investigates  every  reported  runway  incursion  and  assigns  a  reason  for 
the  incursion.  The  investigation  includes  a  review  of  the  airport  information;  radar 
data  and  voice  tapes,  if  they  are  available;  statements  from  individuals  involved; 
and,  in  the  case  of  serious  incursions,  we  send  teams  to  conduct  on-site  investiga-
tions at the facility. There are three broad categories to which we attributed runway 
incursions  that  happened  since  October  1,  2006.  About  60  percent  are  as  a  result 
of  pilot  error.  Operational  errors  and  deviations  by  air  traffic  controllers  represent 
about  30  percent  of  causes  of  runway  incursions.  The  rest  are  attributed  to  pedes-
trian or vehicle errors. 

The FAA continues to work with aviation industry leaders to research and imple-
ment  new  technologies,  and  mine  and  interpret  safety  data  with  the  focus  on  im-
proving  airport  safety.  I  would  like  to  highlight  some  of  our  recent  efforts  in  this 
area.  As  noted  earlier,  on  August  15,  2007,  more  than  40  representatives  from  a 
cross-section  of  the  aviation  industry  agreed  to  an  ambitious  plan  focused  on  solu-
tions in improving cockpit procedures, airport signage and markings, air traffic pro-
cedures,  and  technology.  Within  60  days  of  this  ‘‘Call  to  Action’’  on  runway  safety, 
Acting  Administrator  Sturgell  announced  that  the  aviation  community  had  com-
pleted significant short-term actions and were making strides in the mid- and long- 
term goals. 

Our  nation’s  busiest  airports  are  now  being  equipped  with  runway  surveillance 
technology  that  improves  controller  situational  awareness  on  the  airport  movement 
area.  The  FAA  has  spent  over  $404  million  to  date  to  acquire  and  deploy  the  next 
generation  of  ground  surveillance  technology,  known  as  Airport  Surface  Detection 
Equipment—Model  X  or  ASDE–X  for  short.  Twelve  towers  in  the  system  have 
ASDE–X operational, and we have accelerated our installation schedule by 1 year— 
the target completion date for the last system is now September 2010. The FAA will 
commit more than $806 million over a 30-year period on equipment, installation, op-
erations and maintenance of the 35 ASDE–X systems. 

Runway  Status  Lights,  which  were  developed  as  a  result  of  the  NTSB’s  ‘‘Most 
Wanted’’  list  of  safety  improvements,  are  a  full-automated  system  that  integrates 
airport  lighting  equipment  with  surveillance  systems  to  provide  a  visual  signal  to 
pilots  and  vehicle  operators  when  it  is  unsafe  to  enter/cross/or  begin  takeoff  roll  on 
a  runway.  Airport  surveillance  sensor  inputs  are  processed  through  light  control 
logic  that  command  in-pavement  lights  to  illuminate  red  when  there  is  traffic  on 
or  approaching  the  runway.  The  FAA  has  spent  nearly  $25.8  million  on  this  initia-
tive. 

The system is being tested at Dallas-Fort Worth and San Diego. We have selected 
Los  Angeles  International  Airport  as  an  additional  test  site  and  are  working  to  se-
lect  several  other  large  airports  for  continued  testing  of  this  system  in  ‘‘complex’’ 
airport  environments.  The  system  is  preventing  potential  accidents  today.  Just  a 
couple  of  weeks  ago,  at  Dallas-Ft.  Worth,  a  plane  was  cleared  for  take-off,  while  at 
the same time air traffic control cleared another aircraft to cross that same runway 
on a taxiway. The first plane did not initiate its takeoff roll, because the pilot, ‘‘saw 
the red lights’’ of the Runway Status Light System. 

We  are  also  testing  a  runway  safety  system  at  the  Long  Beach  Airport,  known 
as  the  Final  Approach  Runway  Occupancy  Signal  (FAROS).  This  system  is  similar 
to Runway Status Lights in that it provides immediate information to pilots on ap-
proach  to  land  that  the  runway  is  occupied  or  otherwise  unsafe  for  landing.  The 
FAROS system determines the occupancy of the runway by detecting aircraft or ve-
hicles  on  the  runway  surface.  If  a  monitored  area  on  the  runway  is  occupied, 
FAROS activates a signal to alert the pilot that it is potentially unsafe to land. We 
are  developing  a  plan  for  implementing  FAROS  at  larger  airports,  and  expect  to 
begin operational trials at Dallas-Fort Worth by the end of FY 2008. 

The  FAA  is  testing  two  low-cost  ground  surveillance  systems  at  Spokane,  Wash-
ington,  that  would  provide  ground  situational  awareness  to  controllers  at  airports 
other  than  the  35  slated  to  get  ASDE–X  systems.  To  date,  we  have  spent  $4.5  mil-
lion  on  this  project  and  we  are  assessing  if  it  is  an  alternative  safety  measure  for 
less busy airports not scheduled to receive the ASDE–X system. 

Twenty  of  the  busiest  airports  in  America  were  identified  for  targeted  Runway 
Safety Action Team visits based on a combination of a history of runway incursions, 
wrong  runway  events  and  wrong  runway  risk  factors.  The  Runway  Safety  Action 
Team visits involved service analysis meetings with air traffic control, both manage-
ment and controllers, safety inspectors from FAA and the airports, and airport man-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

9 

agers and operators. These meetings identified over 100 short term fixes that could 
be  accomplished  within  60  days,  including  new  or  improved  signage,  improved 
marking,  driver  training,  and  other  actions.  This  concerted  effort  is  proving  effec-
tive. 

Not  all  measures  to  improve  runway  safety  will  involve  fielding  expensive  equip-
ment  and  new  systems.  Quick  and  relatively  inexpensive  solutions  include  improv-
ing  airfield  markings,  adding  targeted  training  for  controllers  and  aircrews,  and 
fine-tuning  air  traffic  procedures.  Incorporating  the  lessons  learned  through  the 
meetings with the initial 20 airports, FAA has identified a second tier of 22 airports 
we will be expanding this program to cover next. 

Finally, the FAA is seeking input from the National Air Traffic Controllers Asso-
ciation (NATCA) on revamping policies for issuing taxi clearances. We also recently 
signed  an  agreement  with  NATCA  to  implement  a  voluntary  reporting  system  for 
air traffic controllers similar to the Aviation Safety Action Program (ASAP) with air-
lines,  pilots,  airport  operators  and  the  FAA.  This  type  of  reporting  system,  which 
is in place throughout the industry, will help to create an atmosphere where control-
lers and managers can identify, report and correct safety issues. This will go a long 
way in helping us further improve our safety record. 

The FAA is committed to designing an end-to-end system that seeks to eliminate 
runway incursions while accommodating human error. We all have a role in the so-
lution.  Every  reported  runway  incursion  will  be  taken  seriously,  investigated  thor-
oughly,  and  analyzed  to  determine  the  causal  factors.  The  FAA  continues  to  seek 
ways  to  improve  awareness,  training,  and  technologies  and  we  look  forward  to  our 
collaboration  with  airlines,  airports,  air  traffic  control  and  pilot  unions,  and  aero-
space  manufacturers  to  curb  runway  incursions.  We  appreciate  the  Subcommittee’s 
interest in safety, and welcome your counsel and assistance in our efforts to reduce 
runway incursions and improve safety in our Nation’s aviation system. 

Mr.  Chairman,  the  FAA’s  commitment  to  improving  safety  and  extending  the  ex-
cellent  safety  record  we  are  currently  experiencing  is  our  number  one  priority.  I 
hope  some  of  what  I  have  shared  with  you  today  exemplifies  that  commitment.  Of 
course,  as  I  stated  at  the  outset,  FAA  is  involved  in  hundreds  of  important  safety 
initiatives and what I have highlighted represents only a small fraction of what we 
are doing and what has contributed to today’s impressive safety record. 

This  concludes  my  remarks,  and  my  colleague  and  I  would  be  happy  to  answer 

any questions the Subcommittee may have. 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. Thank you. 
Mr.  Krakowski,  Chief  Operating  Officer,  Air  Traffic  Organiza-

Mr.  KRAKOWSKI.  My  comments  were 

incorporated 

in  Mr. 

tion, ATO. 

Sabatini’s. 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. So you are the lone person speaking? 
Mr. Scovel? 

STATEMENT OF HON. CALVIN L. SCOVEL III, INSPECTOR 

GENERAL, U.S. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION 

Mr.  SCOVEL.  Good  morning,  Chairman  Rockefeller,  Senator 
Hutchison,  Chairman  Inouye,  Vice  Chairman  Stevens.  We  appre-
ciate  the  opportunity  to  testify  today  on  the  key  safety  challenges 
facing FAA and its stakeholders. 

A  number  of  high  profile  events,  including  fundamental  break-
downs  in  FAA  oversight  at  Southwest  Airlines,  have  raised  legiti-
mate  concerns  about  whether  FAA’s  overall  approach  to  safety 
oversight  is  effective  and  what  changes  are  needed.  We  see  three 
broad areas where actions need to be focused over the next several 
years. 

First,  FAA’s  oversight  of  the  aviation  industry.  Recent  events  at 
Southwest  Airlines  brought  to  light  serious  lapses  in  FAA’s  over-
sight  of  air  carriers.  For  example,  we  found  that  FAA’s  Southwest 
inspection office developed an overly collaborative relationship with 
the  air  carrier  and  allowed  repeated  self-disclosures  of  Airworthi-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

10 

ness  Directive,  or  AD,  violations  without  ensuring  that  the  carrier 
had  addressed  the  underlying  problem.  The  balance  tipped  too 
heavily in favor of collaboration at the expense of oversight and ap-
propriate enforcement. 

We  also  found  that  weaknesses  in  FAA’s  national  oversight  al-
lowed  the  problems  at  Southwest  to  go  undetected  for  several 
years.  As  early  as  2003,  an  FAA  inspector  one  of  the  whistle-
blowers  in  this  case,  expressed  concerns  about  Southwest’s  compli-
ance with ADs. 

In  2006,  this  whistleblower  urged  FAA  to  conduct  system-wide 
reviews, but FAA did not begin these reviews until after the details 
of the March 2007 disclosure became public. In fact, we found that 
FAA  inspectors  had  not  reviewed  Southwest’s  system  for  compli-
ance with ADs since 1999. At the time of the Southwest disclosure, 
21  key  inspections  had  not  been  completed  in  at  least  5  years.  As 
of  March  25,  2008,  FAA  still  had  not  completed  five  of  these  re-
quired  inspections;  in  some  cases,  inspections  had  not  been  com-
pleted in nearly 8 years. 

We  have  identified  problems  with  FAA’s  national  program  for 
risk-based  oversight  in  the  past.  For  example,  in  2005,  we  found 
that inspectors did not complete 26 percent of planned inspections. 
Half  of  these  were  in  identified  risk  areas.  We  recommended  at 
that  time  and  previously  in  2002,  that  FAA  needed  to  provide  for 
greater national oversight; this is still needed today. 

Additionally, we found serious problems with FAA’s processes for 
conducting internal reviews and ensuring appropriate corrective ac-
tions. FAA did not attempt to determine the root cause of the safe-
ty  issue  at  Southwest  or  begin  enforcement  action  against  the  car-
rier  until  November  2007.  Too  much  attention  was  focused  on  the 
messenger and not on solutions for legitimate safety concerns. 

This also raises questions about FAA’s ability to investigate safe-
ty  allegations  raised  by  inspectors.  Corrective  actions  are  urgently 
needed to strengthen FAA’s oversight and prevent similar problems 
from recurring. FAA took actions but only after events became pub-
lic last month. 

In  addition  to  steps  underway,  we  recommend  that  FAA  revise 
the Voluntary Disclosure Reporting Program to ensure that air car-
riers take corrective actions to address violations identified through 
self-disclosures; implement a process for second-level review of self- 
disclosures before accepting and closing them; periodically transfer 
supervisory  inspectors  to  ensure  reliable  and  objective  air  carrier 
oversight;  require  an  appropriate  post-employment  cooling-off  pe-
riod for inspectors; implement a process to track field office inspec-
tions and alert local, regional, and Headquarters offices to overdue 
inspections;  and  establish  an  independent  body  to  investigate  in-
spector concerns. 

FAA  has  agreed  to  work  with  us  to  address  our  recommenda-

The  second  area  requiring  action  is  runway  safety.  Aviation 
stakeholders have expressed growing concern regarding the rise in 
severe  runway  incidents.  Recent  close  calls  on  the  ground  under-
score the need for proactive actions to improve runway safety. 

New technology is considered the primary solution for improving 
safety  in  this  area,  but  our  work  on  the  three  major  FAA  acquisi-

tions. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

11 

tions  for  improving  runway  safety  has  shown  significant  concerns 
as  to  what  can  be  effectively  deployed  within  the  next  several 
years. 

The  uncertain  timeline  of  FAA’s  runway  safety  technologies  un-
derscores  the  need  to  explore  other  near-term  solutions  to  improve 
runway safety. These include implementing relatively low-cost, air-
port-specific  changes  such  as  improving  runway  signage  and  air-
port  operations,  reinvigorating  FAA’s  national  plan  for  runway 
safety,  and  addressing  human  factors  issues  such  as  fatigue  and 
situational awareness. 

The  final  area  I  will  discuss  is  attrition  in  two  of  FAA’s  critical 
workforces:  air  traffic  controllers  and  aviation  safety  inspectors. 
The long-expected surge in controller retirements has begun. Since 
2005,  3,300  controllers  have  left  the  Agency,  which  is  23  percent 
more  than  projected.  FAA  has  accelerated  its  hiring  efforts  and 
hired  3,450  new  controllers  since  2005.  However,  this  will  remain 
a  critical  issue  for  FAA  over  the  next  10  years  since  it  must  hire 
and train at least 17,000 new controllers through 2017. 

FAA also faces challenges to its oversight mission due to attrition 
in  the  inspector  workforce.  Last  year,  FAA’s  hiring  efforts  kept 
pace with retirements, and the Agency ended the year with 133 ad-
ditional  inspectors  over  Fiscal  Year  2006  levels.  However,  FAA 
must  closely  oversee  this  effort  since  nearly  half  of  the  inspector 
workforce will be eligible to retire within the next 5 years. 

That  concludes  my  statement,  Mr.  Chairman.  I  would  be  happy 
to address any questions you or members of the Subcommittee may 
have. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Scovel follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. CALVIN L. SCOVEL III, INSPECTOR GENERAL, 

U.S. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION 

Mr. Chairman and Members of the Subcommittee: 
We appreciate the opportunity to testify today on the key safety challenges facing 
the  Federal  Aviation  Administration  (FAA)  and  its  stakeholders.  Aviation  safety 
oversight is—and must remain—FAA’s highest priority. For more than 10 years, our 
work has focused on actions needed to maintain the integrity and safety of our avia-
tion  system.  Our  statement  today  is  based  on  our  previous  reports  and  investiga-
tions as well as our ongoing work. 

As this Committee is aware, safety is a shared responsibility among FAA, aircraft 
manufacturers, airlines, and airports. Together, all four form a series of overlapping 
controls to keep the system safe. The U.S. has achieved an impressive safety record 
over  the  past  several  years.  This  is  a  remarkable  feat  given  all  the  changes  that 
have  occurred  within  the  industry.  For  example,  network  carriers  face  considerable 
uncertainty  with  a  softening  economy,  increasing  fuel  prices,  and  competition  from 
low-cost carriers, who now possess one-third of the market in terms of available pas-
senger seats. 

Network  carriers  have  moved  aggressively  away  from  high  cost  structures  by  re-
ducing  in-house  staff,  re-negotiating  labor  agreements,  and  increasing  the  use  of 
outside repair facilities. There also is considerable discussion regarding mergers and 
further consolidation within the industry. 

At  the  same  time,  demand  for  air  travel  has  increased  and  aircraft  load  factors 
are nearly 80 percent—an all-time high. In 2007, U.S. airlines transported over 700 
million  passengers  and  this  number  is  forecasted  to  grow  to  more  than  1  billion  by 
2016. 

However,  a  number  of  high-profile  events,  including  fundamental  breakdowns  in 
FAA  oversight  at  Southwest  Airlines  (SWA),  have  raised  legitimate  concerns  about 
the  effectiveness  of  FAA’  s  overall  approach  to  safety  oversight  and  what  changes 
are  needed.  These  concerns  have  been  amplified  by  the  fact  that  airlines  have 
grounded nearly 700 aircraft since FAA began industry-wide assessments of compli-
ance  with  safety  directives.  There  is  an  urgent  need  to  assess  what  went  wrong, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

12 

identify  root  causes,  and  proactively  examine  how  to  maintain  and  ultimately  en-
hance the margin of safety. 

Mr.  Chairman,  it  is  against  this  backdrop  that  we  would  like  to  discuss  the  fol-
lowing three key safety challenges facing FAA and its stakeholders, as we see them: 

• Strengthening FAA’s oversight of the aviation industry, 
• Improving runway safety, and 
• Addressing attrition within two of FAA’s critical workforces. 
Strengthening FAA’s Oversight of the Aviation Industry. The recent events at SWA 
brought to light serious lapses in FAA’s oversight of air carriers. As this Committee 
knows,  FAA’s  handling  of  whistleblower  concerns  regarding  SWA’s  failure  to  follow 
a  critical  FAA  Airworthiness  Directive  (AD)  has  had  a  cascading  effect  throughout 
the  industry.  While  the  critical  safety  lapses  indicated  problems  with  the  airline’s 
compliance,  they  are  symptomatic  of  much  deeper  problems  in  several  key  areas  of 
FAA’s oversight. 

• We  found  FAA’s  SWA  inspection  office  developed  an  overly  collaborative  rela-
tionship  with  the  air  carrier  that  allowed  repeated  self-disclosures  of  AD  viola-
tions  through  FAA’s  partnership  program.  These  programs  are  intended  to  fa-
cilitate cooperation between FAA and air carriers to identify and address safety 
issues. Yet, FAA allowed SWA to repeatedly self-disclose AD violations without 
ensuring that SWA had developed a comprehensive solution for reported safety 
problems—which  is  required  for  FAA  to  accept  the  disclosure  and  absolve  the 
carrier of any penalty. 
• We  also  found  that  the  events  at  SWA  demonstrate  weaknesses  in  FAA’s  na-
tional  program  for  risk-based  oversight—the  Air  Transportation  Oversight  Sys-
tem (ATOS). This allowed AD compliance issues in SWA’s maintenance program 
to  go  undetected  for  several  years.  As  early  as  2003,  one  of  the  whistleblowers 
expressed  concerns  to  FAA  about  SWA’s  compliance  with  ADs.  In  2006,  he 
began urging FAA to conduct system-wide reviews, but FAA did not begin these 
reviews  until  after  the  details  of  the  March  2007  disclosure  became  public.  In 
fact,  FAA  inspectors  had  not  reviewed  SWA’s  system  for  compliance  with  ADs 
since  1999.  At  the  time  of  SWA’s  disclosure,  21  key  inspections  had  not  been 
completed  in  at  least  5  years.  As  of  March  25,  2008,  FAA  still  had  not  com-
pleted five of these required inspections, in some cases inspections had not been 
completed in nearly 8 years. 
We previously identified system-wide problems with ATOS. In 2005,1 we found 
that  inspectors  did  not  complete  26  percent  of  planned  ATOS  inspections—half 
of  these  were  in  identified  risk  areas.  We  recommended,  among  other  things, 
that  FAA  strengthen  its  national  oversight  and  accountability  to  ensure  con-
sistent  and  timely  ATOS  inspections.  However,  FAA  has  still  not  fully  imple-
mented our recommendations. 
• Our  ongoing  work  at  SWA  and  our  2007  audit  at  Northwest  Airlines  (NWA) 
also  have  identified  weaknesses  in  FAA’s  processes  for  conducting  internal  re-
views  and  ensuring  appropriate  corrective  actions.  In  the  SWA  case,  FAA’s  in-
ternal reviews found, as early as April 2007, that the principal maintenance in-
spector (PMI) was complicit in allowing SWA to continue flying aircraft in viola-
tion  of  the  AD.  Yet,  FAA  did  not  attempt  to  determine  the  root  cause  of  the 
safety issue, nor initiate enforcement action against the carrier until November 
2007. 
• We also have concerns regarding FAA’ s failure to protect employees who report 
safety  issues  from  retaliation  by  other  FAA  employees.  For  example,  in  the 
SWA  case,  after  one  whistleblower  voiced  his  concerns  to  FAA,  an  anonymous 
hotline  complaint  was  lodged  against  him.  According  to  the  inspection  office 
manager,  the  PMI  indicated  that  a  SWA  representative  submitted  the  com-
plaint. The complaint was non-specific and never substantiated, but the whistle-
blower was removed from his oversight duties for 5 months while he was being 
investigated.  Yet,  FAA  did  not  suspend  other  inspectors  who  were  subjects  of 
similar  complaints,  including  the  PMI,  who  admitted  that  he  allowed  SWA  to 
continue flying in violation of the AD. 
Our work at NWA found the same problem with FAA’ s handling of the inspec-
tor  who  reported  safety  concerns.  As  with  the  inspector  in  the  SWA  case,  FAA 

1 OIG  Report  Number  AV–2005–062,  ‘‘FAA  Safety  Oversight  of  an  Air  Carrier  Industry  in 
Transition,’’  June  3,  2005.  OIG  reports  and  testimonies  are  available  on  our  website: 
www.oig.dot.gov. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

13 

managers reassigned an experienced inspector to office duties, after a complaint 
from  the  airline,  and  restricted  him  from  performing  oversight  on  the  carrier’s 
premises. At NWA, FAA’s reviews of an inspector’s safety concerns were limited 
and overlooked key findings identified by other inspectors. Although some of the 
inspector’s  safety  concerns  were  valid,  FAA  informed  him  that  all  of  his  con-
cerns lacked merit. 
Both the SWA and NWA cases demonstrate that FAA must pursue a more reli-
able  internal  review  process  and  protect  employees  who  bring  important  safety 
issues to light. 

Recently, FAA announced several actions to address the SWA safety directive vio-
lation. These include initiating a review of AD compliance at SWA and other air car-
riers.  FAA  also  proposed  to  fine  SWA  more  than  $10  million.  While  FAA’  s  actions 
are necessary, albeit long overdue, the issues we have identified will require imme-
diate  and  comprehensive  changes  in  FAA’s  air  carrier  oversight.  These  actions  in-
clude the following: 

—Ensuring that its Voluntary Disclosure Reporting Process requires inspectors to 
(a) verify that air carriers take comprehensive actions to correct the underlying 
causes  of  violations  identified  through  self-disclosure  programs,  and  (b)  evalu-
ate,  before  accepting  a  new  report  of  a  previously  disclosed  violation,  whether 
the carrier developed and implemented a comprehensive solution. 

—Implementing  a  process  for  second  level  supervisory  review  of  self-disclosures 
before they are accepted and closed—acceptance should not rest solely with one 
inspector. 

—Periodically  rotating  supervisory  inspectors  to  ensure  reliable  and  objective  air 

carrier oversight. 

—Revising  its  post-employment  guidance  to  require  a  ‘‘cooling-off ’’  period  before 

an FAA inspector is hired at an air carrier he or she previously inspected. 

—Implementing  a  process  to  track  field  office  inspections  and  alert  the  local,  Re-

gional, and Headquarters offices to overdue inspections. 

—Establishing an independent organization to investigate safety issues identified 

by its employees. 

—Developing a national review team that conducts periodic reviews of FAA’s over-

sight of air carriers. 

FAA committed to implement these recommendations. Follow through will be crit-

ical to demonstrate FAA’s commitment to providing effective oversight. 

Our  work  also  has  shown  that  FAA  needs  to  make  similar  improvements  in  its 
oversight  of  repair  stations  and  its  risk-based  system  for  overseeing  aircraft  manu-
facturers’  suppliers.  A  key  issue  in  both  cases  is  that  FAA’s  oversight  was  inad-
equate  in  keeping  up  with  dynamic  changes  occurring  in  those  industries.  We  will 
continue  to  examine  FAA’s  oversight  approach  of  the  aviation  industry  from  a  na-
tional  perspective,  and  will  keep  the  Committee  apprised  of  our  progress  with  this 
review, as well as other actions FAA should take to ensure safety. 

Improving Runway Safety. Aviation stakeholders are expressing growing concerns 
regarding  the  rise  in  severe  runway  incidents.  Recent  incidents  such  as  close  calls 
on  the  ground  in  Baltimore,  Chicago,  and  San  Francisco,  underscore  the  need  for 
proactive  actions  to  improve  runway  safety.  In  fact,  the  last  fatal  commercial  air-
craft  accident  in  the  United  States  (in  2006)  occurred  because  the  pilots  of  Comair 
Flight 5191 attempted to take off from the wrong runway. 

A significant threat to runway safety is runway incursions (any incident involving 
an unauthorized aircraft, vehicle, or person on a runway). Reducing the risk of run-
way  incursions  has  been  on  the  National  Transportation  Safety  Board’s  (NTSB) 
Most Wanted List of Safety Improvements since the list’s inception in 1990. Because 
runway incursions can be caused by controllers, pilots, or ground vehicles, responsi-
bility  for  their  prevention  falls  on  all  users  of  the  National  Airspace  System—FAA, 
airlines,  and  airport  operators—and  there  are  a  mix  of  actions  needed  to  address 
this critical safety issue. 

• New technology is considered by many to be the primary solution for improving 
runway  safety  but  is  years  away  from  effective  deployment.  Our  work  on  three 
major  FAA  acquisitions  for  improving  runway  safety  has  shown  that  there  are 
significant concerns as to what can be effectively deployed within the next sev-
eral years. For example, a key technology for preventing runway accidents—the 
Airport  Surface  Detection  Equipment-Model-X  (ASDE–X)—may  not  meet  its 
cost and schedule goals to commission all 35 systems for $549.8 million by 2011. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

14 

One  of  the  most  promising  technologies  on  the  horizon  is  the  Automatic  De-
pendent  Surveillance-Broadcast  (ADS–B)—a  satellite-based  technology  that  al-
lows  aircraft  to  broadcast  their  position  to  other  aircraft  and  ground  systems. 
When  displayed  in  the  cockpit,  ADS–B  information  can  provide  a  ‘‘second  set 
of eyes’’ by including the pilot in the loop to detect and alleviate hazardous sur-
face situations. However, as we testified in October,2 ADS–B ground infrastruc-
ture will not be in place until 2013, and users will not be required to equip with 
the needed avionics until 2020. 
• The  uncertain  timeline  of  FAA’s  runway  safety  technologies  underscore  the 
need  to  explore  other  near-term  solutions  to  improve  runway  safety.  We  found 
that  there  are  several  relatively  low-cost,  simple,  airport-specific  changes  that 
can help reduce the risk of runway incursions. These include airport infrastruc-
ture changes as well as procedural changes to daily airport operations. 
In  May  2007,  we  reported 3 on  runway  safety  efforts  at  four  airports  that  had 
experienced  a  surge  in  runway  incursions  in  2005  and  2006—Boston,  Chicago, 
Philadelphia, and Los Angeles. We found that airport operators at all four loca-
tions  responded  to  the  rise  in  runway  incursions  by  improving  airport  lighting, 
adding  better  signage,  and  improving  runway  and  taxiway  markings.  This  in-
cluded  upgrading  surface-painted,  hold-short  surface  markings  in  advance  of 
FAA’s mandatory date of June 2008. 
• FAA also needs to take actions to reinvigorate its national program for runway 
safety.  This  was  a  key  focus  in  2001  when  runway  incursions  reached  an  all- 
time high. However, we found that many important national initiatives for pro-
moting runway safety (undertaken by FAA as early as 2000) had waned as the 
number of incidents declined and FAA met its overall goals for reducing runway 
incursions. 
• Finally,  addressing  human  factors  issues,  such  as  fatigue  and  situational 
awareness,  is  important  to  improving  runway  safety.  Training  new  controllers 
on  human  factor  issues  as  well  as  technical  aspects  of  air  traffic  control  (such 
as airspace, phraseology, and procedures) will become increasingly important as 
FAA  begins  to  address  the  vast  influx  of  new  controllers,  as  large  numbers  of 
veteran controllers retire. 

Addressing  Attrition  Within  Two  of  FAA’s  Critical  Workforces.  A  key  issue  that 
will  affect  FAA  for  at  least  the  next  10  years  is  addressing  attrition  in  two  of  its 
critical  safety  workforces—air  traffic  controllers  and  aviation  safety  inspectors. 
Since  2005,  3,300  controllers  have  left  the  Agency–23  percent  more  than  projected. 
FAA  has  accelerated  its  hiring  efforts  and  has  hired  3,450  new  controllers  since 
2005–25 percent more than projected. Still, FAA faces a major challenge as it must 
hire and train at least 17,000 new controllers through 2017. 

• As a result of the high level of controller attrition, FAA is facing a fundamental 
transformation  in  the  composition  of  its  controller  workforce.  The  overall  per-
centage  of  controllers-in-training  has  grown  substantially  during  the  past  3 
years.  New  controllers  now  represent  about  25  percent  of  the  workforce  (up 
from 15 percent in 2004). However, that percentage can vary extensively by lo-
cation—from as little as 2 percent (e.g., Boston TRACON) to as much as 50 per-
cent (e.g., Las Vegas TRACON). 
A major challenge in addressing the attrition surge will be to train new control-
lers  to  the  Certified  Professional  Controller  (CPC)  level  at  their  assigned  loca-
tions—a  process  that  can  take  up  to  3  years.  Training  new  controllers  to  the 
CPC  level  is  important  for  two  reasons:  (1)  only  CPCs  are  qualified  to  control 
traffic  at  all  positions  of  their  assigned  area,  and  (2)  only  CPCs  certified  for  at 
least 6 months (at their assigned location) can become on-the-job training (OJT) 
instructors  for  other  new  controllers.  FAA  must  have  enough  OJT  instructors 
at all locations if it is to achieve its ambitious hiring and training plans for the 
next 10 years and beyond. 
• FAA  also  is  facing  challenges  to  its  oversight  mission  due  to  attrition  in  its  in-
spector  workforce.  FAA  has  about  4,100  inspectors  to  oversee  a  dynamic  and 
rapidly  changing  industry,  which  includes  114  commercial  air  carriers,  almost 
5,000 foreign and domestic repair stations, more than 700,000 active pilots, and 
more  than  1,600  approved  manufacturers.  Last  year,  FAA’s  hiring  efforts  kept 

2 OIG  Testimony  Number  CC–2007–100,  ‘‘Challenges  Facing  the  Implementation  of  FAA’s 

Automatic Dependent Surveillance-Broadcast Program,’’ October 17, 2007. 

3 OIG  Report  Number  AV–2007–050,  ‘‘Progress  Has  Been  Made  in  Reducing  Runway  Incur-
sions,  but  Recent  Incidents  Underscore  the  Need  for  Further  Proactive  Efforts,’’  May  24,  2007. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

15 

pace  with  retirements,  and  the  Agency  ended  the  year  with  133  additional  in-
spectors compared to Fiscal Year (FY) 2006 levels. However, FAA must continue 
to closely oversee this effort since nearly half of the inspector workforce will be 
eligible to retire in the next 5 years. 
To  maximize  its  limited  inspector  resources,  FAA  has  been  working  toward 
risk-based  safety  oversight  systems  for  air  carriers,  repair  stations,  and  manu-
facturers.  These  systems  target  inspector  resources  to  areas  of  greatest  risk. 
However,  unless  FAA  develops  a  reliable  staffing  model,  it  will  not  be  able  to 
effectively use its inspectors. 

I would now like to discuss these areas in further detail. 

Strengthening FAA’S Oversight of the Aviation Industry 
Recent  Events  at  Southwest  Airlines  Underscore  System-wide  Weaknesses  in  FAA’s 

Oversight of Air Carriers 

The recent events at SWA have exposed significant weaknesses in FAA’s oversight 
of  air  carriers  and  problems  with  its  partnership  programs.  The  FAA  directive 4 in 
this  case  required  SWA  to  inspect  the  fuselages  of  its  Boeing  737s  for  potential 
cracks.  FAA  issued  this  directive  after  an  Aloha  Airlines  737  lost  a  major  portion 
of  its  hull  while  in  flight  at  24,000  feet  in  1988,  resulting  in  one  fatality  and  mul-
tiple injuries. 

According  to  FAA,  when  an  air  carrier  determines  that  it  has  not  implemented 
an AD, it is required to immediately ground all non-compliant aircraft. FAA inspec-
tors share this responsibility—if an inspector becomes aware that an air carrier has 
violated  the  terms  of  an  AD,  the  inspector  is  required  to  ensure  that  the  aircraft 
are grounded. 

To meet this requirement, air carriers need a system to help them perform repet-
itive  inspections  of  aircraft  fuselages  in  a  timely  manner.  However,  we  found  that 
SWA did not have an adequate system to ensure it completed these inspections. As 
a  result,  SWA  operated  46  aircraft  that  were  not  inspected  for  fuselage  cracks. 
These  aircraft  flew  in  violation  of  the  AD  on  more  than  60,000  flights  for  up  to  9 
months. We estimate that these aircraft carried 6 million passengers during this pe-
riod. 

According to SWA, it discovered it had violated this directive on March 14, 2007. 
SWA  notified  an  FAA  PMI  the  following  day.  However,  the  inspector  did  not  direct 
SWA  to  ground  the  affected  planes,  and  SWA  continued  to  operate  them  on  1,451 
flights for 8 more days, carrying an estimated 145,000 passengers. 

The PMI permitted—and encouraged—SWA to formally self-disclose the AD viola-
tion  through  its  Voluntary  Disclosure  Reporting  Program  (VDRP),  which  would 
allow  the  airline  to  avoid  any  penalties.  FAA  accepted  the  self-disclosure,  even 
though  it  had  already  accepted  multiple  disclosures  on  AD  violations—this  should 
have prompted concerns regarding whether underlying problems were corrected. 

Once  it  formally  self-disclosed  the  violation  on  March  19,  2007,  SWA  stated  that 
it was in compliance with the AD, meaning it had inspected or grounded all affected 
aircraft.  However,  two  FAA  inspectors  (the  whistleblowers  in  this  case)  reported 
that  their  supervisor,  the  PMI,  knowingly  permitted  SWA  to  continue  flying  the 
identified aircraft even after SWA’s self-disclosure. SWA officials confirmed this and 
stated that the PMI gave them verbal permission to continue flying the aircraft. 

During  our  review,  we  found  that—after  SWA  self-disclosed  the  overflight—sev-
eral  of  these  aircraft  flew  into  airports  multiple  times  where  they  could  have  re-
ceived  the  required  inspections.  When  SWA  finally  inspected  the  aircraft,  it  found 
fuselage cracks in five of them. The AD specifies that these cracks could potentially 
lead  to  fuselage  separation  and  rapid  aircraft  depressurization  if  left  in  disrepair. 
While  these  critical  safety  lapses  indicate  problems  with  SWA’s  ability  to  comply 
with  safety  directives,  they  are  symptomatic  of  much  deeper  problems  with  FAA’s 
oversight  (the  timeline  below  shows  the  events  of  the  SWA  disclosure  and  FAA  ac-
tions). 

4 FAA  Airworthiness  Directive  2004–18–06  requires  that  Boeing  737s  (series  200,  300,  400, 
and 500) be inspected for fuselage cracks every 4,500 cycles (1 cycle equals 1 take-off and land-
ing) after they reach 35,000 cycles. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

16 

However,  SWA’s  proposed  solutions,  which  FAA  has  repeatedly  accepted,  have 
failed  to  solve  AD  compliance  issues,  as  it  has  violated  four  different  ADs  eight 
times since December 2006, including five in 2008. FAA’s oversight in this case ap-
pears to allow, rather than mitigate, recurring safety violations. 

FAA maintains that disclosure programs are valuable, as they can help to identify 
and  correct  safety  issues  that  might  not  otherwise  be  obtainable.  However,  we  are 
concerned that FAA relies too heavily on self-disclosures and promotes a pattern of 
excessive leniency at the expense of effective oversight and appropriate enforcement. 
Further,  a  partnership  program  that  does  not  ensure  carriers  correct  underlying 
problems is less likely to achieve safety benefits. 

Our ongoing work at another carrier has identified concerns with employees using 
disclosures to avoid penalties for safety violations. FAA must take steps to maintain 
the  safety  objective  of  these  programs  by  actively  discouraging  improper  relation-
ships  between  inspection  offices  and  carriers  so  that  these  programs  do  not  lapse 
into an easy amnesty path for perpetual safety violators. 

We found that FAA’s SWA’s inspection office developed an overly collaborative rela-
tionship  with  the  air  carrier  that  allowed  repeated  self-disclosures  of  AD  violations 
through  its  partnership  program.  Partnership  programs  are  intended  to  encourage 
data-sharing  between  FAA  and  air  carriers  to  identify  and  address  safety  issues. 
Yet,  FAA  allowed  SWA  to  repeatedly  self-disclose  AD  violations  without  ensuring 
that  SWA  had  developed  a  comprehensive  solution  for  reported  safety  problems— 
which  is  required  for  FAA  to  accept  the  disclosure  and  absolve  the  carrier  of  any 
penalty. 

We  also  found  that  the  events  of  SWA  demonstrate  weaknesses  in  FAA’s  national 
program for risk-based oversight—the Air Transportation Oversight System (ATOS). 
This allowed AD compliance issues in SWA’s maintenance program to go undetected 
for  several  years.  As  early  as  2003,  one  of  the  whistleblowers  expressed  concerns 
to FAA about SWA’s compliance with ADs. In 2006, he began urging FAA to conduct 
system-wide reviews, but FAA did not begin these reviews until after the details of 
the March 2007 disclosure became public. 

In  fact,  FAA  inspectors  had  not  reviewed  SWA’s  system  for  compliance  with  ADs 
since 1999. At the time of the Southwest disclosure, 21 key inspections had not been 
completed  in  at  least  5  years.  As  of  March  25,  2008,  FAA  still  had  not  completed 
five of these required inspections, in some cases inspections had not been completed 
in nearly 8 years. 

We  have  previously  identified  system-wide  problems  with  ATOS.  For  example,  in 
2002,5 we found inconsistent inspection methods across FAA field offices for various 
carriers.  As  a  result,  FAA  inspectors  were  confused  over  how  to  conduct  ATOS  in-
spections and assess risks. 

5 OIG  Report  Number  AV–2002–088,  ‘‘Air  Transportation  Oversight  System,’’  April  8,  2002. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

.

s
p
e
e
v
o
c
s
0
1
4

17 

In  2005,6 we  found  that  inspectors  did  not  complete  26  percent  of  planned  ATOS 
inspections—half  of  these  were  in  identified  risk  areas.  We  recommended,  among 
other  things,  that  FAA  strengthen  its  national  oversight  and  accountability  to  en-
sure  consistent  and  timely  ATOS  inspections.  However,  FAA  still  has  not  fully  ad-
dressed our recommendations. 

Further,  our  ongoing  work  and  our  2007  report 7 at  NWA  have  identified  weak-
nesses in FAA’s processes for conducting internal reviews, ensuring corrective actions, 
and  protecting  employees  who  report  safety  concerns.  In  the  SWA  case,  FAA’s  inter-
nal  reviews  found  as  early  as  April  2007  that  the  PMI  was  complicit  in  allowing 
SWA  to  continue  flying  aircraft  in  violation  of  the  AD.  Yet,  FAA  did  not  attempt 
to  determine  the  root  cause  of  the  safety  issue,  nor  initiate  enforcement  action 
against  the  carrier  until  November  2007.  At  NWA,  FAA’s  reviews  of  an  inspector’s 
safety concerns were limited and overlooked key findings identified by other inspec-
tors. Although some of the inspector’s safety concerns were valid, FAA informed him 
that all of his concerns lacked merit. 

We  also  have  concerns  regarding  FAA’s  failure  to  protect  employees  who  report 
safety  issues  from  retaliation  by  other  FAA  employees.  For  example,  in  the  SWA 
case,  after  one  whistleblower  voiced  his  concerns  to  FAA,  an  anonymous  hotline 
complaint  was  lodged  against  him.  According  to  the  inspection  office  manager,  the 
PMI indicated that a SWA representative submitted the complaint. 

The  complaint  was  non-specific  and  never  substantiated,  but  the  whistleblower 
was  removed  from  his  oversight  duties  for  5  months  while  he  was  being  inves-
tigated.  Yet,  FAA  did  not  suspend  other  inspectors  who  were  subjects  of  similar 
complaints, including the PMI, who admitted he allowed SWA to continue flying in 
violation of the AD. 

Our  work  at  NWA  found  the  same  problem  with  FAA’s  handling  of  the  inspector 
who  reported  safety  concerns.  As  with  the  inspector  in  the  SWA  case,  FAA  man-
agers  reassigned  an  experienced  inspector  to  office  duties,  following  a  complaint 
from the airline, and restricted him from performing oversight on the carrier’s prem-
ises. 

Both  the  SWA  and  NWA  cases  demonstrate  that  FAA  must  pursue  a  more  reli-
able  internal  review  process  and  protect  employees  that  bring  important  safety 
issues to light. Recently, FAA announced several actions to address the SWA safety 
directive  violation.  These  include  initiating  a  review  of  AD  compliance  at  SWA  and 
other air carriers. FAA also proposed to fine SWA more than $10 million. 

While  FAA’s  actions  are  necessary,  albeit  long  overdue,  the  issues  we  have  identi-
fied will require immediate and comprehensive changes in FAA’s air carrier oversight 
programs. These actions include the following: 

• Ensuring  that  its  VDRP  guidance  requires  inspectors  to  (a)  verify  that  air  car-
riers  take  comprehensive  actions  to  correct  the  underlying  causes  of  violations 
identified through self-disclosure programs, and (b) evaluate, before accepting a 
new  report  of  a  previously  disclosed  violation,  whether  the  carrier  developed 
and implemented a comprehensive solution. 

• Implementing  a  process  for  second  level  supervisory  review  of  self-disclosures 
before they are accepted and closed—acceptance should not rest solely with one 
inspector. 

• Periodically  rotating  supervisory  inspectors  to  ensure  reliable  and  objective  air 

carrier oversight. 

• Revising its post-employment guidance to require a ‘‘cooling-off’ period when an 

FAA inspector is hired at an air carrier he or she previously inspected. 

• Implementing  a  process  to  track  field  office  inspections  and  alert  the  local,  Re-

gional, and Headquarters offices to overdue inspections. 

• Establishing an independent organization to investigate safety issues identified 

• Developing a national review team that conducts periodic reviews of FAA’s over-

by its employees. 

sight of air carriers. 

FAA committed to implement these recommendations. Follow through will be crit-

ical to demonstrate FAA’ s commitment to providing effective oversight. 

6 OIG  Report  Number  AV–2005–062,  ‘‘FAA  Safety  Oversight  of  an  Air  Carrier  Industry  in 

Transition,’’ June 3, 2005. 

7 OIG  Report  Number  AV–2007–080,  ‘‘FAA’s  Actions  Taken  To  Address  Allegations  of  Unsafe 

Maintenance Practices at Northwest Airlines,’’ September 28, 2007. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

18 

Improvements  Also  Are  Needed  in  FAA’s  Oversight  of  Repair  Stations  and  Aircraft 

Manufacturers’ Suppliers 

As  with  its  oversight  of  air  carriers,  our  work  also  has  shown  FAA  must  make 
similar  improvements  in  its  oversight  of  repair  stations  and  its  risk-based  system 
for  overseeing  aircraft  manufacturers’  suppliers.  A  key  issue  in  both  cases  is  that 
FAA’s  oversight  was  inadequate  in  keeping  up  with  dynamic  changes  occurring  in 
those industries. 
Repair Stations 

Air  carriers  have  outsourced  maintenance  for  years  to  both  domestic  and  foreign 
repair facilities. These facilities can complete repairs for less cost and provide serv-
ices  in  areas  (such  as  engine  repair)  that  otherwise  would  require  air  carriers  to 
have specialized equipment and staff. Many air carriers outsource their engine work 
to the original equipment manufacturers because of the level of expertise the manu-
facturers  can  provide,  and  because  the  manufacturers  provide  warranties  for  their 
products. However, in recent years, use of external repair facilities has become more 
prominent. 

As we testified before this Subcommittee in June,8 from 1996 to 2006, while total 
maintenance costs have fluctuated, air carriers continued to increase the percentage 
of maintenance dollars spent on outsourced maintenance—from 37 to 64 percent. In 
2006,  $3.7  billion  of  the  $5.7  billion  spent  on  maintenance  was  outsourced  (see  fig-
ure 2). 

Neither  FAA  nor  the  Department  maintains  information  on  how  much  mainte-
nance air carriers outsource to foreign facilities, but our work shows that the num-
ber  of  foreign  FAA-certificated  repair  stations  repairing  U.S.  aircraft  has  increased 
from  344  in  1994  to  698  in  2007.  We  have  emphasized  that  the  issue  is  not  where 
maintenance is performed but that maintenance requires effective oversight. 

However, we have identified challenges in FAA’s ability to effectively monitor the 
increase in outsourcing. For example, in July 2003, we reported 9 that FAA had not 
shifted its oversight of aircraft maintenance to the locations where the maintenance 
was performed. Although air carriers were using external repair stations to perform 
more  of  their  maintenance  work,  FAA  still  was  focusing  most  of  its  inspections  on 
the maintenance work that air carriers performed within their own facilities. 

During  the  past  8  years,  FAA  has  taken  important  steps  to  move  its  safety  over-
sight for air carriers and repair stations to risk-based systems. FAA’ s new oversight 
system  applies  to  both  domestic  and  foreign  repair  stations.  However,  FAA  cannot 
effectively implement a risk-based system for oversight of aircraft maintenance if it 
does not know where the maintenance is performed. 

8 OIG  Testimony  Number  CC–2007–076,  ‘‘Aviation  Safety:  FAA  Oversight  of  Foreign  Repair 

9 OIG Report Number AV–2003–047, ‘‘Review of Air Carriers’ Use of Aircraft Repair Stations,’’ 

Stations,’’ June 20, 2007. 

July 8, 2003. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

.

s
p
e
1
e
v
o
c
s
0
1
4

19 

In  July  2003  and  again  in  December  2005,10 we  reported  that  FAA  did  not  have 
good  systems  for  determining  which  repair  facilities  air  carriers  were  using  to  per-
form  their  most  critical  maintenance.  FAA  subsequently  developed  new  inspector 
guidance  and  air  carrier  processes  to  address  this  problem.  However,  this  system 
does  not  provide  FAA  with  the  information  it  needs  to  target  inspections  to  where 
the  most  maintenance  is  done  because  FAA  does  not  require  air  carriers  to  report 
these data. 

When  carriers  do  report  the  data,  FAA  does  not  require  that  they  include  all  re-
pair  stations  performing  critical  component  repairs  or  that  inspectors  validate  the 
information. These efforts fall short of providing FAA with the information it needs. 
FAA  officials  stated  they  are  still  formulating  the  guidance  language,  however,  it 
is  unclear  whether  FAA  will  require  air  carriers  to  report  volume  data  for  repair 
stations  that  perform  critical  component  repairs  and  require  inspectors  to  validate 
the data. 
Aircraft Manufacturers’ Suppliers 

In  February,  we  reported 11 that  since  1998  FAA  has  worked  toward  imple-
menting  a  risk-based  oversight  system  for  aviation  manufacturers.  However,  this 
system  was  implemented  in  FY  2003  and  does  not  take  into  account  the  degree  to 
which  manufactures  now  use  suppliers  to  make  aviation  products.  FAA  based  the 
new  system  on  historical  manufacturing  business  models,  in  which  manufacturers 
maintain  primary  control  over  the  production  of  their  aircraft  rather  than  use  sup-
pliers to design and manufacture extensive portions of aircraft. 

We  found  weaknesses  throughout  FAA’s  oversight  system  for  manufacturers  and 
their  suppliers.  First,  FAA  has  not  ensured  that  manufacturers  are  providing  over-
sight  of  their  suppliers.  Manufacturers  are  the  first  line  of  defense  in  ensuring  the 
products used on their aircraft meet FAA and manufacturers’ standards. Yet, during 
the 24 months preceding our review, manufacturers had not audited 6 of the 21 crit-
ical parts suppliers we visited. 

Second, FAA does not require inspectors to perform enough audits of suppliers to 
determine  how  well  manufacturers’  quality  assurance  systems  are  working.  FAA’s 
guidance  for  overseeing  manufacturers’  quality  assurance  systems  only  requires  in-
spectors to perform, at most, four supplier audits, regardless of how many suppliers 
the manufacturer uses. 

Supplier control audits are a primary tool that FAA uses to assess how well man-
ufacturers’ oversight systems are working. Equally important, these audits function 
as a second layer of control for preventing improperly produced parts from entering 
the market. However, as shown in the table below, in each of the last 4 years, FAA 
has  inspected  an  average  of  1  percent  of  the  total  suppliers  used  by  the  five  manu-
facturers we reviewed. 

At  FAA’s  current  surveillance  rate,  it  would  take  inspectors  at  least  98  years  to 
audit  every  supplier  once.  This  is  particularly  troubling  because  manufacturers  are 
not evaluating these suppliers frequently or comprehensively. 

10 OIG Report Number AV–2006–031, ‘‘Review of Air Carriers’ Use of Non-Certificated Repair 

Facilities,’’ December 15, 2005. 

11 OIG  Report  Number  AV–2008–026,  ‘‘Assessment  of  FAA’s  Risk-Based  System  for  Over-

seeing Aircraft Manufacturers’ Suppliers,’’ February 26, 2008. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e

.

L
e
v
o
c
s

20 

Third,  the  systemic  deficiencies  we  identified  at  the  21  supplier  facilities  we  vis-
ited  indicate  that  manufacturers  and  FAA  need  to  strengthen  their  oversight  of 
these  facilities.  For  example,  nearly  half  (43  percent)  of  the  suppliers  had  defi-
ciencies  in  their  tool  calibration  and  employee  training  programs.  Deficiencies  in 
these areas could impact the quality of the parts these suppliers produce. 
Improving Runway Safety 

From  1999  to  2001,  runway  incursions  increased  at  alarming  rates.  To  its  credit, 
FAA took decisive action that helped reduce these incidents—it established regional 
runway safety offices, and initiated aggressive educational programs for pilots. How-
ever, since 2003, the number of runway incursions has begun climbing again, reach-
ing  a  high  of  370  in  FY  2007—a  12-percent  increase  over  FY  2006  (see  figure  3). 

During the last 10 years, our work has showed that a range of actions are needed 
to  enhance  the  margin  of  safety  on  the  Nation’s  runways.  We  have  identified  four 
specific  areas  where  FAA  and  other  aviation  users  should  focus  runway  safety  ef-
forts. 

• Implementing  existing  and  new  FAA  systems  to  alert  controllers  and  pilots  to 

potential runway incursions. 

• Making  airport-specific  infrastructure  and  procedural  changes,  such  as  im-

proved runway signage and markings. 

• Reinvigorating FAA’s national program for improving runway safety and identi-

fying and correcting root causes of runway incursions. 

• Addressing  controller  human  factors  issues,  such  as  fatigue  and  attention, 

through improved training. 

Implementing Existing and New FAA Systems To Improve Runway Safety 

New  technology  is  considered  by  many  to  be  a  key  factor  in  the  mix  of  solutions 
for  improving  runway  safety.  However,  our  work  on  three  major  FAA  acquisitions 
for  improving  runway  safety  has  shown  that  there  are  significant  concerns  as  to 
what  can  be  effectively  deployed  within  the  next  several  years.  For  example,  a  key 
technology  for  preventing  runway  accidents—the  Airport  Surface  Detection  Equip-
ment—Model X (ASDE–X)—may not meet its cost and schedule goals to commission 
all 35 systems for $549.8 million by 2011. 

ASDE–X is a ground surveillance system intended to alert controllers to potential 
ground collisions. As of FY 2007, FAA expended about $314 million (57 percent) and 
obligated  about  $378  million  (69  percent)  of  the  planned  funding.  However,  FAA 
only deployed 11 of 35 systems for operational use. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

.

s
p
e
2
e
v
o
c
s
0
1
4

21 

FAA must now deploy the last 24 systems at the more complex airports with less 
than  half  of  the  planned  funds.  We  reported  in  October 12 that  ASDE–X  may  not 
achieve all planned safety benefits. These include maintaining operational capability 
during  inclement  weather  (when  it  is  most  needed)  and  alerting  controllers  to  pos-
sible collisions on intersecting runways and taxiways (‘‘hot spots’’ for runway incur-
sions). 

Another  significant  technology  under  development  is  Runway  Status  Lights 
(RWSL).  RWSL  technology  uses  automated,  surveillance-driven  lights  that  work  as 
independent, direct warning systems to alert pilots in departing or crossing aircraft 
that the runway is occupied. Lights illuminate red when it is unsafe to cross or de-
part  from  a  runway,  thus  increasing  the  crew’s  situational  awareness  and  decreas-
ing the potential for runway incursions caused by pilot deviations. 

In January, we reported 13 that RWSL is a viable technology for reducing runway 
incursions.  At  Dallas-Fort  Worth  International  Airport  (DFW),  the  test  site  for 
RWSL,  the  system  met  or  exceeded  all  performance  expectations.  In  addition,  all 
system users we met with agreed that RWSL work as intended and have no known 
negative impact on capacity, communication, or safety. 

However,  the  technology  is  still  in  the  early  stages  of  implementation,  and  much 
work remains for FAA to achieve full deployment. A key issue is that RWSL require 
ASDE–X  fusion  data  for  its  surveillance  capabilities  and  therefore  depends  on  the 
successful  deployment  of  that  technology.  In  addition,  RWSL  have  not  been  tested 
on intersecting runways. 

One  of  the  most  promising  technologies  on  the  horizon  is  the  Automatic  Depend-
ent  Surveillance-Broadcast  (ADS–B)—a  satellite-based  technology  that  allows  air-
craft  to  broadcast  their  position  to  other  aircraft  and  ground  systems.  When  dis-
played  in  the  cockpit,  ADS–B  information  can  provide  a  ‘‘second  set  of  eyes’’  by  in-
cluding the pilot in the loop to detect and alleviate hazardous surface situations. 

In August 2007, FAA took an important step by awarding a contract for the devel-
opment  and  installation  of  the  ground  infrastructure  for  ADS–B.  However,  as  we 
testified in October,14 ADS–B ground infrastructure will not be in place until 2013, 
and users will not be required to equip with the needed avionics until 2020. A clear 
transition path for moving forward with ADS–B with well-defined costs and benefits 
does not yet exist. 
Making Airport-Specific Infrastructure and Procedural Changes 

The  uncertain  timeline  and  emerging  risks  of  FAA’s  runway  safety  technologies 
underscore the need to explore other near-term solutions to improve runway safety. 
We  found  that  there  are  several  relatively  low-cost,  simple,  airport-specific  changes 
that can help reduce the risk of runway incursions. These include airport infrastruc-
ture changes as well as procedural changes to daily airport operations. 

In  May  2007,  we  reported 15 on  runway  safety  efforts  at  four  airports  that  had 
experienced  a  surge  in  runway  incursions  in  2005  and  2006—Boston,  Chicago, 
Philadelphia, and Los Angeles. We found that airport operators at all four locations 
responded  to  the  rise  in  runway  incursions  by  improving  airport  lighting,  adding 
better signage, and improving runway and taxiway markings. This included upgrad-
ing  surface-painted,  hold-short  surface  markings  in  advance  of  FAA’  s  mandatory 
date of June 2008. 

Some airports also added unique signage to prevent runway incursions. For exam-
ple,  at  Chicago  O’Hare,  the  airport  operator  added  above-ground  signage  near  the 
general  aviation  ramp  instructing  general  aviation  aircraft  to  hold  and  contact  the 
ground  controller  before  continuing.  This  will  help  prevent  general  aviation  pilots 
from inadvertently taxiing onto an active runway. 

We  also  found  that  airport  operators  and  FAA  managers  made  the  following  pro-

cedural changes to daily operations: 

creased the minimum time for management to work in the operational area. 

• Air  Traffic  managers  adopted  tools  for  tracking  controller  performance  and  in-
• Airport  operators  tightly  controlled  the  testing  of  drivers  in  the  airfield  driver 
certification  process  and  imposed  punitive  action  for  non-compliance  of  driver 
rules. 

12 OIG  Report  Number  AV–2008–004,  ‘‘FAA  Needs  To  Improve  ASDE–X  Management  Con-

trols to Address Cost Growth, Schedule Delays, and Safety Risks,’’ October 31, 2007. 

13 OIG Report Number AV–2008–021, ‘‘FAA’s Implementation of Runway Status Lights,’’ Jan-

uary 14, 2008. 

14 OIG  Testimony  Number  CC–2007–100,  ‘‘Challenges  Facing  the  Implementation  of  FAA’s 

Automatic Dependent Surveillance-Broadcast Program,’’ October 17, 2007. 

15 OIG  Report  Number  AV–2007–050,  ‘‘Progress  Has  Been  Made  in  Reducing  Runway  Incur-
sions,  but  Recent  Incidents  Underscore  the  Need  for  Further  Proactive  Efforts,’’  May  24,  2007. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

22 

• Airport operators and the FAA Runway Safety Office created maps or brochures 
to highlight potentially hazardous intersections (known as hot spots) on the air-
port movement area. 

Results  through  FY  2007  at  Boston  and  Philadelphia  show  a  significant  decrease 
in  runway  incursions  (more  than  half  at  both  locations).  However,  results  are  not 
as clear at Los Angeles International Airport (which is still completing airfield con-
struction) and Chicago O’Hare (which is still struggling with extremely complex run-
way layouts). At Los Angeles, the number of runway incursions remained steady but 
at Chicago the number increased. 

While the implementation of these actions varied among airports, they all had the 
potential  to  reduce  runway  incursions  system-wide.  However,  other  than  informal 
networking, there were no formal means for the various users to share actions that 
had reduced or prevented runway incursions at their locations. 

Our  recommendations  included  developing  an  automated  means,  such  as  estab-
lishing  an  intranet  site  through  the  Regional  Runway  Safety  Offices,  to  share  best 
practices  for  reducing  runway  incursions  with  all  users  of  the  National  Airspace 
System.  In  response,  FAA  implemented  a  best  practices  website  for  runway  safety 
in December 2007. 

In  addition,  in  August  2007,  FAA  convened  a  task  force  of  pilots,  airport  man-
agers, and controllers to address runway safety issues. The group agreed on a short- 
term plan to improve runway safety, which focuses on (1) conducting safety reviews 
at  airports  based  on  runway  incursion  and  wrong  runway  departure  data,  (2)  de-
ploying improved airport signage and markings at the 75 busiest, medium-to large- 
sized airports (ahead of the June 2008 mandated deadline), and (3) reviewing cock-
pit and air traffic clearance procedures. 

In January 2008, FAA reported that the aviation industry has initiated and com-
pleted significant short-term actions to improve safety at U.S. airports. For example, 
safety  reviews  of  the  top  20  high-risk  airports  were  completed,  resulting  in  more 
than  100  short-term  initiatives  and  numerous  mid-  and  long-term  initiatives.  Also, 
71  of  the  same  75  busiest  airports  completed  enhancements  to  surface  markings, 
and airlines committed to providing pilots with simulator training or other realistic 
training for taxiing aircraft from the terminal to the runway. 
Reinvigorating FAA’s National Program for Improving Runway Safety 

From 1998 to 2001, we reported that runway incursions were increasing at alarm-
ing  rates.  To  its  credit,  FAA  took  decisive  action,  and  the  total  number  of  runway 
incursions  decreased  from  a  high  of  407  in  FY  2001  to  a  low  of  323  in  FY  2003. 
During  our  review  at  the  Boston,  Chicago,  Los  Angeles,  and  Philadelphia  airports, 
however,  we  found  that  many  important  national  initiatives  for  promoting  runway 
safety (undertaken by FAA as early as 2000) had waned as the number of incidents 
declined and FAA met its overall goals for reducing runway incursions. 

For  example,  FAA  established  the  Runway  Safety  Office  in  2001  to  provide  cen-
tral  oversight  and  accountability  for  implementing  runway  safety  initiatives 
throughout the Agency. However, at the time of our review, that office had not had 
a permanent Director for almost 3 years. In addition, the office was reorganized and 
realigned  twice  since  FAA  established  the  Air  Traffic  Organization  in  February 
2004,  and  its  staff  was  reduced  by  half,  including  the  elimination  of  two  Head-
quarters Division offices within the Office of Runway Safety. 

We also found that FAA no longer prepares its National Plan for Runway Safety, 
which  defined  the  Agency’s  strategy  and  prioritized  efforts  to  reduce  runway  incur-
sions. The last time FAA prepared this plan was in 2002. 

FAA  has  begun  addressing  many  of  our  concerns.  For  example,  in  August  2007, 
FAA hired a permanent director for its Runway Safety Office and plans to reinstate 
its  National  Plan  for  Runway  Safety.  Although  this  is  a  good  start,  sustained  com-
mitment along with adequate resources and executive level attention will be key to 
achieving results. 
Addressing Controller Human Factors Issues Through Improved Training 

Addressing  human  factors  issues,  such  as  fatigue  and  situational  awareness,  is 
important  to  improving  runway  safety.  In  its  investigation  of  Comair  flight  5191, 
the  NTSB  expressed  concerns  that  the  lone  controller  on  duty  at  the  time  of  the 
accident  had  about  2  hours  of  sleep  before  his  shift.  As  a  result  of  its  investigation 
at  Lexington,  the  NTSB  added  controller  fatigue  to  its  ‘‘Most  Wanted  List’’  in  2007 
and made two recommendations to FAA concerning controller fatigue. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

23 

As we testified in February before the House Aviation Subcommittee,16 controller 
staffing  and  training  will  be  key  watch  items  during  the  next  10  years  as  FAA  be-
gins  executing  its  plans  to  hire  and  train  17,000  new  controllers  through  2017. 
Training new controllers on human factor issues (such as addressing fatigue and in-
creasing  attention)  as  well  as  technical  aspects  of  air  traffic  control  (such  as  air-
space,  phraseology,  and  procedures)  will  become  increasingly  important  as  FAA  be-
gins to address the large influx of new controllers. 

We  also  reported  in  May  that  FAA  needed  to  focus  on  controller  human  factors 
issues and training to improve individual, team, and facility performance. In its last 
National  Plan  for  Runway  Safety,  FAA  cited  human  factors  and  lack  of  controller 
teamwork  as  significant  contributing  factors  of  runway  incursions  caused  by  con-
troller  operational  errors.  However,  we  found  that  FAA  had  made  little  progress  in 
addressing  human  factors  training  to  help  reduce  the  risk  of  runway  incursions 
caused by controllers. 

To its credit, FAA has successfully implemented an important training initiative— 
increasing  the  use  of  training  simulators  at  towers.  Tower  simulators  can  improve 
overall facility performance by reducing runway incursions through enhanced initial 
and proficiency training. They provide controllers with a virtual replica of the tower 
environment,  which  can  be  used  to  train  controllers  using  real-life  scenarios  such 
as  day-versus-night  operations,  varying  weather  conditions,  different  runway  con-
figurations, or emergency situations. 

Simulators also can be used to model changes in airport configurations and proce-
dures.  For  example,  Boston  Logan  used  a  tower  simulator  to  help  establish  nec-
essary  safety  procedures  for  a  newly  constructed  runway.  Likewise,  the  National 
Aeronautics and Space Administration used a tower simulator to study alternatives 
for improving runway safety at Los Angeles and evaluate the effectiveness of adding 
a  center-field  taxiway  between  its  parallel  runways.  FAA  recently  installed  tower 
simulators  at  four  towers—Chicago  O’Hare,  Miami,  Ontario,  and  Phoenix.  Results 
thus far indicate that simulators are a valuable training tool. 

FAA  plans  to  install  12  additional  simulators  this  year  (6  at  large  airports  and 
6  at  the  FAA  Academy)  and  12  next  year  (at  other  airports).  FAA  needs  to  ensure 
that  this  initiative  remains  on  track  to  capitalize  on  the  significant  success  this 
training has demonstrated. 

We are reviewing several other issues concerning controller human factors. At the 
request  of  the  House  Aviation  Subcommittee  Chairman,  we  are  reviewing  the  rate 
and  root  causes  of  controller  training  failures  (developmental  controllers  who  fail 
training  either  at  the  FAA  Academy  or  at  their  assigned  facility).  At  the  request 
of  Senator  Durbin  of  Illinois,  we  are  reviewing  factors  that  could  affect  controller 
fatigue.  We  are  focusing  our  current  efforts  at  Chicago  O’Hare  Tower,  Chicago 
TRACON,  and  Chicago  Center  but  may  review  other  locations  and  FAA’s  national 
efforts based on the results of our work at Chicago. 
Addressing Attrition Within Two of FAA’s Critical Workforces 

A key issue that will affect FAA for at least the next 10 years is addressing attri-
tion in two of its critical safety workforces—air traffic controllers and aviation safety 
inspectors.  FAA  currently  is  training  more  new  controllers  than  it  has  in  the  past 
15  years.  The  percentage  of  developmental  controllers  within  the  controller  work-
force has increased from about 15 percent in 2004 to about 25 percent in 2007. 

As a result, FAA is facing a fundamental transformation in the composition of its 
controller workforce that will require improvements in its facility training program. 
A  critical  piece  for  addressing  controller  attrition  is  facility  training.  However,  we 
found  that  FAA’s  facility  training  program  continues  to  be  extremely  decentralized 
and  the  efficiency  and  quality  of  the  training  varies  extensively  from  one  location 
to another. We found similar problems in 2004. 

FAA  also  is  facing  substantial  safety  oversight  challenges  due  to  potential  attri-
tion in its inspector workforce. FAA has about 4,100 inspectors to oversee a dynamic 
and  rapidly  changing  industry,  which  includes  114  commercial  air  carriers,  almost 
5,000  foreign  and  domestic  repair  stations,  more  than  700,000  active  pilots,  and 
more than 1,600 approved manufacturers. 
Addressing Controller Attrition Through Improvements in Facility Training 

The  long-expected  surge  in  controller  attrition  has  begun.  Since  2005,  3,300  con-
trollers have left the Agency. The total rate of attrition was 23 percent higher than 
FAA  projected;  however,  FAA  has  accelerated  its  hiring  efforts  to  fill  vacancies. 
Since  2005,  FAA  has  hired  3,450  new  controllers–25  percent  more  than  projected. 

16 OIG  Testimony  Number  CC–2008–043,  ‘‘FAA’s  Fiscal  Year  2009  Budget  Request:  Key 

Issues Facing the Agency,’’ February 7, 2008. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

24 

Still,  FAA  faces  a  major  challenge  as  it  must  hire  and  train  17,000  new  controllers 
through 2017. Figure 4 shows FAA’s estimates and actual numbers for controller at-
trition and new controller hiring from FY 2005 through FY 2007. 

As  a  result  of  the  high  level  of  controller  attrition,  FAA  is  facing  a  fundamental 
transformation in the composition of its controller workforce. The overall percentage 
of  controllers  in  training  has  grown  substantially  during  the  past  3  years.  From 
April  2004  to  December  2007,  the  overall  size  of  the  controller  workforce  remained 
constant; however, during the same period, the number of controllers in training in-
creased by 1,375, or 62 percent, while the total number of CPCs, decreased by 1,302. 
New  controllers  now  represent  about  25  percent  of  the  workforce  (up  from  15  per-
cent  in  2004).  However,  that  percentage  can  vary  extensively  by  location—from  as 
little as 2 percent (e.g., Boston TRACON) to as much as 50 percent (e.g., Las Vegas 
TRACON). 

As we testified in February,17 a major challenge in addressing the attrition surge 
will be to train new controllers to the CPC level at their assigned locations. Facility 
training  can  take  up  to  3  years  and  is  the  most  expensive  part  of  new  controller 
training. Training new controllers to the CPC level is important for two reasons: (1) 
only CPCs are qualified to control traffic at all positions of their assigned area, and 
(2) only CPCs certified for at least 6 months (at their assigned location) can become 
on-the-job  training  (OJT)  instructors  for  other  new  controllers.  FAA  must  have 
enough  OJT  instructors  at  all  locations  if  it  is  to  achieve  its  ambitious  hiring  and 
training plans for the next 10 years and beyond. 

It is important to note that new controllers who have completed portions of train-
ing and have been certified on a position can independently staff that position. How-
ever,  controllers  are  not  qualified  CPCs  until  they  have  certified  on  all  positions 
within  their  assigned  area.  In  addition,  using  position-qualified  controllers  exten-
sively  to  staff  positions  can  lengthen  the  time  required  for  them  to  become  CPCs 
since they are not training on other new positions. 

We recently completed an audit of FAA’s controller facility training program—our 
second  review  of  this  program  since  2004.  Overall,  we  found  that  the  program  con-
tinues  to  be  extremely  decentralized  and  the  efficiency  and  quality  of  the  training 
varies from one location to another. We found similar problems in 2004. FAA is tak-
ing  actions  at  the  national  level  to  get  this  important  program  on  track,  but  many 
of  FAA’s  efforts  are  still  in  the  early  stages.  To  achieve  its  goals  for  the  controller 
workforce, FAA will need to take the following actions: 

• Clarify responsibility for oversight and direction of the facility training program 
at  the  national  level.  Facility  training  is  primarily  the  responsibility  of  the  Air 
Traffic  Organization’s  Vice  President  for  Terminal  Services  and  Vice  President 
for En Route and Oceanic Services. However, the Vice President for Acquisition 
and  Business  Services  oversees  new  controller  hiring  and  the  FAA  Academy 
training program, and the Senior Vice President for Finance oversees the devel-

17 OIG  Testimony  CC–2008–043,  ‘‘FAA’s  Fiscal  Year  2009  Budget  Request:  Key  Challenges 

Facing the Agency,’’ February 7, 2008. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

.

s
p
e
3
e
v
o
c
s
0
1
4

25 

opment  of  the  Controller  Workforce  Plan.  Both  have  key  roles  in  the  controller 
training  process  as  well.  As  a  result  of  these  overlapping  responsibilities,  we 
found there is significant confusion at the facility level. 
During  our  review,  facility  managers,  training  managers,  and  even  Head-
quarters  officials  were  unable  to  tell  us  who  or  what  office  was  responsible  for 
facility  training.  FAA  needs  to  clarify  responsibility  for  oversight  and  direction 
of  the  facility  training  program  at  the  national  level  and  communicate  those 
roles to facility managers. 
• Establish realistic standards for the level of developmental controllers that facili-
ties can accommodate. Given the various sizes and complexities of FAA’ s more 
than 300 facilities, FAA needs to identify (by facility) how many developmental 
controllers  facilities  can  realistically  accommodate.  FAA  must  consider  several 
factors, such as: (1) the number of available OJT instructors, (2) available class-
room  space,  (3)  the  number  of  available  simulators,  (4)  all  training  require-
ments, and (5) the number of recently placed new personnel already in training. 
• Implement  key  initiatives  proposed  in  its  2004  Controller  Workforce  Plan.  FAA 
has not implemented key initiatives to improve facility training that it proposed 
in  the  2004  Controller  Workforce  Plan.  These  include,  ‘‘developing,  imple-
menting,  and  enforcing  a  policy  that  assigns  facility  training  as  a  priority  sec-
ond  only  to  operations.’’  This  was  to  be  accomplished  by  ‘‘(1)  placing  develop-
mental  controllers  only  at  facilities  that  had  available  training  capacity,  (2)  re-
quiring facility managers to suspend training only for critical operational neces-
sities,  and  (3)  establishing  nominal  time-to-certify  metrics  and  holding  man-
agers accountable for achieving those targets.’’ However, FAA never issued this 
policy. 
In  addition,  FAA  has  not  comprehensively  evaluated  its  facility  training  pro-
gram.  In  its  2004  Controller  Workforce  Plan,  FAA  stated  it  would  ‘‘conduct  a 
thorough review of facility training to ensure it begins where the Academy ends. 
This  review  will  take  into  consideration  other  efficiency  gains  identified  in  this 
plan  and  will  result  in  facility  training  programs  tailored  to  meet  the  needs  of 
developmental controllers of the future.’’ FAA intended for this effort to help re-
duce  the  time  it  takes  new  controllers  to  become  CPCs.  However,  FAA  never 
conducted the evaluation. FAA must follow through with this evaluation and its 
Controller Workforce Plan initiatives. 

Addressing Inspector Attrition and Implementing Staffing Models 

FAA  is  also  facing  substantial  safety  oversight  challenges  due  to  potential  attri-
tion in its inspector workforce. FAA has about 4,100 inspectors to oversee a dynamic 
and  rapidly  changing  industry,  which  includes  114  commercial  air  carriers,  almost 
5,000  foreign  and  domestic  repair  stations,  more  than  700,000  active  pilots,  and 
more than 1,600 approved manufacturers. Last year, FAA’s hiring efforts kept pace 
with  retirements,  and  the  Agency  ended  the  year  with  133  additional  inspectors 
compared  to  FY  2006  levels.  However,  FAA  must  continue  to  closely  oversee  this 
effort since nearly half of the inspector workforce will be eligible to retire in the next 
5 years. 

FAA  will  never  have  an  inspector  workforce  that  is  large  enough  to  oversee  all 
aspects  of  the  industry,  so  it  is  important  for  the  Agency  to  place  inspectors  where 
they  are  most  needed.  To  maximize  its  limited  inspector  resources,  FAA  has  been 
working toward risk-based safety oversight systems for air carriers, repair stations, 
and  manufacturers.  These  systems  target  inspector  resources  to  areas  of  greatest 
risk.  However,  unless  FAA  develops  a  reliable  staffing  model,  it  will  not  be  able  to 
effectively  use  its  inspectors.  At  the  direction  of  Congress,  the  National  Research 
Council  completed  a  study 18 of  FAA’s  current  methods  for  allocating  inspector  re-
sources  in  September  2006  and  recommended  that  FAA  develop  a  new  staffing 
model. 

It has been more than 1 year since the Council study, and FAA is still in the early 
stages  of  developing  a  new  staffing  method.  FAA  has  established  an  interim  target 
date  to  assess  current  staffing  methods  and  begin  identifying  the  elements  of  the 
next generation staffing tool by September 2008. 

FAA  recently  finalized  milestones  to  develop  and  implement  the  new  model  and 
plans to begin using it by October 2009. Making measurable progress toward a new 
staffing  model  is  a  key  watch  item,  and  we  will  continue  to  monitor  this  important 
initiative. 

That  concludes  my  statement,  Mr.  Chairman,  I  would  be  happy  to  address  any 

questions you or other Members of the Subcommittee may have. 

18 ‘‘Staffing Standards for Aviation Safety Inspectors,’’ September 20, 2006. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

26 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. Thank you very much. 
And now Mr. Chealander. 

STATEMENT OF HON. STEVEN R. CHEALANDER, MEMBER, 

NATIONAL TRANSPORTATION SAFETY BOARD 

Mr.  CHEALANDER.  Thank  you  and  good  morning,  Chairman 
Rockefeller,  Ranking  Member  Hutchison,  Chairman  Inouye,  and 
Vice Chairman Stevens. Thank you for allowing me the opportunity 
to present testimony on behalf of the National Transportation Safe-
ty Board. 

Let  me  begin  by  discussing  runway  safety  and,  in  particular, 
runway  incursions  and  excursions  because  of  the  number  and  po-
tential seriousness of these events. 

Improper  or  misunderstood  instructions,  human  error,  continues 
to place aircraft vehicles and their passengers in danger despite on-
going  improvements.  As  an  example  of  human  error,  the  world’s 
deadliest  runway  incursion,  which  remains  the  world’s  deadliest 
aviation  accident,  occurred  in  March  1977,  and  583  lives  were  lost 
in  a  collision  between  two  jumbo  jets  on  a  runway  at  Tenerife  in 
the Canary Islands. Human error. 

Since  October  1,  2007,  all  surface  incidents  are  being  classified 
as  runway  incursions.  From  January  2007  through  March  31st  of 
2008,  441  runway  incursions  were  reported.  More  importantly, 
since October of 2007, there have been 15 A or B categorized incur-
sions,  which  are  the  most  serious.  This  is  more  than  double  the 
amount during the same time last year. 

In  July  2000,  the  Safety  Board  made  recommendations  to  ad-
dress the issue of providing direct warning to flight crews. This di-
rect  warning  is  crucial  because  it  gives  both  flight  crews  and  con-
trollers increased time to react. Until a system is in place that pro-
vides  direct  warning  to  pilots,  the  potential  for  this  type  of  a  dis-
aster will continue to be high. 

Since  2005,  the  FAA  has  been  conducting  field  tests  on  Runway 
Status Lights at the Dallas-Fort Worth and San Diego airports. Ini-
tial  test  results  have  been  promising  and  the  FAA  is  extending 
these  tests  to  more  complex  airports  such  as  Boston,  Chicago 
O’Hare, and Los Angeles International. 

The  FAA’s  NPRM  on  Automatic  Dependent  Surveillance  Broad-
casts, better known as ADS–B, published in 2007 mandates all air-
craft  be  equipped  with  ADS–B  Out  although  not  until  the  year 
2020.  Moreover,  the  FAA  does  not  plan  to  mandate  ADS–B  In  at 
all. For ADS–B to provide the maximum safety benefit, the system 
should  support  both  ADS–B  Out  and  ADS–B  In.  ADS–B  In  pro-
vides  surface  conflict  warnings  directly  to  pilots  in  the  cockpit 
while ADS–B Out provides basic aircraft separation information. 

The  Safety  Board  is  encouraged  by  the  FAA’s  progress  in  areas 
such as lighting and improved signage at airports. However, imple-
mentation of other technologies has been slow. 

In  2000,  the  Safety  Board  recommended  that  all  runway  cross-
ings be authorized only by specific air traffic control clearance and 
that  controllers  issue  a  takeoff  clearance  only  after  the  previous 
runway has been crossed. Yet, the FAA has not implemented either 
procedural  change.  If  those  procedures  had  been  implemented,  the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

27 

Comair  accident  in  Lexington,  Kentucky,  which  claimed  49  lives, 
may not have occurred. 

The  Safety  Board  also  investigated  several  runway  excursions, 
including an accident involving a Southwest Boeing 737 that killed 
one person at Chicago’s Midway Airport in 2005. 

The  Safety  Board  has  been  focusing  on  FAA  oversight  and  sur-
veillance  of  operators  and  aircraft  maintenance  for  over  20  years. 
For  example,  in  the  Alaska  Airlines  Flight  261  accident  off  the 
coast of California with 88 fatalities, FAA oversight of the carrier’s 
maintenance program was an issue. 

In the Chalk’s Ocean Airways Flight 101 accident in Miami Flor-
ida,  with  20  fatalities,  FAA  oversight  of  the  carrier’s  maintenance 
program was an issue. 

Additionally,  American  Airlines  Flight  1420  accident  in  Little 
Rock,  Arkansas,  which  claimed  11  fatalities,  is  an  example  of  an 
issue with operations oversight. 

The  Safety  Board  has  examined  FAA  oversight  during  all  of  its 
accident  investigations.  For  instance,  in  the  past  10  years,  the 
Board  has  issued  29  recommendations  on  maintenance  activities 
alone. 

That  concludes  my  testimony.  Thank  you  for  the  opportunity.  I 

would be happy to answer any questions you may have. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Chealander follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. STEVEN R. CHEALANDER, MEMBER, 

NATIONAL TRANSPORTATION SAFETY BOARD 

Good morning, Chairman Rockefeller and Ranking Member Hutchison. Thank you 
for  allowing  me  the  opportunity  to  present  testimony  on  behalf  of  the  National 
Transportation  Safety  Board.  I  am  privileged  to  represent  an  agency  that  is  dedi-
cated to the safety of the traveling public. 

As  you  know,  the  Safety  Board  is  charged  with  investigating  aviation  incidents 
and  accidents,  determining  their  probable  cause,  and  making  recommendations  to 
prevent  similar  accidents  from  happening  again.  The  Board  is  concerned  about  key 
safety issues including: runway incursions, runway excursions, icing conditions, fuel 
tank inerting, human fatigue, and maintenance of aircraft. 

The world’s deadliest runway incursion accident, which remains the world’s dead-
liest  aviation  accident,  occurred  in  March  1977  when  two  passenger  jumbo  jets  col-
lided on a runway at Tenerife, Canary Islands, causing the deaths of 583 passengers 
and  crew.  The  deadliest  U.S.  runway  incursion  accident  involving  two  aircraft  was 
a  collision  between  a  USAir  737  and  a  Skywest  Metroliner  commuter  airplane  at 
Los  Angeles  International  Airport  (LAX)  in  February  1991,  which  killed  34  people. 
Another  accident,  involving  a  Comair  Bombardier  CL600  that  departed  the  wrong 
runway  on  August  27,  2006,  killed  49  people  in  Lexington,  Kentucky.  The  Safety 
Board has also investigated several other runway excursions including the accident 
involving  a  Southwest  Boeing  737  that  killed  one  person  at  Chicago’s  Midway  Air-
port. 
Runway Incursions 

On October 1, 2007, the Federal Aviation Administration (FAA) adopted the Inter-
national  Civil  Aviation  Organization’s  definition  of  runway  incursion.  Prior  to  that 
date,  the  FAA  classified  events  that  did  not  result  in  a  loss  of  required  separation 
as  ‘‘surface  incidents,’’  not  incursions.  Incursions  required  a  loss  of  separation  with 
another aircraft, person, object, or vehicle. Since October 1, however, all surface inci-
dents are now classified as runway incursions and are categorized based on the se-
verity of the incident. Category A and B incursions represent the highest likelihood 
of  a  collision.  From  January  2007  through  March  31,  2008,  441  runway  incursions 
were  reported,  with  15  of  those  classified  as  a  category  A  or  B.  That’s  more  than 
twice as many as were reported during the same time last year (7). 

Between May and October 2007, the Safety Board investigated seven serious run-
way incursions involving 792 people onboard those airplanes. Most notably, in May 
2007,  there  was  a  runway  incursion  that  occurred  about  1:30  in  the  afternoon  at 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

28 

San Francisco International Airport involving a Republic Airlines Embraer 170 and 
a Skywest Embraer 120 Brazilia. These two aircraft, carrying 92 people, nearly col-
lided in the intersection of runways 1 left (L) and 28 right (R). The tower controller 
forgot about Skywest when he cleared Republic for takeoff from an intersecting run-
way. Skywest came to a stop in the runway intersection and Republic lifted off and 
overflew  Skywest  by  about  35  feet.  Another  incident  occurred  on  July  11,  2007  at 
about 2:30 in the afternoon when a United Airbus A320 and a Delta Airlines Boeing 
757 almost collided in the intersection of runway 9L and taxiway M at the Fort Lau-
derdale-Hollywood  Airport,  Florida.  Delta  was  inbound  for  landing  on  runway  9L 
and United was taxiing for departure on the same runway. The United crew missed 
a turn, and was heading toward the runway when the tower controllers told United 
to stop and Delta to go around. Although Delta touched down briefly, the crew was 
able to initiate a go-around and a collision was averted by less than 100 feet. Alert 
controllers and quick actions by the crews saved 307 people from a catastrophic acci-
dent. Incursions occur because both pilots and controllers make mistakes. Improper 
or  misunderstood  instructions  continue  to  place  aircraft,  vehicles,  and  their  pas-
sengers  in  danger—despite  improved  signage,  more  visible  painted  runway  mark-
ings,  ongoing  safety  briefings  and  seminars  for  controllers  and  pilots,  and  informa-
tional  brochures.  The  reason  is  simple  and  complex—human  error.  Pilots  may  mis-
understand  a  clearance  or  read  it  back  incorrectly  and  controllers  fail  to  catch  the 
error.  Pilots  may  take  a  wrong  turn  when  they  are  taxiing.  Controllers  may  clear 
an aircraft to take off or land on a runway already occupied by a vehicle or another 
aircraft. 

There  isn’t  any  one  single  solution  that  will  eliminate  the  problem  of  runway  in-
cursions. In July 2000, the Safety Board made recommendations to attack the issue 
in  a  variety  of  ways,  including  procedural  changes,  educational  efforts,  and  tech-
nology  improvements  that  provide  a  direct  warning  to  the  flight  crews.  This  direct 
warning is crucial because it gives both controllers and those operating the aircraft 
increased time to react. Information needs to be provided directly to the flight crews 
as  expeditiously  as  possible  to  prevent  runway  accidents.  The  issue  is  one  of  reac-
tion  time.  Safety  Board  investigations  have  found  that  AMASS/ASDE–X  are  not 
adequate to prevent serious runway collisions, because too much time is lost routing 
valuable  information  through  air  traffic  control.  After  an  alert,  the  controller  must 
determine  the  nature  of  the  problem,  determine  the  location,  identify  the  aircraft 
involved, and determine what action to take. Only after all of these determinations 
have been made can appropriate warnings or instructions be issued. The flight crew 
must then respond to the situation and take action. Simulations of AMASS perform-
ance  using  data  from  actual  incursions  show  that  alerts  may  occur  as  little  as  8  to 
11 seconds before a potential collision. In recent incidents, AMASS did not alert con-
trollers  in  time  to  be  effective,  and  the  situations  were  instead  resolved  by  flight 
crew-initiated actions. An example of this was the San Francisco accident previously 
mentioned. Until there is a system in place to control ground movements of all air-
craft  with  direct  warning  to  pilots,  the  potential  for  this  type  of  disaster  will  con-
tinue to be high. 

Since  2005,  the  FAA  has  been  conducting  field  tests  of  Runway  Status  Lights  at 
the  Dallas/Fort  Worth  International  Airport  and  San  Diego  International  Airport 
since  2006.  Red  lights  activated  on  the  runway  when  an  aircraft  was  taking  off, 
landing,  or  crossing  an  active  runway  giving  information  directly  to  the  pilots.  Ini-
tial  test  results  have  been  promising  and  the  FAA  is  extending  those  tests  to  more 
complex airports such as Boston, Chicago O’Hare and Los Angeles International Air-
ports.  The  FAA  is  also  testing  final  approach  runway  occupancy  signals  that  alert 
pilots  on  final  approach  when  the  runway  is  occupied.  It  is  also  reviewing  a  flight 
deck-based direct warning system. The Safety Board has provided favorable assess-
ments of that technology. 

Although the Board has been encouraged by the recent progress, it has been over 
7  years  since  these  recommendations  were  issued.  Yet  it  has  been  only  in  the  past 
few  years  that  the  FAA  has  started  evaluating  technologies  that  provide  direct 
warnings  to  the  cockpit.  Further,  while  these  technologies  may  offer  added  safety, 
they are many years away from possible national implementation. 

Additionally,  since  2007,  the  FAA  has  stated  that  ADS–B  (Automatic  Dependent 
Surveillance-Broadcast)  would  mitigate  the  number  and  severity  of  runway  incur-
sions.  On  September  9,  2005,  the  FAA  officially  committed  to  establishing  ADS–B 
as  the  basis  for  air  traffic  control  in  the  future.  On  October  5,  2007,  the  FAA  pub-
lished a Notice of Proposed Rulemaking (NPRM) that proposed performance require-
ments for certain avionics equipment on aircraft to facilitate the use of ADS–B. Ac-
cording  to  the  NPRM,  ADS–B  will  be  available  nationwide  in  2013  for  aircraft  sur-
veillance  by  FAA  and  Department  of  Defense  air  traffic  controllers.  ADS–B  will  be 
very  beneficial  for  expanding  surveillance  coverage  to  areas  of  the  United  States 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

29 

that are not covered now, such as the Gulf of Mexico, Hawaii, and Alaska. However, 
in order for ADS–B to provide maximum safety benefits, the system should support 
both ADS–B Out and ADS–B In. ADS–B Out provides basic aircraft information (lo-
cation,  altitude,  etc.)  to  air  traffic  controllers  in  order  to  provide  traffic  separation. 
ADS–B  In  would  permit  users  to  use  additional  services  such  as  obtaining 
datalinked  weather  and  traffic  information,  and  would  also  provide  a  means  of 
transmitting  surface  conflict  warnings  directly  to  pilots  via  the  ADS–B  In  commu-
nications  link.  However,  the  NPRM  states  that  aircraft  are  not  required  to  be 
equipped  with  ADS–B  Out  until  2020  and  the  FAA  will  not  mandate  ADS–B  In  at 
this  time  because,  according  to  the  NPRM,  it  ‘‘has  not  been  identified  as  a  require-
ment  for  maintaining  the  safety  and  efficiency  of  National  Airspace  System  (NAS) 
operations.’’  The  NPRM  further  states  that  operators  may  equip  their  aircraft  with 
ADS–B In ‘‘if they so choose.’’ 

The  Safety  Board  is  disappointed  that  this  NPRM  does  not  require  ADS–B  In 
which  would  be  instrumental  in  providing  additional  safety  information  that  would 
prevent incidents such as runway incursions. All of the runway incursion prevention 
technology being developed and tested by the FAA that would give a direct warning 
to the cockpit, such as Runway Status Lights and the final approach occupancy sig-
nal, and ADS–B are years from being installed and they will not be installed at all 
airports with passenger service. The Safety Board believes that the ability of ADS– 
B In to support data sharing between aircraft and controllers would be a major con-
tributor  to  improved  situational  awareness  and  would  reduce  the  likelihood  of  both 
airborne and surface conflicts. 
Actions Remaining 

The  FAA  has  made  progress  with  lighting  and  improved  signage  at  airports,  but 
some basic improvements in air traffic control procedures are needed. In July 2000, 
the Safety Board recommended that all runway crossings be authorized only by spe-
cific  air  traffic  control  clearance  and  that  controllers  issue  a  takeoff  clearance  only 
after the previous runway has been crossed. Both of those recommendations are con-
tained  in  the  Manual  on  the  Prevention  of  Runway  Incursions  prepared  by  the 
International  Civil  Aviation  Authority  and  is  the  guidance  material  used  inter-
nationally for implementing national or local runway safety programs. Yet, the FAA 
has not implemented either procedural change. If those procedures had been imple-
mented, the Comair accident in Lexington, Kentucky may not have occurred. 

The  Safety  Board  supports  the  use  of  ADS–B  and  believes  that  ADS–B  Out  will 
provide a safety benefit in the NAS in areas without sufficient radar coverage. How-
ever,  the  adoption  of  ADS–B  In,  direct  delivery  of  warnings  to  aircraft  pilots  via 
datalink, and recommended procedural changes will increase the level of safety dur-
ing ground operations and should be expeditiously incorporated in the FAA’s devel-
opment planning. 
Runway Excursions 

Recent  accidents,  such  as  the  December  2005  Southwest  Airlines  runway  excur-
sion at Midway Airport, indicated that the Safety Board should broaden its runway 
safety efforts to include runway excursions. Over the last 10 years, 73 accidents in-
volving turbine-engined aircraft were reported resulting in 15 fatalities. Runway ex-
cursions only need to be reported to the Safety Board if there was substantial dam-
age  to  the  airplane,  serious  injury  to  a  person,  or  if  an  emergency  evacuation  was 
required,  so  there  are  most  likely  additional  excursions  during  this  period  that  we 
are not aware of. 

Landing distance calculations are critical to flight safety, especially when runway 
conditions  limit  braking  effectiveness.  As  a  result  of  the  Southwest  Airlines  acci-
dent, the Safety Board issued an urgent recommendation on January 27, 2006, ask-
ing  the  FAA  to  prohibit  operators  from  using  reverse  thrust  credit  in  landing  per-
formance  calculations  to  ensure  adequate  landing  safety  margins  on  contaminated 
runways.  The  FAA  responded  that  it  would  issue  an  Operations  Specification  that 
would  establish  mandatory  actions  by  aircraft  operators  and  meet  the  intent  of  the 
recommendation;  however,  it  subsequently  decided  to  issue  only  a  Safety  Alert  For 
Operators (SAFO). SAFOs are not regulatory and compliance is therefore voluntary. 
On  October  4,  2007,  the  Safety  Board  superceded  the  previous  urgent  rec-
ommendation, issuing a new recommendation asking that the FAA require crews to 
make a landing distance assessment with an adequate safety margin for every land-
ing. To date the FAA has not made this a requirement. 

In  the  U.S.  during  the  last  2  years,  there  were  five  runway  excursion  accidents 
involving  turbine-powered  aircraft,  resulting  in  one  fatality.  However,  these  events 
involved  247  other  crewmembers,  passengers,  or  people  on  the  ground  who  hap-
pened  to  be  in  the  area  when  the  excursions  occurred.  The  NAS  cannot  continue 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

30 

to depend on the last minute alertness of pilots and controllers, whose actions have 
helped  avoid  several  runway  incidents  that  could  have  been  catastrophic.  We  need 
the  extra  protection  of  additional  procedures  and  advanced  technology  to  com-
pensate for human mistakes. 
Action Remaining 

• Require  operators  to  conduct  arrival  landing  distance  assessments  before  every 
landing  based  on  existing  performance  data,  actual  conditions,  and  incor-
porating a minimum safety margin of fifteen percent. 

Reduce Dangers to Aircraft Flying in Icing Conditions 

The  1994,  in-flight  icing  encounter  and  subsequent  loss  of  control  and  crash  of  a 
commuter airliner in Roselawn, Indiana, which claimed 68 lives, prompted the Safe-
ty  Board  to  examine  the  issue  of  airframe  structural  icing  and  conclude  that  the 
icing certification process has been inadequate because the process has not required 
manufacturers to demonstrate the airplane’s flight handling and stall characteristics 
under  a  realistic  range  of  adverse  ice  accretion/flight-handling  conditions.  The  FAA 
did  not  have  a  systematic  and  proactive  approach  to  the  certification  and  oper-
ational issues of turbine-engine-driven transport-category airplane icing. 

The consequences of operating an airplane in icing conditions without first having 
thoroughly  demonstrated  adequate  handling/controllability  characteristics  in  those 
conditions are sufficiently severe that they warrant a thorough certification test pro-
gram,  including  application  of  revised  standards  to  airplanes  currently  certificated 
for flight in icing conditions. 

As a result of the Roselawn accident, the Safety Board called on the FAA to revise 
the  icing  criteria  and  icing  testing  requirements  necessary  for  an  airplane  design 
to  be  approved  within  the  United  States,  and  the  operational  requirements  that 
specify under what icing conditions it is permissible to operate an aircraft. 

On  July  25,  2007,  the  FAA  issued  a  final  rule  titled  ‘‘Airplane  Performance  and 
Handling Qualities in Icing Conditions,’’ which became effective October 9, 2007. On 
September  10,  2007,  the  FAA  issued  Advisory  Circular  (AC)  25–25,  ‘‘Performance 
and Handling Characteristics in the Icing Conditions Specified in Part 25, Appendix 
C.’’  The  AC  provides  detailed  guidance  on  acceptable  means  of  compliance  with  the 
new  requirements.  These  actions  were  responsive  to  some  aspects  of  the  rec-
ommendations  from  the  Roselawn  accident.  The  FAA  still  needs  to  take  the  fol-
lowing actions: 

• Revise  Part  121,  applicable  to  airplanes  with  takeoff  weights  less  than  60,000 
pounds,  to  address  when  to  activate  the  ice  protection  system  and  when  the 
flight crew should exit icing conditions. 
• Develop  Part  25  rules  that  include  requirements  to  demonstrate  that  an  air-
plane can safely operate in certain super-cooled large drop (SLD) conditions for 
an unrestricted time or can detect SLD and enable the flight crew to exit icing 
conditions; and 
• Development  of  similar  Part  23  rules  after  completing  the  Part  25  rulemaking. 
The  ARAC  is  still  working  on  regulations  concerning  SLD  and  mixed-phase  icing 
for  both  Part  25  and  Part  23.  The  Safety  Board  has  learned  of  FAA  activities  in 
response to recommendations concerning icing issued as a result of the February 16, 
2005, crash of a Cessna Citation 560 during approach to landing in icing conditions 
at Pueblo, Colorado. This accident occurred in SLD conditions, and FAA and Cessna 
flight  testing  in  response  to  the  investigation  used  procedures  and  tests  suggested 
by  the  ARAC  to  analyze  airplane  handling  characteristics  in  SLD  conditions.  This 
suggests  that  the  FAA  may  be  near  developing  and  issuing  regulations  concerning 
SLD.  However,  the  FAA  has  not  provided  any  projected  dates  for  development  and 
issuance  of  an  NPRM  and  final  rule.  The  pace  of  the  FAA’s  activities  in  response 
to  these  recommendations  remains  unacceptably  slow,  despite  recent  encouraging 
action. 
Actions Remaining 

• Complete  efforts  to  revise  icing  certification  criteria,  testing  requirements,  and 
• Evaluate all aircraft certified for flight in icing conditions using the new criteria 

restrictions on operations in icing conditions; and 

and standards. 

Eliminate Flammable Fuel/Air Vapors in Fuel Tanks on Transport-category Aircraft 
Center wing fuel tank explosions have resulted in 346 fatalities. Operating trans-
port-category  airplanes  with  flammable  fuel/air  vapors  in  fuel  tanks  presents  an 
avoidable  risk  of  explosion.  A  fuel  tank  design  and  certification  philosophy  that  re-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

31 

lies  solely  on  the  elimination  of  all  ignition  sources,  while  accepting  the  existence 
of  fuel  tank  flammability,  is  fundamentally  flawed  because  experience  has  dem-
onstrated  that  all  possible  ignition  sources  cannot  be  predicted  and  reliably  elimi-
nated.  As  a  result  of  the  TWA  Flight  800  accident  that  occurred  in  July  1996,  the 
Safety  Board  asked  the  FAA  to  develop  and  implement  both  long-term  and  short- 
term  solutions  to  the  fuel  tank  issue.  Previously,  fuel  tank  explosions  occurred 
somewhere  in  the  world  approximately  once  every  52  months,  but  two  explosions 
in  the  last  3  years  have  changed  the  average  for  the  worse.  In  the  10  years  since 
the TWA flight 800 accident, there have been three additional fuel tank explosions, 
illustrating the continuing need for reforms in this area. 

In response to the long-term solution preventing flammable fuel/air vapors in fuel 
tanks  the  FAA  commissioned  the  ARAC  to  evaluate  design  modifications,  such  as 
inerting,  that  would  satisfy  this  recommendation.  In  its  July  1998  final  report,  the 
ARAC concluded that inerting would achieve this goal, but at a cost of over $20 bil-
lion.  The  ARAC  also  concluded  that  inerting  systems  would  be  very  difficult  to  ret-
rofit into existing airplanes and recommended that the FAA continue to investigate 
a more cost-effective approach to reducing explosive vapors. A 2001 follow up study 
also  concluded  that  the  benefit  of  inerting  could  not  be  reasonably  balanced  by  its 
cost. In May 2002, in contrast to the ARAC’s reports, the FAA developed a prototype 
inerting  system  that  required  no  moving  parts,  weighed  less  than  200  pounds,  and 
could  be  retrofitted  into  existing  airplanes  at  a  fraction  of  the  industry-estimated 
cost:  the  cost  of  this  prototype  system  was  only  $100,000.  The  system  has  been 
flight  tested  by  the  FAA,  NASA,  Boeing,  and  Airbus,  and  the  results  indicate  that 
fuel tank inerting is both practical and effective. 

Although  11  years  have  passed  since  this  recommendation  was  issued,  the  FAA’s 
recent actions indicate positive movement, particularly in the development of a prac-
tical  fuel  tank  inerting  system.  Boeing  is  making  a  flammability  reduction  system 
a  basic  feature  in  the  design  of  the  new  787  Dreamliner  aircraft.  Boeing  has  also 
designed  a  flammability  reduction  system  and  delivered  these  systems  on  produc-
tion models of the 747 and 737 NG. Although the first B–737 equipped with a flam-
mability  reduction  system  was  delivered  on  December  8,  2005,  to  Southwest  Air-
lines,  this  system  is  an  option,  and  many  737’s  currently  being  delivered  are  not 
equipped with this system. The next design to receive a flammability reduction sys-
tem will be the B–777. 

The  FAA  has  developed  a  final  rule  to  do  some,  but  not  all,  of  what  the  Safety 
Board has recommended. The proposed final rule is somewhat controversial and re-
ceived  close  scrutiny  from  OST  and  OMB.  The  latest  word  is  that  OMB’s  review  of 
the final rule will be completed by May 2008. 
Action Remaining 

• Complete rulemaking efforts to preclude the operation of transport-category air-

planes with flammable fuel/air vapors in the fuel tank on all aircraft. 

Cockpit and Flight Data Recorders/Require Cockpit Video Recorders 

Flight  recorders  have  proven  themselves  invaluable  in  providing  crucial  informa-
tion during accident and incident investigations. Last month, the FAA issued a final 
rule,  titled  ‘‘Revisions  to  Cockpit  Voice  Recorder  and  Digital  flight  Data  Recorder 
Regulations.’’  The  Board  was  pleased  to  see  that  all  larger  passenger  airliners  will 
be  required  to  carry  2-hour  cockpit  voice  recorders  (CVRs),  greatly  expanding  the 
current  30-minute  requirement.  But  the  rule  stopped  short  of  what  the  Board  has 
recommended  by  not  requiring  that  older  30-minute  CVRs  be  replaced  on  existing 
commuter and corporate jet aircraft. The FAA did require that newly manufactured 
commuter and corporate jets come equipped with 2-hour CVRs. 

The Board had asked that airliners be retrofitted with cockpit voice recorders that 
had an emergency 10-minute power supply in case of an electrical interruption, such 
as  occurred  on  ValuJet  Flight  592  in  1996  and  Swiss  Air  Flight  111  in  1999.  The 
FAA  rule  will  require  that  newly  manufactured  airliners  be  so  equipped,  but  de-
clined  to  require  retrofits  again  as  recommended  by  the  Board.  The  Board  also 
called  for  certain  configurations  of  microphones  and  dedicated  channels  in  airliner 
cockpits,  and  for  dual  combination  recorders,  one  in  the  front  and  one  in  the  back 
of the plane, however those items are not addressed in the new rule. The FAA also 
did not address the Board’s recommendations concerning cockpit video recorders. 

The  new  rule  calls  for  increased  flight  control  position  sampling  rates  on  flight 
recorders,  which  should  improve  the  quality  of  data  available  to  investigators.  Im-
provements  in  flight  recorders  has  been  on  the  Board’s  list  of  Most  Wanted  Safety 
Improvements since 1999. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

32 

Reduce Accidents and Incidents Caused by Human Fatigue 

The  Safety  Board  has  long  been  concerned  about  the  issue  of  operator  fatigue  in 
transportation and has stressed its concerns in investigation reports issued through-
out  the  1970s  and  1980s.  In  1989,  the  Board  issued  three  recommendations  to  the 
Secretary of Transportation calling for research, education, and revisions to existing 
regulations. These recommendations were added to the Board’s Most Wanted list in 
1990,  and  the  issue  of  fatigue  has  remained  on  the  Most  Wanted  list  since  then. 
The Safety Board’s 1999 safety study of DOT efforts to address operator fatigue con-
tinued  to  show  that  this  problem  was  widespread.  Operating  a  vehicle  without  the 
operator’s  having  adequate  rest,  in  any  mode  of  transportation,  presents  an  unnec-
essary  risk  to  the  traveling  public.  The  laws,  rules,  and  regulations  governing  this 
aspect  of  transportation  safety  are  archaic  in  many  cases  and  are  not  adequate  to 
address the problem. 
Flight Crews 

In December 1995, the FAA issued an NPRM to update the flight and duty regu-
lations for airline pilots; however, in the intervening 12 years, the regulations have 
not  been  revised.  The  FAA  has  attempted  on  three  occasions  to  reach  consensus 
with  the  industry  on  a  proposed  rule  but  has  not  succeeded.  FAA’s  ARAC  upon  re-
viewing  Part  135  regulations  has  recently  made  some  recommendations  to  simplify 
and  improve  the  duty  time  regulations  for  flight  crews  covered  by  Part  135.  The 
FAA  recently  advised  the  Safety  Board  that  it  is  developing  an  NPRM  that  incor-
porates  the  ARAC’s  recommendations;  the  NPRM  will  include  a  fatigue  risk  man-
agement system that provides an alternative to prescriptive limitations. 

The Safety Board recommended 14 years ago that the FAA close a loophole in the 
regulations regarding hours of duty for flight crews that allowed crews to be on duty 
flying for much longer periods of time than allowed under Part 121 or Part 135. The 
1995  NPRM  proposed  revisions  that  were  responsive,  however,  those  revisions  re-
sulted  in  considerable  controversy  and  the  FAA  withdrew  the  NPRM.  The  Safety 
Board’s  concern  that  flight  crew  fatigue  is  a  significant  aviation  safety  issue  con-
tinues  today,  yet  little  or  no  action  has  been  taken  by  the  FAA  and  they  have  not 
indicated any firm plans to take the recommended action. 
Maintenance Personnel 

In  1999,  the  FAA  issued  a  report  entitled  Study  of  Fatigue  Factors  Affecting 
Human  Performance  in  Aviation  Maintenance.  The  FAA  completed  the  first  phase 
of the expanded study and issued a report in April 2000 entitled Evaluation of Avia-
tion  Maintenance  Working  Environments,  Fatigue,  and  Maintenance  Errors/Acci-
dents.  The  expanded  study  looked  at  multiple  and  combined  environmental  factors 
of temperature, noise, light, vibration, and sleep, which are known to accelerate fa-
tigue onset, as well as the effects of lifestyle habits on fatigue and human perform-
ance. The study was designed to collect data in the aviation maintenance work envi-
ronment  on  known  factors  that  affect  human  fatigue  and  performance.  The  data 
were  intended  for  use  in  predicting  situations  that  are  conducive  to  fatigue,  acci-
dents, incidents and errors. 

The  FAA’s  findings  suggest  that  fatigue  is  an  issue  in  this  workforce.  Data  from 
‘‘mini-logger  monitors’’  that  recorded  data  from  the  selected  parameters  of  light, 
noise  levels,  and  temperature;  activity  monitors  that  monitored  physical  activity, 
sleep,  and  sleep  quality;  and  the  answers  to  background  questions  that  employees 
were  asked  clearly  indicate  that  sleep  durations  are  inadequate  to  prevent  fatigue. 
For most aviation maintenance technician specialties, 30–40 percent of respondents 
reported  sleep  durations  of  less  than  6  hours,  and  25  percent  of  respondents  re-
ported feeling fatigued or exhausted. 

The  DOT  stated  that  the  findings  of  its  studies  indicate  that  the  extreme  com-
plexity of the issue of maintenance crew fatigue and duty time do not present appro-
priate  material  for  regulatory  activity,  and  education  and  training  in  fatigue  man-
agement  are  the  most  appropriate  actions  for  the  FAA  to  sponsor  and  foster.  The 
FAA  has  consequently  conducted  education  and  training  activities  on  fatigue  man-
agement  for  aircraft  maintenance  personnel.  The  Safety  Board  reviewed  Advisory 
Circular (AC) 120–72, ‘‘Maintenance Resource Management (MRM) Training,’’ which 
seems  to  be  the  primary  focus  of  the  FAA’s  education  and  training  initiatives  re-
lated  to  fatigue  among  aviation  maintenance  crews.  We  found  little  in  AC  120–72 
that provides guidance on human fatigue in maintenance crews other than general-
ized  warnings  that  attention  to  fatigue  is  important  and  should  be  considered  in 
MRM  Training.  AC  120–72  contains  little  guidance  as  to  how  an  employer  should 
design  a  program  to  ensure  that  maintenance  crews  are  not  fatigued.  In  addition, 
the website referenced in the reports to Congress (http://hfskyway.faa.gov) is in fact 
nothing more than a single page with a very general description of the FAA’s avia-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

33 

tion  maintenance  human  factors  research  program.  It  contains  no  useful  informa-
tion  to  educate  and  train  someone  in  the  aviation  community  on  the  issues  of  fa-
tigue management in aircraft maintenance personnel. 

The  Safety  Board  disagrees  that  regulating  hours  of  service  for  aviation  mainte-
nance  crews  is  not  appropriate.  In  addition,  the  Board’s  reviews  of  the  FAA’s  edu-
cation  activities  related  to  reducing  fatigue  among  maintenance  crews  shows  them 
to be limited and of questionable value. 
Air Traffic Controllers 

In  2007,  the  Safety  Board  issued  recommendations  to  the  FAA  and  the  National 
Air Traffic Controllers Association regarding air traffic controller fatigue. The Safety 
Board  had  investigated  four  incidents  that  provided  clear  and  compelling  evidence 
that controllers are sometimes operating in a state of fatigue because of their work 
schedules and poorly managed utilization of rest periods between shifts and that fa-
tigue has contributed to controller errors. Controller fatigue decreases aviation safe-
ty.  FAA  policies  and  controllers’  off-duty  habits  can  contribute  to  the  problem.  Al-
though  the  FAA  and  other  organizations  have  conducted  a  great  deal  of  research 
on  this  issue  resulting  in  an  improved  scientific  understanding  of  the  causes  of  fa-
tigue, its effects on controller performance, and strategies for reducing controller fa-
tigue, the FAA has been slow to change controller-scheduling practices. 

The  FAA  has  convened  a  working  group  to  develop  shift  rotation  and  scheduling 
guidelines,  and  it  is  our  understanding  that  last  month  the  National  Air  Traffic 
Controllers  Association  (NATCA)  provided  information  on  fatigue  and  scheduling 
practices.  The  FAA  plans  to  develop  and  implement  a  fatigue  awareness  and  coun-
termeasures training program to be used by all FAA Air Traffic Organization oper-
ational service units. NATCA has informed the FAA and the Safety Board of its ea-
gerness  to  participate  in  this  group,  and  indicated  its  commitment  to  developing 
workable  scheduling  practices  that  minimize  controller  impairment  due  to  fatigue. 
Action Remaining 

• Issue regulations that establish scientifically based duty time limitations for air 

carrier maintenance personnel and flightcrews. 

• Develop a fatigue awareness and countermeasures training program for control-

lers and those who schedule them for duty. 

Maintenance Oversight 

In the course of Safety Board investigations—particularly those involving air car-
rier  operations—Board  investigators  routinely  examine  issues  related  to  regulatory 
oversight; policy and procedures; certification; and inspection and enforcement. Safe-
ty Board investigation reports typically include a characterization of regulatory poli-
cies  and  oversight  as  they  relate  to  the  circumstances  of  the  accident  or  incident 
investigated.  In  some  cases,  deficiencies  are  identified  in  FAA  regulation  or  over-
sight.  In  other  cases,  Safety  Board  investigations  have  identified  local  deficiencies 
in the actions of personnel responsible for enacting FAA policy. In those cases when 
the identified deficiencies were determined to have contributed to the circumstances 
in  an  accident  or  incident,  the  Safety  Board  has  cited  the  FAA  or  FAA  personnel 
as  part  of  the  probable  cause  of  the  accident.  Therefore,  a  summary  of  the  Safety 
Board’s  historic  assessment  of  FAA  oversight  requires  a  review  of  the  Board’s  find-
ings of probable cause as well as the discussions of FAA policy and effectiveness in 
the text of Board reports. 

The Safety Board records its findings of probable cause for aviation investigations 
in its aviation accident and incident database. Database records include the Board’s 
probable  cause  statement  in  its  original  narrative  form  as  well  as  a  categorically 
coding  of  the  causal  findings.  Attached  is  a  summary  of  records  from  the  Safety 
Board’s  aviation  accident  database  in  which  the  FAA  or  FAA  personnel  have  been 
cited with regard to oversight functions. [not printed] Included in the summary are 
cases from 1983 to the present in which the Board cited FAA oversight or functions 
associated with oversight of operators and aircraft maintenance. Excluded from this 
attachment are cases in which FAA functions not directly related to oversight, such 
as air traffic services. 

That  concludes  my  testimony  and  I  would  be  happy  to  answer  any  questions  you 

may have. 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. Thank you. 
Mr. Brantley? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

STATEMENT OF TOM BRANTLEY, PRESIDENT, PROFESSIONAL 

AVIATION SAFETY SPECIALISTS, AFL–CIO 

34 

Mr.  BRANTLEY.  Good  morning,  Chairman  Rockefeller,  Senator 
Hutchison,  and  members  of  the  Subcommittee,  and  thank  you  for 
inviting PASS to testify today on FAA’s aviation safety program. 

The  recent  incident  involving  Southwest  Airlines  has  drawn  at-
tention to the FAA’s current inability to provide adequate oversight 
of  the  airlines.  The  slew  of  aircraft  groundings  indicate  that  there 
are  problems  within  the  system  that  are  not  being  addressed. 
PASS  is  extremely  concerned  that  the  agency  has  become  so  fo-
cused  on  working  in  partnership  with  the  airlines  that  it  has  al-
lowed  its  safety  mission  to  become  a  lower  priority,  in  many  cases 
ignoring  warnings  from  its  own  workforce.  Because  of  the  agency’s 
internal pressure to collaborate with industry, inspectors are being 
forced to change inspection data in FAA databases, reprimanded or 
removed  from  oversight  responsibility  of  a  carrier,  and  encouraged 
not to pursue enforcement actions. 

PASS has also learned of cases in which FAA managers have al-
lowed airlines to misuse FAA safety programs. The Voluntary Dis-
closure  Reporting  Program,  VDRP,  encourages  airlines  to  self-dis-
close violations to avoid facing penalties. Inspectors report that the 
airlines are being allowed to self-disclose after an inspector has dis-
covered  a  problem.  In  some  cases,  inspectors  are  being  ordered  by 
managers  to  hold  off  on  an  action  to  allow  the  airline  to  self-dis-
close.  While  self-disclosure  can  work,  the  deterrent  is  eliminated 
when the program is abused. 

PASS concurs with many of the IG’s recent recommendations re-
garding  the  program,  including  that  the  FAA  implement  a  sec-
ondary review of self-disclosures before they are accepted. 

The  customer  service  initiative,  CSI,  is  another  FAA  program 
that  is  being  misused.  CSI  gives  the  airlines  the  right  to  ask  for 
a review of an inspector’s decision. Again, the idea is valid, but the 
FAA is permitting air carriers to use the CSI to remove an inspec-
tor simply for doing his or her job. 

Guidance for the CSI actually directs the agency to treat the air-
lines as their customer. In PASS’s view, the FAA should be focused 
on  protecting  aviation  safety  and  treating  the  flying  public  as  its 
customer rather than satisfying the aviation industry. 

PASS  recommends  that  this  program  be  suspended  until  there 
can be an independent review of the program to ensure that it can 
be used properly and it can achieve its intended results. 

With  fewer  inspectors  out  in  the  field,  the  FAA  is  touting  ATOS 
as  an  effective  way  to  prioritize  the  workload  of  safety  inspectors 
based  on  risk.  Yet,  it  is  clear  from  the  evidence  over  the  last  few 
months  that  ATOS  data,  the  majority  of  which  is  provided  by  the 
airlines,  cannot  be  relied  upon  without  physical  verification.  In-
spectors  have  informed  PASS  that  the  fundamental  flaw  of  ATOS 
is  that  they  are  not  performing  enough  hands-on  surveillance.  In 
fact, where inspectors used to spend most of their time in the field, 
they  now  tell  us  they  are  spending  more  than  70  percent  of  their 
time at their desks. 

The  FAA’s  recent  actions  to  improve  the  inspection  program  do 
little  to  address  the  concerns  of  aviation  safety  inspectors.  It  is 
clear  to  PASS  that  if  those  charged  with  inspecting  the  safety  of 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

35 

the air carrier industry are not allowed to thoroughly examine and 
fully report potential safety issues, the FAA will fail in its mission 
of  maintaining  and  enhancing  aviation  safety.  It  is  time  this  be-
came clear to the agency, and it is time for the FAA to once again 
make safety its top priority. 

I feel strongly that the FAA must stop trying to portray the cur-
rent  crisis  as  an  isolated  incident  and  admit  that  a  systemic  prob-
lem  exists.  The  FAA  must  stop  relying  on  the  industry  to  police 
itself  and  resume  its  oversight  responsibilities.  Partnership  is  a 
fantastic  way  of  doing  business  as  long  as  the  FAA  does  not  lose 
sight  of  its  responsibilities.  I  think  they  can  work  with  the  indus-
try.  It  does  not  have  to  be  adversarial,  but  at  the  end  of  the  day, 
the  buck  has  to  stop  with  the  FAA.  And  right  now,  they  are  not 
even seeing the buck. 

That  concludes  my  comments,  and  I  look  forward  to  any  ques-

tions you may have. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Brantley follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF TOM BRANTLEY, PRESIDENT, 
PROFESSIONAL AVIATION SAFETY SPECIALISTS, AFL–CIO 

Chairman  Rockefeller,  Senator  Hutchison  and  members  of  the  Subcommittee, 
thank  you  for  inviting  PASS  to  testify  on  Federal  Aviation  Administration  (FAA) 
aviation  safety  oversight.  The  Professional  Aviation  Safety  Specialists,  AFL-CIO 
(PASS)  represents  11,000  FAA  employees,  including  approximately  2,900  Flight 
Standards  field  aviation  safety  inspectors  located  in  110  field  offices  in  the  United 
States  as  well  as  three  international  offices  in  Germany,  the  United  Kingdom  and 
Singapore.  FAA  safety  inspectors  are  responsible  for  certification,  education,  over-
sight, surveillance and enforcement of the entire aviation system, including air oper-
ator and air carrier certificates, repair station certificates, aircraft airworthiness, pi-
lots, mechanics, flight instructors and designees. 

A  recent  high-profile  incident  in  which  Southwest  Airlines  was  allowed  to  con-
tinue flying several planes despite being in violation of an FAA Airworthiness Direc-
tive  (AD)  has  drawn  significant  attention  to  the  FAA’s  ability  to  provide  aviation 
safety  oversight.  The  fact  that  FAA  employees  had  to  seek  help  outside  the  agency 
in  order  to  get  these  safety  concerns  addressed  is  an  unfortunate  indication  of  the 
overall culture at the agency. PASS and the FAA aviation safety inspector workforce 
we represent have serious concerns regarding the FAA’s ability to fully and properly 
oversee  aviation  safety.  Through  the  following  testimony,  PASS  will  outline  signifi-
cant challenges encountered by the inspector workforce, including the FAA’s over re-
liance  on  a  computer-based  system,  the  excessively  close  relationship  between  the 
FAA  and  airlines,  misuse  of  FAA  ‘‘partnership  programs,’’  oversight  of  outsourced 
maintenance, oversight of foreign repair stations and the critical need for increased 
inspector staffing. 
Air Transportation Oversight System (ATOS) 

The  Air  Transportation  Oversight  System  (ATOS)  was  developed  in  1998  as  a 
‘‘system  safety’’  approach  to  oversight  of  the  air  carrier  industry  aimed  at  ensuring 
airlines comply with FAA safety requirements to control risk and prevent accidents. 
The  creation  of  ATOS  was  a  direct  result  of  the  1996  ValuJet  accident,  in  which 
it was discovered that outsourced maintenance was a causal factor. In theory, ATOS 
allows  potential  problems  to  be  identified  before  they  result  in  an  incident  or  acci-
dent.  The  FAA’s  guidance  on  ATOS  requires  that  a  surveillance  plan  be  imple-
mented  for  each  airline  and  standardizes  the  inspection  and  certification  processes 
through automation tools. 

While prioritizing workload based on levels of risk and attempting to manage that 
workload  through  automated  tasks  are  valid  concepts,  there  are  several  problems 
with  ATOS  that  prevent  the  agency  from  benefiting  from  the  system.  Of  primary 
concern  is  the  fact  that  ATOS  is  limiting  a  vital  aspect  of  the  inspection  process: 
visual, hands-on inspections actually performed by an FAA inspector. PASS believes 
that  the  FAA  is  relying  too  heavily  on  a  data-driven  system,  due  in  part  to  the  di-
minishing  number  of  safety  inspectors.  In  other  words,  by  transitioning  to  ATOS 
without an adequate number of inspectors, the FAA is increasing its reliance on lim-
ited data rather than a combination of visual inspections and statistical analysis to 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

36 

catch  safety  problems.  Yet,  FAA  analysts  have  shared  with  PASS  that  they  do  not 
believe that there is enough statistical data to properly determine risk. 

Throughout  its  implementation,  several  industry  groups  and  government  bodies 
have  expressed  concern  about  ATOS.  In  2002  and  2005,  the  Department  of  Trans-
portation  Inspector  General  (IG)  identified  system-wide  problems  with  ATOS. 
Among  the  issues  discovered  included  lack  of  inspector  training  on  the  system,  in-
complete  inspections  in  recognized  risk  areas,  inadequate  data  and  not  placing  in-
spectors  where  they  were  most  needed.  The  IG  recommended  that  the  FAA 
strengthen  national  oversight  and  accountability  of  ATOS.  According  to  the  IG,  the 
FAA has yet to fully address these recommendations.1 

According  to  inspectors,  prior  to  ATOS,  they  developed  their  own  yearly  surveil-
lance  plan  with  the  ability  to  keep  it  fluid  in  order  to  address  daily  concerns  or 
changes as they developed. The inspector spent most of his or her time at the airline 
or  maintenance  facility,  meaning  more  surveillance  was  done  on  the  actual  oper-
ations  and  maintenance  performed.  Today,  inspectors  tell  us  that  the  fundamental 
flaw  of  ATOS  is  that  they  are  not  performing  enough  hands-on  surveillance.  With-
out  actual  visual  inspections,  inspectors  are  not  able  to  validate  the  data  provided 
by  the  airline  and  generate  new  data  to  input  into  the  system.  Moreover,  when  in-
spectors  perform  on-site  visits,  their  presence  alone  serves  as  a  deterrent.  Unfortu-
nately, the agency has restructured ATOS so there are fewer inspectors in the field 
and even eliminated the majority of remotely sited inspectors nationwide. Therefore, 
despite  the  increasing  use  of  regional  carriers  and  so  much  work  being  outsourced 
globally,  the  FAA  appears  focused  on  keeping  its  inspectors  in  a  few  central  loca-
tions rather than where the actual work is taking place. 

In  the  wake  of  Southwest  Airlines’  noncompliance  disclosure,  the  effectiveness  of 
ATOS  was  called  into  question  once  again.  Southwest  Airlines  is  an  ATOS  carrier 
and has been since the inception of ATOS in 1998. How effective is the FAA’s ATOS 
process  in  identifying  and  managing  risk  if  Southwest  Airlines  was  able  to  become 
so lax in its AD compliance? In fact, ATOS inspectors are supposed to examine air-
lines’  systems  every  5  years  to  ensure  compliance,  yet  Southwest’s  AD  system  had 
not  been  examined  since  1999.2 PASS  believes  that  one  of  the  main  reasons  ATOS 
is  not  working  as  intended  is  because  it  has  not  been  properly  resourced  and  sup-
ported by the FAA. It is a mistake for the FAA to rely on incomplete data, the ma-
jority  of  which  is  provided  by  the  airlines,  and  limited  visual  inspections  to  deter-
mine risk. 

With  attention  focused  on  AD  compliance,  the  FAA  issued  Notice  N8900.36  on 
March  13,  2008,  directing  a  two-phased  audit  of  Part  121  air  carrier  compliance 
with ADs in order to reassure the flying public that the Southwest incident was not 
a  system-wide  issue.  In  phase  1  of  the  audit,  which  was  due  March  28,  inspectors 
sampled  10  ADs  for  each  of  the  air  carriers’  fleets.  Phase  2  of  the  audit,  which  is 
due  June  30,  will  sample  additional  ADs  to  total  10  percent  of  the  ADs  applicable 
to  the  air  carriers’  fleets.  While  the  original  notice  instructed  inspectors  to  perform 
a  visual  inspection  of  the  aircraft  along  with  verification  of  records,  the  FAA  re-
leased  a  broadcast  message  that  FAA  inspectors  should  only  perform  a  records 
check due to the two-week time constraint for completion of Phase 1. In other words, 
the  aircraft  and/or  its  components  were  not  required  to  be  inspected.  On  April  2, 
the  FAA  released  results  from  the  first  phase  of  the  audits  claiming  a  99  percent 
rate of airline compliance with ADs. 

However, without FAA surveillance of an aircraft, the aircraft’s physical AD com-
pliance  status  is  unknown  despite  what  the  records  may  indicate.  While  the  FAA 
has  hailed  the  first  results  of  the  audit  as  an  indication  that  the  overall  program 
is  working,  PASS  has  serious  concerns  as  to  the  validity  of  any  results  collected 
through  this  directive  and  whether  a  records  check  on  so  small  a  sampling  of  air-
craft  data  will  render  meaningful  results  or  assurance  of  compliance.  Furthermore, 
PASS  has  learned  that  many  inspectors  were  told  to  perform  ‘‘easy’’  checks  during 
this  audit—items  that  would  not  require  a  considerable  amount  of  time  or  result 
in  many  problems.  One  inspector  told  PASS  that  the  airline  he  was  responsible  for 
checking  was  actually  warned  of  which  ADs  would  be  checked  a  full  5  days  before 
the FAA reviewed them. 

The  IG  recommendation  for  increased  national  oversight  of  ATOS,  including  a 
process to track field office inspections to ensure that they are conducted in a timely 
manner,3 is an important step forward in addressing some of the major issues that 

1 Department of Transportation Inspector General, Actions Needed to Strengthen FAA’s Safety 
Oversight  and  Use  of  Partnership  Programs,  CC–2008–046  (Washington,  D.C.:  April  3,  2008), 
pp. 3–4. 

2 Id., p. 13. 
3 Id., p. 16. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

37 

prevent the agency from benefiting from the system. However, without enough peo-
ple—FAA  inspectors  who  are  trained  to  see  and  hear  things  not  quantifiable 
through any database—any adjustments to the process will have little or no impact. 
FAA Culture Impedes Work of Safety Inspectors 

The  culture  at  the  FAA  has  devolved  into  one  in  which  the  employees  are  criti-
cized  for  their  actions,  questioned  on  their  expert  opinions  and  made  to  feel  as  if 
they  are  the  only  ones  fighting  for  the  safety  of  the  system.  As  stated  earlier,  the 
creation  of  ATOS  was  the  FAA’s  answer  to  providing  reassurance  in  the  wake  of 
the ValuJet accident. National Transportation Safety Board (NTSB) hearings on the 
accident  reveal  that  at  least  one  employee  expressed  repeated  concerns  as  to  the 
safety  of  ValuJet  prior  to  the  accident,  going  so  far  as  to  file  a  report  suggesting 
the FAA intensify its surveillance of the airline by increasing the number of inspec-
tors assigned to the carrier. However, that report was ignored and not passed along 
to higher levels of management. During the hearing, it was indicated that the envi-
ronment  at  the  FAA  was  one  in  which  the  comments  and  observations  of  subordi-
nates  were  regularly  dismissed  by  those  at  the  top.  The  lack  of  change  in  the  cul-
ture at the FAA is striking. Although ATOS may have been conceived with the best 
intentions,  it  obviously  does  not  address  the  underlying  problems  that  continue  to 
plague the agency. 
‘‘Cozy’’ Relationships Between FAA Management and Airlines 

A 1996 act of Congress eliminated a portion of the FAA’s ‘‘dual mandate’’ that di-
rected  the  agency  to  promote  air  travel.4 Although  legislation  describing  the  FAA’s 
mandate  now  instructs  the  agency  to  focus  on  maintaining  and  enhancing  safety, 
there  remains  pressure  from  FAA  management  to  promote  the  aviation  industry 
even  if  it  is  at  the  sacrifice  of  safety  enforcement.  In  fact,  PASS  has  learned  of  nu-
merous  instances  in  which,  due  to  collaboration  between  the  FAA  and  industry, 
FAA  safety  inspectors  were  prevented  from  moving  forward  with  enforcement  ac-
tions  after  identifying  a  violation  of  the  Federal  Aviation  Regulations.  As  a  result, 
the  role  of  inspector  as  safety  enforcer  is  becoming  increasingly  overshadowed  and 
inspectors  are  being  pressured  by  FAA  management  not  to  pursue  enforcement  ac-
tions or to severely censor their evaluations. 

There are many examples in which FAA management has ‘‘looked the other way’’ 
rather  than  seriously  contemplating  the  safety  inspector’s  professional  opinion  and 
taking immediate steps to ensure that the airline was in compliance with FAA regu-
lations. One recent high-profile example in which safety violations were detected at 
an airline illustrates the FAA’s cultural flaw all too clearly. In September 2007, the 
IG  released  a  report  on  an  incident  involving  a  safety  inspector  for  Northwest  Air-
lines  who,  after  identifying  safety  problems  with  the  airline,  was  prevented  from 
further  access  to  the  carrier  and  reassigned  to  administrative  duties.  After  a  thor-
ough  investigation,  the  IG  determined  that  many  of  the  inspector’s  findings  were 
legitimate  and  that  the  FAA  appeared  to  focus  on  ‘‘discounting  the  validity  of  the 
complaints rather than determining whether there were conditions . . . that needed 
correction.’’ 5 The  IG  warned  that  a  ‘‘potential  negative  consequence  of  FAA’s  han-
dling  of  this  safety  recommendation  is  that  other  inspectors  may  be  discouraged 
from  bringing  safety  issues  to  FAA’s  attention.’’ 6 PASS  fully  concurs  with  the  IG’s 
assessment. In fact, many safety inspectors with whom we spoke were hesitant even 
to  discuss  similar  situations  with  the  union  in  preparation  for  this  testimony  for 
fear that their managers would find out and put them under investigation or other-
wise ‘‘make work a nightmare.’’ 

Furthermore,  PASS  has  learned  of  instances  in  which  FAA  management  has 
urged  or  actually  required  inspectors  to  alter  their  information  in  FAA  databases 
in order to diminish the seriousness of the inspectors’ findings. Recently, two griev-
ances were filed by inspectors involving incidents in which inspectors working at the 
Northwest  Airlines  certificate  management  office  (CMO)  were  forced  to  change  in-
formation they had entered into the ATOS database by their frontline managers. Ac-
cording  to  FAA  policy,  when  there  is  a  difference  of  opinion  concerning  critical  as-
sessment  data  captured  in  an  FAA  database,  all  information  is  supposed  to  be  ele-
vated  to  the  principal  inspector  so  that  he  or  she  has  the  necessary  data  in  order 
to  assess  the  safety  risk.  In  one  instance,  however,  management  demanded  a  more 
generic version of the data that did not reflect as negatively on the airline to replace 

4 Public Law 104–264, Section 401: Elimination of Dual Mandate. 
5 Department  of  Transportation  Inspector  General,  Actions  Taken  to  Address  Allegations  of 
Unsafe  Maintenance  Practices  at  Northwest  Airlines,  AV–2007–080  (Washington,  D.C.:  Sep-
tember 28, 2007), p. 7. 

6 Id. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

38 

the inspector’s actual findings. In another case, an inspector, after documenting ob-
servations  of  noncompliance,  was  told  to  change  responses  in  the  ATOS  database. 
When the inspector refused, believing that this would significantly affect the quality 
of  the  safety  information,  the  inspector  was  admonished.  A  recent  change  to  FAA 
policy  will  allow  FAA  managers  access  to  the  system  and  permit  them  to  alter  the 
data  without  forcing  the  inspector  to  make  the  changes.  Management  will  be  re-
quired to identify the author of the change and provide the reporting inspector with 
a copy of the change. Although this will certainly limit the demand placed on inspec-
tors  to  conform  to  management  pressure,  this  process  still  has  the  potential  to  im-
pact the safety of the system. 

Consider  the  following  additional  examples  in  which  the  disturbingly  close  rela-

tionship between FAA management and industry is highlighted: 

• In  2003,  an  inspector  assigned  to  Continental  Airlines  discovered  that  over 
4,000  life  vests  had  not  been  overhauled  by  a  certificated  repair  station  in  ac-
cordance  with  the  component  maintenance  manual.  The  inspector’s  supervisor 
did  not  want  to  have  the  airline  replace  the  life  vests  and,  according  to  the  in-
spector,  went  so  far  as  to  accuse  the  inspector  of  wanting  to  bankrupt  the  car-
rier. FAA management allowed the airline to continue operating with these ‘‘un- 
airworthy’’  life  vests  for  several  weeks.  Only  after  the  persistent  efforts  of  the 
inspector did a higher level of management insist the life vests be replaced im-
mediately. 
• In  October  2007,  a  safety  inspector  assigned  to  American  Eagle  in  Fort  Worth 
uncovered  training  and  operational  issues  the  inspector  believed  should  be  ad-
dressed  by  the  agency.  The  inspector  wrote  11  letters  on  issues  ranging  from 
handbook  compliance  to  regulatory  compliance  and  sent  them  to  the  principal 
inspector  assigned  to  the  American  Eagle  CMO  operations  unit,  who  then  sent 
them  on  to  the  unit  supervisor.  In  November  2007  and  again  in  January  2008, 
the inspector asked the unit supervisor about the status of the letters. On both 
occasions,  the  unit  supervisor,  who  is  a  former  employee  of  the  carrier,  re-
sponded that sending all the letters at once would overwhelm the carrier. After 
details regarding upcoming hearings were released, the inspector was informed 
that  the  unit  supervisor  had  told  the  principal  inspector  to  send  the  letters  to 
the carrier. 
• In  2007,  inspectors  assigned  to  the  Hawaiian  Airlines  certificate  were  advised 
that  they  could  no  longer  perform  inspections  on  aircraft  in  service  when  the 
flight  turnaround  time  is  only  an  hour  and  a  half.  When  a  plane  is  in  service 
and  sitting  at  the  gate  on  the  ‘‘ramp,’’  it  is  considered  an  excellent  time  to  in-
spect the carrier to validate the airline’s assertion that the aircraft is ready for 
passenger-carrying  service,  especially  since  most  of  these  aircraft  will  be  flying 
over  water  for  extended  periods.  An  e-mail  from  management  emphasized  that 
the  airline  had  expressed  concerns  due  to  delays  caused  by  these  inspections 
and that ‘‘on-time performance is a high priority item for Hawaiian.’’ Inspectors 
have  been  directed  not  to  conduct  detailed  inspections  of  an  aircraft  during 
‘‘quick’’ turnaround in order for the inspectors to ‘‘be less apt to cause a disrup-
tion.’’ The e-mail specifically states that this change in procedure is to enhance 
the working relationship between the FAA and the airline. 

Moreover,  even  if  an  enforcement  action  initiated  by  an  FAA  safety  inspector 
makes  it  through  all  the  procedural  steps  and  results  in  a  civil  penalty,  a  process 
that  can  take  up  to  several  years,  these  fines  or  penalties  are  often  dramatically 
reduced.  A  2005  report  by  the  Government  Accountability  Office  (GAO)  stated  that 
from FY 1993 through 2003, there was a ‘‘52 percent reduction in the civil monetary 
penalties  assessed  from  a  total  of  $334  million  to  $162  million.’’ 7 Inspectors  have 
told  PASS,  and  the  GAO  report  has  confirmed,  that  the  lessening  of  penalties  for 
present violations has severely reduced the prevention of future violations. In other 
words,  if  punishment  for  violating  safety  regulations  is  not  appropriately  strict,  pe-
nalizing an airline will have little or no impact on future actions. 

One case involving an FAA safety inspector working for the United Airlines CMO 
illustrates this prevalent practice of reducing the amount of civil penalties assessed 
on an airline found to be in violation. In 2003, the inspector discovered a significant 
problem  with  improper  accomplishment  of  work  under  an  FAA  AD  on  the  United 
Boeing 777 aircraft. The AD required that ‘‘each backup generator must be serviced 
by  different  individuals  before  any  subsequent  flight.’’  The  inspector  found  that  the 

7 Government  Accountability  Office,  Aviation  Safety:  FAA’s  Safety  Oversight  System  Is  Effec-
tive  but  Could  Benefit  from  Better  Evaluation  of  Its  Programs’  Performance,  GAO–06–266T 
(Washington, D.C.: November 17, 2005), p. 12. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

39 

air carrier had been systematically performing dual servicing contrary to the AD for 
years.  As  a  result,  an  EIR  was  filed.  The  EIR  sanctioning  guidelines  provided  for 
a recommended civil penalty of $500,000, but the office manager would not endorse 
the  EIR  with  that  proposed  amount.  The  office  manager  eventually  approved  the 
EIR  with  a  proposed  civil  penalty  of  $195,000.  The  informal  hearing  regarding  the 
case  was  held  in  December  2007,  and  the  proposed  sanction  after  the  hearing  was 
$32,000.  The  final  amount  appears  to  be  a  civil  penalty  of  $28,000.  In  addition, 
while gathering records for the EIR, the inspector discovered falsification of records. 
Despite the efforts of the inspector, there was never any consequence to the falsifica-
tion issue. 
Customer Service Initiative (CSI) 

In 2003, FAA Aviation Safety Associate Administrator Nick Sabatini unveiled his 
Customer  Service  Initiative  (CSI)  program  in  order  to  allow  certificate  holders  to 
‘‘request reconsideration of a decision made by an Aviation Safety office.’’ 8 The guid-
ance  on  the  initiative  reads  similar  to  what  one  may  expect  to  encounter  in  any 
service-based industry where the emphasis is on satisfying the customer. In PASS’s 
view,  the  FAA  should  be  focused  on  protecting  aviation  safety  and  treating  the  fly-
ing public as the most important customer rather than satisfying the aviation indus-
try.  The  CSI  allows  airlines  to  ask  for  review  on  any  inspector’s  decision  made  in 
the  regulatory  or  certification  process.  However,  the  FAA  is  permitting  air  carriers 
to  use  the  CSI  to  make  customer  complaints  and  remove  an  inspector  simply  for 
doing his or her job. In essence, the CSI program finds the inspector guilty without 
a  trial,  granting  the  airlines  an  almost  effortless  way  to  clean  the  slate,  as  well  as 
sending  a  disturbing  message  to  any  other  inspector  assigned  to  the  carrier  that  if 
they attempt to hold the carrier accountable, they may be removed from the assign-
ment or face other repercussions. 

PASS  is  aware  of  many  incidents  in  which  FAA  management  has  allowed  an  air 
carrier  to  exploit  the  CSI  process  after  an  inspector  attempted  to  hold  the  airline 
accountable.  In  some  cases,  air  carriers  have  even  requested  that  their  certificate 
be transferred to another Flight Standards District Office (FSDO). Consider the fol-
lowing examples: 

• In 2005, an inspector working at the Northwest Airlines CMO in Minnesota de-
tected a problem with the airline’s use of temporary workers who were not prop-
erly  trained  and  familiar  with  the  airline’s  maintenance  operation.  The  inspec-
tor repeatedly related concerns that the airline’s use of temporary workers who 
were not competent or properly trained could jeopardize the continued operation 
of the airline. In response to these findings, the airline contacted the FAA man-
ager at the CMO and accused the inspector of harassment. Without conducting 
a  proper  investigation,  the  FAA  removed  the  inspector  from  the  certificate. 
When the agency refused to address the system issues regarding the use of tem-
porary  maintenance  workers,  the  inspector  was  forced  to  file  a  safety  rec-
ommendation.  This  safety  recommendation  was  ignored,  compelling  the  inspec-
tor  to  elevate  the  issue  to  Congress  and  the  Inspector  General  due  to  serious 
safety concerns regarding the operation of the airline. 
• In  2005,  a  major  helicopter  company  performing  an  external  lift  operation  in 
the  FAA  field  office  district  of  Fort  Worth,  Texas,  was  found  in  noncompliance 
with the company’s FAA-approved altitude restrictions and congested area limi-
tations. The reporting inspector had proposed severe sanctions against the pilot 
and  operator,  and  a  letter  was  sent  to  the  operator  detailing  the  proposed  civil 
penalties. The operator complained about the sanctions and the enforcement ac-
tions  were  dismissed.  The  FAA  responded  by  prohibiting  inspectors  in  Fort 
Worth from performing any future surveillance on the operator when it operates 
in their district. 

Due to the repeated misuse of the CSI program, PASS recommends that the pro-
gram  be  suspended  until  there  can  be  an  independent  review  of  the  program  in 
order to ensure that it is being used properly and achieving intended results. 
Voluntary Disclosure Reporting Program (VDRP) 

FAA  management  has  allowed  the  culture  at  the  agency  to  degenerate  into  one 
in  which  satisfying  airlines  has  priority  over  aviation  safety.  In  fact,  FAA  manage-
ment  is  allowing  airlines  to  use  FAA  safety  programs  to  avoid  enforcement  action. 
The  misuse  of  these  partnership  programs  not  only  reduces  the  essential  aviation 

8 Federal  Aviation  Administration.  Customer  Service  Appeals  &  Petitions  [updated  August  3, 
2005;  cited  February  2008].  Available  from  www.faa.gov/about/officelorg/fieldloffices/fsdo/ 
cslinitiative. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

40 

safety  inspector  role  to  a  mere  nuisance,  diminishing  their  credibility  with  the  air-
line  they  are  charged  with  overseeing,  it  forces  inspectors  to  work  in  an  environ-
ment where their expert warnings are often ignored or severely downgraded—a dan-
gerously negligent approach to aviation safety. 

The  Voluntary  Disclosure  Reporting  Program  (VDRP)  allows  certificate  holders 
operating  under  Title  14  of  the  Code  of  Federal  Regulations  to  disclose  voluntarily 
to  the  FAA  apparent  violations  of  certain  regulations.  As  a  result  of  airlines  self- 
disclosing  a  violation  and  presenting  a  plan  for  a  ‘‘comprehensive  fix’’  of  the  prob-
lem,  entities  will  receive  a  letter  of  correction  instead  of  a  civil  penalty.  According 
to the FAA, this policy is intended to ‘‘encourage compliance with FAA regulations, 
foster  safe  operating  practices,  and  promote  the  development  of  internal  evaluation 
programs.’’ 9 However,  in  order  for  the  VDRP  to  operate  successfully,  several  steps 
must be rigorously enforced by the FAA, which is often not the case. 

At  a  minimum,  the  FAA  should  enforce  its  requirement  that  the  air  carrier 
‘‘promptly’’ disclose the violation upon its own detection and immediately terminate 
the  improper  conduct.  According  to  the  order,  ‘‘In  evaluating  whether  an  apparent 
violation is covered by this policy, the responsible inspector will ensure . . . [the en-
tity]  has  notified  the  FAA  of  the  apparent  violation  immediately  after  detecting  it 
before  the  agency  has  learned  of  it  by  other  means’’ 10 (emphasis  added).  Further-
more, aside from specific exceptions, FAA policy states that the FAA ‘‘will not forgo 
legal  enforcement  action  if  [the  entity]  informs  the  FAA  of  the  apparent  violation 
during,  or  in  anticipation  of,  an  FAA  investigation/inspection  or  in  association  with 
an accident or incident.’’ 11 

The  policy  makes  it  clear  that  once  an  FAA  safety  inspector  finds  a  safety  viola-
tion,  that  discovery  should  result  in  an  enforcement  action—the  airline  is  not  sup-
posed  to  be  given  a  chance  to  self-disclose  at  that  point.  If  an  inspector  finds  an 
apparent violation, it should be considered a significant event and should be treated 
accordingly.  The  important  and  safety-critical  work  of  FAA  safety  inspectors  must 
be taken seriously and their findings must be given proper attention and merit. 

Regardless  of  the  explicit  directions  in  the  FAA  policy,  the  intense  focus  of  FAA 
managers on maintaining a positive relationship with the airlines is resulting in se-
rious abuse of the VDRP. The IG has expressed belief that the FAA ‘‘relies too heav-
ily  on  self-disclosures  and  promotes  a  pattern  of  excessive  leniency  at  the  expense 
of  effective  oversight  and  appropriate  enforcement.’’ 12 PASS  has  learned  of  many 
cases  that  validate  this  concern  in  which  inspectors  find  safety  violations  but  are 
being  directed  by  their  front-line  managers  to  hold  off  on  enforcement  to  allow  the 
airline  to  self-disclose  the  item.  For  example,  in  2006,  an  FAA  safety  inspector  as-
signed to conduct oversight of a major air carrier in the Southern region discovered 
problems  when  reviewing  modifications  made  to  a  Boeing  737.13 The  inspector  dis-
covered that the problems applied to several aircraft and promptly notified the prin-
cipal  inspector  and  operator.  When  following  up  on  the  incident  the  next  week,  the 
inspector  discovered  that  the  airline  had  been  allowed  to  self-disclose  the  problem 
despite the FAA safety inspector discovering the problem first. According to inspec-
tors in the field, this abuse of the self-disclosure process occurs frequently, negating 
the purpose of the program and raising the chance that safety risks will not be cap-
tured appropriately. 

Furthermore,  the  VDRP  guidance  does  not  penalize  an  airline  for  self-disclosing 
the same item repeatedly as long as it is determined that a ‘‘comprehensive fix was 
satisfactorily  completed  and  followed.’’ 14 While  it  is  possible  that  a  comprehensive 
fix  was  not  successful,  thus  causing  a  repeat  occurrence,  this  is  something  that 
should  be  determined  prior  to  the  case  being  considered  closed.  Allowing  unlimited 
disclosure  of  the  same  issue  further  undermines  the  credibility  of  the  program.  In 
fact, the IG stated that ‘‘a partnership program that does not ensure carriers correct 
underlying  problems  is  less  like  to  achieve  safety  benefits.’’  Airlines  are  businesses 
with a focus on profit and, while safety is no doubt a priority, there must be govern-

9 FAA Order 8900.1—Flight Standards Information Management System (FSIMS), Volume 11: 

Flight Standards Programs, Chapter 1: Voluntary Disclosure Reporting Program. 

10 Id. 
11 Id. 
12 Department of Transportation Inspector General, Actions Needed to Strengthen FAA’s Safety 
Oversight  and  Use  of  Partnership  Programs,  CC–2008–046  (Washington,  D.C.:  April  3,  2008), 
p. 3. 

13 Due  to  fear  of  retaliation,  the  inspector  would  not  permit  PASS  to  disclose  the  identity  of 

the air carrier. 

14 FAA  Order  8900.1—Flight  Standards  Information  Management  System  (FSIMS),  Volume 

11: Flight Standards Programs, Chapter 1: Voluntary Disclosure Reporting Program. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

41 

ment  surveillance  and  accountability  to  ensure  that  profit  does  not  overshadow  the 
safe operation of the carrier. 

PASS  concurs  with  the  IG’s  assessment  that  the  FAA  must  implement  a  sec-
ondary review of self-disclosures before they are accepted and that guidance for the 
VDRP  instruct  the  inspector  to  fully  review  the  carrier’s  proposed  solution  for  the 
reported  problem  and  document  that  review  prior  to  accepting  the  self-disclosure.15 
In  addition,  PASS  is  concerned  that  the  VDRP  database  is  not  being  monitored  on 
a local, regional or national level to identify trends that may impact several airlines. 
If  this  analysis  is  not  being  performed,  PASS  suggests  that  the  FAA  take  action  to 
ensure that the VDRP database is examined on an ongoing basis in order to identify 
and  address  widespread  risks  as  well  as  determine  whether  the  program  is  achiev-
ing the desired results. 
Oversight of Foreign Repair Stations 

Another  problem  on  which  this  committee  has  focused  attention  is  airlines  in-
creasing their reliance on outsourced maintenance work performed at facilities with-
in  this  country  and  abroad.  Whereas  much  of  this  work  was  once  done  at  the  air 
carrier’s  facility,  according  to  the  IG,  air  carriers’  use  of  outsourced  repair  stations 
has  grown  from  37  percent  of  air  carriers’  maintenance  costs  in  1996  to  62  percent 
in  2005,  or  nearly  $3.4  billion  of  the  $5.5  billion  spent  on  maintenance.  During  the 
first three quarters of 2006, the amount of outsourced maintenance had already in-
creased to 64 percent.16 

A  large  portion  of  this  work  is  being  performed  at  facilities  in  foreign  locations, 
and  many  inspectors  say  that  they  are  not  confident  with  the  level  of  oversight  of 
foreign  repair  stations  and  that  serious  safety  issues  are  not  being  addressed.  The 
regulations  governing  foreign  repair  stations  have  also  been  called  into  question. 
For example, as opposed to domestic airline or repair station employees, workers at 
contract  foreign  repair  stations  are  not  required  to  pass  drug  and  alcohol  tests. 
There also continues to be major concerns regarding security at these facilities, with 
many  of  the  repair  stations  lacking  any  security  standards.  If  a  foreign  repair  sta-
tion  wants  to  work  on  U.S.-registered  aircraft  or  any  aircraft  that  operate  in  this 
country, those repair stations should be required to meet the same safety standards 
as domestic repair stations. 

Another  concern  is  that  the  FAA  continues  to  expand  the  use  of  bilateral  agree-
ments  with  foreign  countries  to  oversee  repair  of  U.S.  carriers.  The  Bilateral  Avia-
tion  Safety  Agreement  (BASA)  with  Maintenance  Implementation  Procedures 
(MIPs)  allows  foreign  authorities  to  provide  oversight  of  the  work  performed  at  re-
pair  facilities  without  any  involvement  from  FAA  inspectors.  This  eliminates  the 
need  for  the  inspector  to  travel  to  the  repair  station  at  all  and  entrusts  responsi-
bility  entirely  to  a  foreign  entity.  According  to  the  IG,  however,  foreign  authorities 
do not provide the FAA with sufficient information on what was inspected, the prob-
lems discovered and how these problems were addressed. The IG has recently stated 
that  despite  some  additional  efforts,  the  concern  remains  that  the  ‘‘FAA  is  still  not 
regularly  visiting  the  facilities  in  the  countries  where  agreements  exist  with  other 
aviation  authorities.’’ 17 The  IG  cited  an  example  in  which  FAA  inspectors  for  one 
air carrier had not visited a major foreign engine repair facility even though the re-
pair  station  had  performed  maintenance  on  39  (74  percent)  of  the  53  engines  re-
paired for the air carrier. Furthermore, FAA inspectors had not conducted any spot 
inspections of this facility in 5 years.18 

In order to ensure that the work performed at foreign repair stations meets FAA 
and air carrier standards, PASS believes that all certificated foreign repair stations 
should be inspected at least twice a year by an FAA inspector and all workers work-
ing  on  U.S.  aircraft  should  be  drug  and  alcohol  tested.  In  addition,  the  increasing 
use of foreign repair stations has been drawing even more attention to the inspector 
staffing  problem.  Clearly,  the  inspector  workforce  must  be  expanded  in  order  to 
meet the demands required by work performed on U.S. aircraft overseas. 
Use of Non-Certificated Repair Facilities 

With airlines increasing their use of outsourced maintenance work, there has been 
a significant increase in the use of non-certificated repair stations. ‘‘Non-certificated’’ 
means  that  the  repair  facility  does  not  possess  a  certificate  issued  by  the  FAA  to 

15 Department of Transportation Inspector General, Actions Needed to Strengthen FAA’s Safety 
Oversight  and  Use  of  Partnership  Programs,  CC–2008–046  (Washington,  D.C.:  April  3,  2008), 
p. 21. 

16 Department  of  Transportation  Inspector  General,  Aviation  Safety:  FAA’s  Oversight  of 

Outsourced Maintenance Facilities, CC–2007–035 (Washington, D.C.: March 29, 2007), p. 1. 

17 Id., p. 9. 
18 Id. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

42 

operate  under  Federal  Aviation  Regulation  Part  145  and  is  therefore  not  subject  to 
direct  FAA  oversight.  A  certificated  repair  station  meets  the  standards  as  outlined 
in  the  Federal  Aviation  Regulation  and  is  therefore  subject  to  direct  FAA  oversight 
to  ensure  that  it  continues  to  meet  those  same  standards.  The  differences  in  regu-
latory requirements and standards at the two facilities are extremely troubling. For 
example,  in  an  FAA-certificated  repair  station,  it  is  required  that  there  be  des-
ignated supervisors and inspectors and a training program. These items are not re-
quired at non-certificated repair facilities. 

Effective  oversight  of  non-certificated  repair  facilities  gained  attention  in  the 
aftermath  of  the  January  2003  Air  Midwest  crash  in  Charlotte,  N.C.  The  National 
Transportation  Safety  Board  determined  that  incorrect  rigging  of  the  elevator  sys-
tem  by  a  contractor  contributed  to  the  accident  and  pointed  to  ‘‘lack  of  oversight’’ 
by Air Midwest and the FAA. 19 The airline contracted out the work to an FAA-cer-
tificated  repair  station,  which  then  subcontracted  to  a  non-certificated  repair  facil-
ity.  Under  Federal  regulations,  the  airline  is  ultimately  responsible  for  ensuring 
that  the  work  is  performed  in  accordance  with  FAA  standards  and  requirements. 
According  to  the  IG,  the  FAA  does  not  know  how  many  non-certificated  mainte-
nance facilities air carriers currently use, but the IG identified ‘‘over 1,400 non-cer-
tificated repair facilities performing maintenance and more than 100 of these facili-
ties  were  located  in  foreign  countries.’’ 20 The  IG  also  discovered  that  there  are  no 
limitations  to  the  amount  of  maintenance  work  non-certificated  facilities  can  pro-
vide, and that these facilities are performing far more work than minor services, in-
cluding  much  of  the  same  type  of  work  FAA-certificated  repair  stations  perform, 
such  as  repairing  parts  used  to  measure  airspeed,  removing  and  replacing  jet  en-
gines,  and  replacing  flight  control  motors.  Some  of  these  non-certificated  facilities 
are even performing critical preventative maintenance. 

Despite the fact that these facilities are performing safety-critical work, FAA over-
sight is practically nonexistent. In other words, these facilities are performing work 
pivotal  to  aviation  safety  with  no  guarantee  that  it  is  being  done  in  line  with  FAA 
and air carrier standards. It is obvious that there must be changes made regarding 
air  carriers’  use  of  non-certificated  repair  facilities.  As  such,  PASS  believes  that  all 
air  carrier  maintenance  work  (substantial,  regularly  scheduled  or  required  inspec-
tions items) should only be performed by an FAA-certificated repair station. 
FAA Must Ensure Adequate Inspector Staffing 

PASS is extremely concerned about staffing of the FAA safety inspector workforce. 
Whereas  decades  ago,  FAA  safety  inspectors  were  regularly  on  location  performing 
visual  inspections,  the  agency  has  undergone  dramatic  changes  and  inspectors  now 
report  spending  more  than  70  percent  of  their  time  at  their  desks.  The  FAA  has 
shifted  its  focus  to  a  risk-based,  data-driven  system  due  to  the  decreasing  number 
of  FAA  aviation  safety  inspectors.  With  the  increased  outsourcing  of  maintenance 
work  in  this  country  and  abroad,  growing  number  of  aging  aircraft,  the  emergence 
of  new  trends  in  aviation  (such  as  very  light  jets,  unmanned  aircraft  and  regional 
carriers)  and  the  expansion  of  the  FAA’s  designee  programs—all  of  which  require 
additional  inspector  oversight—it  is  imperative  that  there  are  enough  inspectors  in 
place to monitor the safety of the system. 

Making  this  situation  even  worse  is  the  fact  that  nearly  half  of  the  inspector 
workforce  will  be  eligible  to  retire  in  the  next  5  years  and  many  areas  are  already 
severely  understaffed.  Considering  the  recent  Southwest  incident,  it  is  even  more 
critical  that  the  FAA  have  enough  inspectors  to  ensure  proper  identification  of  air-
line  safety  violations  and  adequate  follow-up.  Unfortunately,  in  its  FY  2009  budget 
request, the FAA has not requested any funding to hire additional Flight Standards 
aviation  safety  inspectors.  Since  it  is  critical  that  there  are  enough  inspectors  in 
place to adequately oversee the growing industry and ensure the safety of the avia-
tion system, sufficient funds must be authorized to hire more inspectors. 
Conclusion and Recommendations 

Following  the  Southwest  Airlines  incident,  the  FAA,  claiming  that  it  was  now 
‘‘wide awake,’’ released a series of improvements to the agency’s inspection program. 
The  highlight  of  these  improvements  is  the  creation  of  the  Safety  Issues  Reporting 
System  (SIRS)  to  provide  employees  an  ‘‘additional  mechanism  to  raise  safety  con-
cerns if they feel they are not receiving the necessary airing or response from super-

19 National  Transportation  Safety  Board,  Loss  of  Pitch  Control  During  Takeoff,  Air  Midwest 
Flight 5481, Raytheon (Beechcraft) 1900D, N233YV, Charlotte, North Carolina, January 8, 2003, 
Aircraft Accident Report NTSB/AAR–04/01 (Washington, D.C.: 2004), p. x. 

20 Department  of  Transportation  Inspector  General,  Aviation  Safety:  FAA’s  Oversight  of 

Outsourced Maintenance Facilities, CC–2007–035 (Washington, D.C.: March 29, 2007), p. 13. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

43 

visory and management personnel.’’ 21 This hotline is in addition to hotlines already 
in  existence  that  were  used  by  FAA  inspectors  in  the  Southwest  Airlines  incident 
to  no  avail.  Inspectors  have  told  PASS  that  these  hotlines  serve  no  real  purpose 
other  than  to  bring  negative  attention  to  the  inspector  using  the  hotline.  In  fact, 
one  inspector  informed  PASS  that  after  not  receiving  an  appropriate  response  from 
management, the inspector elevated concerns through one of these hotlines. The re-
sponsibility for responding to the hotline report was shifted through layers of man-
agement  until  it  was  directed  back  to  the  very  same  managers  about  whom  the  in-
spector  had  complained  in  the  first  place.  The  inspector,  who  did  not  conceal  his 
identity  when  using  the  hotline,  revealed  that  the  problems  never  were  adequately 
addressed. 

Clearly,  another  hotline  is  not  a  solution  to  the  pervasive  problems  at  the  FAA. 
The  IG  has  stated  that  the  FAA  needs  to  make  ‘‘immediate  and  comprehensive 
changes  to  its  oversight  of  air  carriers.’’ 22 While  a  hotline  may  be  immediate,  it  is 
in no way comprehensive. Another hotline is nothing more than lip-service to a field 
of aviation experts attempting to raise aviation safety issues that require immediate 
attention.  It  may  indeed  be  necessary  to  create  another  avenue  through  which  in-
spectors  can  express  concerns,  but  this  plan  cannot  be  successful  if  it  is  another 
FAA project. PASS believes that any such program must be independent of the FAA 
if it is to succeed. 

In addition, there is no doubt that the relationship between the FAA and the air-
line  industry  needs  to  change  to  ensure  safety  issues  are  given  appropriate  atten-
tion.  PASS  agrees  with  the  concept  of  rotating  managers  in  order  to  prevent  these 
types of ‘‘cozy’’ relationships from developing. Those with the ultimate responsibility 
for  oversight  of  FAA  safety  inspectors  and  the  carrier  should  be  the  group  that  is 
rotated  among  facilities.  As  such,  PASS  recommends  that  a  plan  be  executed  to  ro-
tate  all  first-  and  second-level  managers  on  a  regular  basis.  This  rotation  will  help 
to  discourage  management  from  becoming  too  closely  connected  with  the  airlines. 
While  this  rotation  may  be  a  good  start,  PASS  also  concurs  with  the  U.S.  Office  of 
Special  Counsel  in  that  since  ‘‘the  culture  of  complacence  and  cover  up  goes  very 
high in management circles’’ at the FAA, there needs to be ‘‘a serious discipline and 
shakeup  of  the  FAA  in  order  to  send  the  proper  message  inside  what  appears  to 
be a very insular organization . . . .’’ 23 

According  to  the  FAA’s  website,  aviation  safety  inspectors  are  the  ‘‘FAA’s  on-site 
detectives.’’ 24 While  this  statement  was  once  true,  the  FAA  has  become  an  agency 
where  a  limited  inspector  workforce  facing  a  constantly  increasing  workload  is  pre-
vented from pursuing safety concerns by a management culture focused on pleasing 
the  industry.  The  FAA’s  customers  are  the  flying  pubic,  not  the  airlines,  and  its 
most  critical  role  is  to  protect  the  safety  of  these  customers.  Safety  is  always  the 
primary  focus  of  the  FAA  safety  inspector  workforce—their  contributions  and  the 
safety of the aviation system should never be anything but the agency’s top priority 
as well. 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. Thank you. 
Mr. Barimo? 

STATEMENT OF BASIL J. BARIMO, VICE PRESIDENT, 

OPERATIONS AND SAFETY, AIR TRANSPORT 

ASSOCIATION OF AMERICA, INC. 

Mr.  BARIMO.  Good  morning,  Mr.  Chairman,  Senator  Hutchison, 
members  of  the  Committee.  This  morning’s  hearing  is  important 
and  timely  and  it  provides  us  with  the  opportunity  to  take  stock 
of  commercial  aviation  safety  in  the  United  States,  and  more  spe-
cifically,  it  provides  us  the  opportunity  to  review  how  we  got  here 

April 2, 2008. 

21 Federal  Aviation  Administration,  ‘‘FAA  Announces  Improvements  to  Inspection  Program,’’ 

22 Department of Transportation Inspector General, Actions Needed to Strengthen FAA’s Safety 
Oversight  and  Use  of  Partnership  Programs,  CC–2008–046  (Washington,  D.C.:  April  3,  2008), 
p. 16. 

23 U.S.  Office  of  Special  Counsel,  Statement  of  the  Honorable  Scott  J.  Bloch,  Special  Counsel, 

U.S. Office of Special Counsel (Washington, D.C.: April 3, 2008), pp. 6–7. 

24 Federal Aviation Administration. Aviation Safety Inspectors [updated January 4, 2007; cited 
February  2008].  Available  from  www.faa.gov/about/officelorg/headquartersloffices/ahr/jobs 
lcareers/occupations/avlsafetylinsp. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

44 

and  to  discuss  how  best  to  improve  that  remarkable  safety  record. 
Let me highlight a few basic considerations. 

First,  the  bedrock  principle  in  aviation  is  safety  first.  Congress 
has  said  in  the  Federal  aviation  law  that  assigning,  maintaining, 
and  enhancing  safety  and  security  are  the  highest  priorities  in  air 
commerce.  That  Congressional  mandate  says  it  all,  and  we  are 
committed to doing our part to achieving it. 

Second, we did not get to where we are today by being lucky. We 
have  worked  very  hard  to  achieve  our  safety  record,  which  last 
year  saw  no  fatal  accidents  in  air  carrier  accidents  in  the  United 
States.  While  we  recognize  clearly  that  FAA  is  the  regulator  and 
airlines are the regulated entity, we also recognize with equal clar-
ity that aviation safety is a collaborative undertaking. 

Third, you never rest on your laurels in this business. The safety 
record of the Nation’s airlines is so impressive because of the unre-
lenting  commitment  of  everyone  involved,  Congress,  the  FAA,  the 
NTSB,  manufacturers,  airports,  maintenance  organizations,  the 
employees  and  their  unions,  and  airlines,  to  improving  civil  avia-
tion safety. That commitment has not flagged. 

I  would  like  now  to  discuss  where  things  stand  in  three  key 
areas  that  the  Subcommittee  has  identified:  regulatory  oversight, 
maintenance, and runway safety. 

The FAA’s responsibility to regulate airlines to achieve the high-
est degree of safety, which Congress has mandated, has not dimin-
ished, nor has the airlines’ responsibility to fulfill that mandate di-
minished. Both are immutable. 

What  has  changed,  though,  are  the  tools  that  are  available  and, 
I  would  emphasize,  necessary  to  meet  those  responsibilities.  In-
stead  of  being  reactive  and  establishing  safety  goals  based  on  the 
most  recent  accident  or  incident,  the  industry  and  FAA  have 
learned to use the wealth of data from all stakeholders to guide the 
safety  agenda  so  that  not  only  existing,  but  potential  risks  are 
identified  and  solutions  to  them  developed  in  the  most  effective 
way.  FAA’s  ATOS  system,  we  heard  described  earlier,  embodies 
this  principle,  and  we  believe  that  the  concept  of  ATOS  is  sound, 
although  as  the  Inspector  General  has  pointed  out,  some  refine-
ments are needed. 

This  analytical  and  more  predictive  approach  has  paid  tremen-
dous  dividends.  It  is  the  key  to  future  safety  improvements.  Com-
mercial  aviation  safety  is  a  much  more  forward-looking  endeavor 
today  than  in  the  past.  Data  in  amounts  and  detail  unimaginable 
a decade ago and collaborative risk analyses have become indispen-
sable.  Make  no  mistake.  That  does  not  mean  that  FAA  inspectors 
should not be kicking the tires and touching metal. It means, how-
ever, that the historic means of regulatory oversight simply are not 
enough today. 

Airline  maintenance  issues  have  been  front  page  news  for  the 
past few weeks, including today. Airline maintenance programs are 
carefully  designed,  comprehensive,  and  continuously  refined.  To-
day’s  headlines  have  not  changed  any  of  that.  The  maintenance 
system  being  scrutinized  today  has  delivered  unprecedented  levels 
of mechanical reliability, which in turn contribute to overall safety. 
The  chart  in  my  written  statement  illustrates  the  exceptional  per-
formance  of  the  Boeing  fleet,  and  I  will  note  that  the  Airbus  fleet 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

45 

is  comparable.  The  chart  shows  that  regardless  of  where  mainte-
nance is done, it is being done and done well. 

But  it  is  a  complicated  business  and  we  are  not  perfect.  As  we 
have  seen  recently,  tracking  hundreds  of  thousands  of  individual 
maintenance tasks is challenging. Even though a recent FAA audit 
of AD compliance revealed a compliance rate of better than 99 per-
cent, airlines are committed to further improving an already robust 
system. And this recent experience underscores airlines will ground 
aircraft when there is any doubt about a maintenance issue. 

Runway  safety  remains  a  high  priority  for  the  industry,  but 
there  is  no  single  fix  when  it  comes  to  eliminating  runway  incur-
sions.  The  solution  is  a  layered  one  that  integrates  technological 
advances,  improved  procedures,  taxi  and  runway  improvements, 
better  understanding  of  human  factors  in  performance.  ADS–B 
mentioned  earlier  will  ultimately  provide  much  better  situational 
awareness for flight crews whether in the air or on the ground. 

In  the  interim,  we  are  pleased  that  FAA,  working  with  airport 
operators, is deploying new systems like ASDE–X and AMASS and 
Runway  Status  Lights  and  adding  perimeter  taxiways,  and  all 
that,  combined  with  heightened  flight  crew  awareness  and  train-
ing, will certainly help reduce collision risks. We recognize, though, 
that this is an ongoing effort. 

In  summary,  we  realize  how  unsettling  the  news  about  mainte-
nance  and  regulatory  oversight  practices  has  been  lately.  There  is 
no getting away from that. Whatever shortcomings may ultimately 
be identified in these episodes, the unchangeable reality is that air-
line maintenance and operation practices have produced the safest 
period of flying that our industry has ever experienced. In the com-
ing  weeks  and  months,  we  should  prudently  evaluate  suggested 
changes  to  that  system.  Change  can  be  very  good,  but  change  for 
its  own  sake  rarely  is.  That  is  particularly  so  when  it  involves  the 
safety of our customers and our crews. 

That  concludes  my  statement.  I  am  happy  to  answer  your  ques-

tions. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Barimo follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF BASIL J. BARIMO, VICE PRESIDENT, OPERATIONS AND 

SAFETY, AIR TRANSPORT ASSOCIATION OF AMERICA, INC. 

Introduction 

The Air Transport Association of America, Inc. (ATA), the trade association of the 
principal  U.S.  passenger  and  cargo  airlines,1 appreciates  the  opportunity  to  submit 
these comments for the record on the state of aviation safety in the U.S. airline in-
dustry.  ATA  member  airlines  have  a  combined  fleet  of  more  than  4,400  airplanes 
and  account  for  more  than  90  percent  of  domestic  passenger  and  cargo  traffic  car-
ried annually by U.S. airlines. 

ATA was founded in 1936 by fledgling U.S. airlines for two fundamental reasons: 
to  improve  and  promote  safety  within  the  industry  and  to  advocate  for  a  legal  and 
regulatory  environment  that  would  allow  the  U.S.  commercial  airline  industry  to 
grow and prosper. What was true then is true today: Safety is the foundation of this 
industry. U.S. airlines will thrive only if the industry in fact is safe and only if the 
public  recognizes  and  believes  it  is  safe.  For  this  reason,  our  members  take  their 
safety  responsibilities  very  seriously.  ‘‘Safety  first’’  is  more  than  just  a  catch-
phrase—it is the core principle of this industry. 

1 ABX Air; AirTran Airways; Alaska Airlines; American Airlines; ASTAR Air Cargo; Atlas Air; 
Continental  Airlines;  Delta  Air  Lines;  Evergreen  International  Airlines;  Federal  Express  Corp.; 
Hawaiian  Airlines;  JetBlue  Airways;  Midwest  Airlines;  Northwest  Airlines;  Southwest  Airlines; 
United Airlines; UPS Airlines and US Airways. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

46 

Airlines Fuel Our Nation’s Economy 

The  U.S.  airline  industry  is  not  simply  an  important  sector  of  our  national  econ-
omy; its services fuel our entire economy. Air transportation is an indispensable ele-
ment of America’s infrastructure and our Nation’s economic well-being. Individuals, 
businesses and communities depend on the national air transportation system. U.S. 
airlines  transport  more  than  2.1  million  passengers  on  a  typical  day  and  directly 
employ  over  one-half  million  persons  to  do  so;  they  provide  just-in-time  cargo  serv-
ices;  they  are  the  backbone  of  the  travel  and  tourism  industry;  and  airlines  link 
communities throughout our Nation and to the world. 

Moreover, the airline industry is the foundation of the commercial aviation sector, 
which  is  comprised  of  airlines,  airports,  manufacturers  and  associated  vendors.  Ac-
cording to the Federal Aviation Administration (FAA), U.S. commercial aviation ul-
timately  drives  $1.1  trillion  in  U.S.  economic  activity  and  nearly  10  million  U.S. 
jobs. By any measure, the U.S. airline industry is a valuable national asset and its 
continued economic health should be a matter of national concern. 
Safety Above All Else 

The  challenges  facing  the  U.S.  airline  industry  are  widely  known.  Once  lucrative 
international  markets  are  softening,  jet  fuel  prices  are  at  an  all-time  high  with  no 
relief in sight and, by all accounts, the United States has entered an economic reces-
sion. Since Christmas Eve, five airlines have fallen victim to these challenging con-
ditions.  Yet  despite  entering  this  new  era  of  volatility,  airline  safety  has  remained 
rock solid. 

In 2007, Part 121 carriers transported 750 million passengers more than eight bil-
lion  miles  and  logged  19  million  flight  hours  on  11.4  million  flights.  According  to 
the NTSB, 2007 saw no passenger fatalities or major accidents. The trend continues 
in  2008  and  without  question,  scheduled  air  service  is  incredibly  safe  and  working 
hard to be even safer. 
A Performance-Based, Data-Driven Approach 

While  there  are  many  reasons  for  the  industry’s  excellent  safety  record,  in  our 
opinion  two  key  developments  stand  out  as  having  a  significant  positive  impact. 
First,  we  have  progressed  from  a  prescriptive,  conduct-based  regulatory  philosophy 
that  focuses  on  what  to  do  and  how  to  do  it,  to  one  that  looks  to  set  performance 
standards  first  and  the  manner  of  achieving  the  desired  performance  second.  This 
has shifted the focus to where it should be—on the safety objective, allowing carriers 
and  the  FAA  to  better  define  and  implement  appropriate  procedures  and  require-
ments.  Second,  instead  of  being  reactive  and  establishing  safety  goals  based  on  the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

.

s
p
e
1
a
t
a
0
1
4

47 

most recent accident or incident, the industry has learned to use the wealth of hard 
data  accumulated  by  all  stakeholders—FAA,  NTSB,  manufacturers  and  air  car-
riers—to  drive  the  safety  agenda  so  that  the  most  serious  risks  are  identified  and 
solutions  developed  in  an  orderly,  efficient  and  effective  manner.  This  data-driven, 
risk-assessment approach to safety has paid tremendous dividends already. It is the 
key to future safety improvements and continued accident prevention. 
Voluntary Programs Are Raising the Bar 

FAA and airline safety programs reflect and implement the regulatory philosophy 
and data-driven approach to safety previously described. In particular, the develop-
ment  of  voluntary  programs  that  encourage  the  reporting  of  operational  data  that 
would  otherwise  be  lost  has  expanded  the  data  set  and  enhanced  the  value  of  the 
analytical  products.  Working  with  the  FAA  and  other  stakeholders,  U.S.  airlines 
have developed flight operational quality-assurance programs—known as FOQA pro-
grams,2 aviation  safety  action  programs,3 voluntary  disclosure  programs 4 and  line 
operations  safety  audit  programs.5 These  programs  have  provided  valuable  data 
that  have  yielded  insights  into  the  precursors  of  accidents.  FAA  and  the  airlines 
have  used  this  information  to  jointly  identify  and  effectively  mitigate  risks  that 
might otherwise have resulted in accidents. This view is shared not only by the air-
lines and FAA, but by independent safety experts worldwide including Flight Safety 
Foundation  President  and  CEO  William  R.  Voss.  In  a  March  2008  statement,  Mr. 
Voss states: 

‘‘The commercial aviation system in the United States is the safest in the world, 
and  both  the  FAA  and  industry  should  be  justifiably  proud  of  their  record.  As 
in  any  safety  management  system,  there  is  always  room  for  continuous  im-
provement, but we cannot allow isolated breakdowns, which the FAA and indus-
try  are  moving  swiftly  to  address,  to  ruin  partnership  programs  that  have  de-
monstrably  contributed  to  aviation’s  sterling  safety  record.  Nor  can  we  afford 
to dry up the free flow of information that allows professionals to identify prob-
lems  before  they  become  safety  threats.  We  cannot  create  a  wall  between  the 
FAA  and  the  airlines  that  will  stop  the  flow  of  information  and  set  aviation 
safety back 20 years.’’ 6 

In  fact,  the  DOT  Inspector  General  recently  testified  as  to  the  value  of  voluntary 

programs, stating that: 

‘‘Such  programs  (Voluntary  Disclosure  Reporting  Program  and  Aviation  Safety 
Action  Program),  if  properly  implemented,  can  add  value  by  identifying  issues 
that  might  not  otherwise  come  to  light  . . .  We  support  the  concept  of  self-dis-
closure  programs  and  recognize  the  challenge  they  present  to  FAA—carefully 
balancing  a  collaborative  relationship  with  effective  oversight  and  appropriate 
enforcement actions.’’ 7 

In  addition  to  data-driven  programs,  aviation  safety  can  be  viewed  as  the  cumu-
lative  outcome  of  numerous  other  activities  by  the  FAA,  NTSB,  airlines  and  their 
employees,  and  airframe  and  engine  manufacturers.  The  most  obvious  of  these  is 
the approval and surveillance by the FAA of air carrier training programs. Training 
programs  for  flight  and  cabin  crews  are  critical  to  safe  operations.  Airlines  employ 
a rigorous selection and training process that includes comprehensive initial and re-
current  training.  Most  major  airlines  today  utilize  the  Advanced  Qualification  Pro-
gram, which enables each airline to tailor its curriculum to its unique operating en-
vironment  and  thereby  maximize  crew-member  proficiency.  We  believe  these  and 
other similar programs will produce further improvements in aviation safety. 

One of the most important programs affecting safety has been the joint industry- 
government  Commercial  Aviation  Safety  Team  (CAST).  CAST  was  established  in 
1997  to  develop  a  comprehensive  strategy  to  identify  and  prioritize  risks  based  on 
past  accidents  and  then  develop  solutions  to  reduce  commercial  aviation  fatalities 

2 FOQA programs involve the collection and analysis of data recorded in flight to improve the 
safety  of  flight  operations,  air  traffic  control  procedures,  and  airport  and  aircraft  design  and 
maintenance. 

3 ASAP involves collection and analysis of safety concerns reported by employees. 
4 VDRP  allows  a  certificate  holder  to  disclose  a  case  of  noncompliance  without  facing  a  civil 

penalty, provided the entity promptly and comprehensively corrects the noncompliance. 

5 LOSA  involves  the  collection  of  safety  data  through  in-flight  observations  of  flight  crews  by 
specialists;  Airlines  use  this  information  to  assess  the  effectiveness  of  their  training  programs. 

6 Flight Safety Foundation Press Release dated March 3, 2008. 
7 Statement  of  the  Honorable  Calvin  L.  Scovel  III,  Inspector  General,  U.S.  Department  of 
Transportation  before  the  House  Committee  on  Transportation  and  Infrastructure,  April  3, 
2008. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

48 

in the United States. Using a data-driven process, the CAST initiative identifies ac-
cident  precursors  and  contributing  factors  to  ensure  that  resources  are  applied  to 
improve  safety  where  needed  most  and  where  most  effective.  Over  time,  CAST  has 
successfully  addressed  several  types  of  accidents,  such  as  controlled  flight  into  ter-
rain,  approach  and  landing  accidents,  runway  incursions,  maintenance  manage-
ment,  icing  and  uncontained  engine  failures.  As  of  2007,  39  different  safety  en-
hancements  had  been  accomplished,  and  26  were  underway.  Through  these  65  en-
hancements, the industry is approaching its goal of reducing the fatality risk by 80 
percent. 

But  CAST  doesn’t  stop  there.  While  the  original  CAST  approach  looked  back  at 
accidents to better understand them and prevent future accidents, the next genera-
tion  of  CAST  efforts  will  look  forward  to  future  risks.  Compiling  a  wide  range  of 
safety  indicators,  CAST  will  identify  risks  to  aviation  safety  before  they  result  in 
accidents. The key to our success will be our ability to confidentially aggregate sen-
sitive,  industry-wide  safety  data  and  mine  it  for  trends.  The  Aviation  Safety  Infor-
mation Analysis and Sharing (ASIAS) system 8 was launched in October 2007 to en-
able  the  exchange  and  analysis  of  safety  data  on  a  national  level.  We  will  continue 
to support the ASIAS system and look forward to the benefits it offers. 

As  noted,  the  CAST  strategy  is  first  and  foremost  data  driven.  It  relies  on  com-
prehensive  analysis  of  past  accidents/incidents  to  identify  accident  precursors  and 
then  develop  specific  safety  enhancements  to  address  those  precursors  and  related 
contributing  factors.  But  the  CAST  process  does  not  stop  there.  It  is  a  fully  inte-
grated  process  that  includes  airlines,  manufacturers,  maintenance  providers,  com-
mercial  pilots,  National  Aeronautics  and  Space  Administration  (NASA)  and  other 
stakeholders, so that once the solutions have been identified, the affected parties im-
plement  the  safety  enhancements  and  track  their  implementation  for  effectiveness. 
Ultimately,  the  knowledge  gained  is  used  to  continually  improve  not  only  the  U.S. 
aviation system, but aviation safety worldwide. Canadian and European authorities 
also participate in CAST. 
Current Safety Issues 

Current  safety  issues  being  addressed  by  our  industry  include  runway  safety, 
maintenance,  fuel  tank  flammability,  FAA  oversight,  air  traffic  controller  staffing, 
operational errors and the safety of our employees. 

Runway Safety.9 Several high-profile events over the last 2 years have drawn at-
tention to the issue of runway incursions, but runway safety has always been a high 
priority  for  the  industry.  For  decades,  airlines  have  recognized  the  challenges  they 
face  on  the  airport  surface  and  have  invested  significant  resources  to  ensure  the 
safety  of  their  passengers  and  crews.  Unfortunately,  there  is  no  silver  bullet  when 
it  comes  to  eliminating  runway  incursions.  The  solution  is  a  layered  one  that  inte-
grates  technological  advances,  better  signage  and  markings,  robust  flight  crew  and 
ATC  procedures  and  a  better  understanding  of  human  factors  and  performance. 
ADS–B,  a  fundamental  component  of  NextGen,  will  ultimately  enable  better  situa-
tional  awareness  for  flight  crews,  allowing  them  to  see  all  traffic  around  them 
whether in the air or on the ground. Combining this real-time, highly accurate posi-
tional  information  with  moving  map  displays  will  yield  real  safety  benefits.  In  the 
interim,  we  are  pleased  that  FAA  is  deploying  several  new  systems  designed  to  re-
duce the risk of runway incursions at our busiest airports. Enhanced automated sur-
veillance  tools  like  AMASS  and  ASDE–X,  Runway  Status  Lights,  perimeter 
taxiways, and EMAS, combined with heightened flight-crew awareness, streamlined 
taxi  procedures  and  refined  training,  will  help  to  reduce  collision  risk.  We  look  for-
ward to working with the FAA and airports to implement these new safety improve-
ments. 

In addition to runway incursions, the industry is focused intently on reducing the 
risk  of  runway  excursions.  ATA  members,  as  well  as  pilot  associations  and  the  air-
port community, are actively participating in the recently formed Takeoff and Land-
ing  Distance  Aviation  Rulemaking  Committee.  The  ARC  will  review  current  prac-
tices  for  determining  runway  distance  needed  under  various  conditions  and  revise 
the regulatory guidance accordingly. 

8 The Federal Aviation Administration (FAA) developed the Aviation Safety Information Anal-
ysis  and  Sharing  (ASIAS)  system  to  enable  users  to  perform  integrated  queries  across  multiple 
databases,  search  an  extensive  warehouse  of  safety  data,  and  display  pertinent  elements  in  an 
array of useful formats. 

9 ATA  testified  on  February  13,  2008,  before  the  House  Aviation  Subcommittee  on  the  issue 
of  runway  safety.  Written  testimony  included  details  about  the  causes  of  runway  incursions  as 
well as specific actions taken and underway to reduce the risk of runway incursions. The testi-
mony is available at www.airlines.org. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

49 

Maintenance.  The  recent  FAA  announcement  of  a  large  civil  penalty  against 
Southwest Airlines and the subsequent audit of Airworthiness Directive compliance 
has attracted significant attention to the subject of airline maintenance. Despite the 
isolated  shortcomings  highlighted,  it  is  important  to  note  that  the  U.S.  commercial 
airline  fleet  is  maintained  to  impeccable  standards,  which  are  reflected  in  mechan-
ical  reliability  performance.  As  shown  in  the  chart  below  for  Boeing  models  (and 
noting  that  Airbus  models  perform  comparably),  airline  maintenance  programs  are 
yielding  unprecedented  levels  of  mechanical  reliability  which,  in  turn,  contribute  to 
overall safety performance. 

Effective  and  efficient  maintenance  programs  play  a  central  role  in  making  air 
travel  safe.  Maintenance  is  a  24/7  function  that  requires  careful  organization,  tight 
control,  diligent  oversight  and  robust  quality  assurance.  Airlines  have  developed 
comprehensive—although not perfect—oversight systems to ensure that aircraft are 
maintained properly in accordance with FAA regulations and manufacturers’ stand-
ards.  As  we  have  seen  recently,  tracking  the  accomplishment  of  hundreds  of  thou-
sands  of  individual  maintenance  tasks  is  challenging.  Even  though  a  recent  FAA 
audit  of  AD  compliance  revealed  a  compliance  rate  better  than  99  percent,  airlines 
are committed to further enhancements that will further improve an already robust 
system. 

Beyond  the  scope  and  frequency  of  individual  maintenance  tasks  is  the  conten-
tious  issue  of  who  actually  performs  maintenance  tasks  and  where  those  tasks  are 
performed.  Contract  maintenance  continues  to  be  scrutinized  with  critics  alleging 
that  the  practice  is  unsafe,  yet  the  industry’s  safety  record  tells  a  different  story. 
Repair  stations  (third-party  maintenance  providers  certificated  under  Part  145) 
have and will continue to play a vital role in air carrier operations and enable U.S. 
airlines to compete effectively worldwide. 

Fuel  Tank  Flammability.  After  the  tragic  loss  of  TWA  Flight  800  in  1996,  FAA 
initiated  a  multiyear  research  and  development  effort  to  address  flammable  vapors 
in  fuel  tanks.  The  effort  produced  a  design  that  would  reduce  the  amount  of  time 
that  vapors  are  in  a  flammable  state.  The  FAA  proposed  a  regulation  that  would 
incorporate  this  new  concept  for  commercial  airliners,  or  other  methods  for  pre-
venting or mitigating fuel vapor explosions. The reduction concept does not diminish 
the need to eliminate ignition sources that could ignite the vapors. To prevent igni-
tion  sources,  the  FAA  adopted  sweeping  regulations  requiring  improved  design 

10 Data  reflects  technical  delays  greater  than  15  minutes  for  Boeing  717,  737,  747,  757,  767, 

777, MD11, MD80 and DC 10 models. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

.

s
p
e
2
A
T
A
0
1
4

50 

standards for fuel tank systems, reviews of existing systems with respect to the new 
standards, system modifications, specific operational procedures, and more exacting 
maintenance procedures. Industry continues to coordinate with the FAA and manu-
facturers as a stakeholder in developing these upgrades, which FAA has, since 1996, 
mandated  through  issuance  of  170  Airworthiness  Directives.  Further,  two  ATA 
member  airlines  independently  developed  and  gained  FAA  approval  for  a  modifica-
tion  that  may  prove  to  be  the  single  most  progressive  ignition-prevention  measure 
developed  to  date.  For  both  economic  and  safety  reasons,  airlines  have,  when  prac-
tical,  reduced  their  use  of  auxiliary  power  units  while  on  the  ground—a  measure 
that can provide relatively modest reductions in the amount of time that vapors are 
flammable.  Our  studies  indicate  that  a  retrofit  of  currently  available  flammability 
reduction  systems  cannot  be  justified  under  government  guidelines  for  rulemaking, 
and  that  actions  taken  to  prevent  ignition  sources  exceed  FAA  standards  and  are 
the most effective approach to mitigating fuel tank explosion risk. 

FAA  Oversight.  FAA  Inspectors  work  where  ‘the  rubber  meets  the  road’  and  are 
the central component of the FAA safety oversight system. They enforce regulations 
and  standards  concerning  civil  aviation  safety,  including  the  airworthiness  of  air-
craft,  the  competence  of  personnel,  and  safety  aspects  of  aviation  facilities,  equip-
ment and procedures. The way in which they fulfill their mission continues to evolve 
with  changes  in  oversight  philosophy.  FAA’s  risk-based  Air  Transport  Oversight 
System  (ATOS)  leverages  air  carriers’  internal  oversight  programs  and  advanced 
data-collection  tools  to  create  customized  surveillance  plans.  Instead  of  searching 
randomly  for  deficiencies,  FAA  can  efficiently  identify  and  target  potential  areas  of 
risk  and  work  with  the  carrier  to  mitigate  that  risk.  Make  no  mistake,  ATOS  does 
not  preclude  the  need  for  FAA  to  conduct  regular  surveillance  of  air  carrier  oper-
ations. It is, however, one of many tools available to FAA and endorsed by the DOT 
Inspector  General 11 to  ensure  that  the  operations  of  certificate  holders  conform  to 
Federal regulations. 

While  ATOS  remains  a  valuable  component  of  FAA’s  oversight  effort,  airlines  do 
not rely on ATOS to keep them safe. Airlines are responsible for ensuring that they 
operate safely and cannot delegate that responsibility. 

Air  Traffic  Controller  Staffing.  Air  traffic  controllers  make  today’s  world-class 
aviation  system  work.  They  struggle  to  move  growing  numbers  of  aircraft  through 
our  Nation’s  airspace  without  the  benefits  of  state-of-the-art  technologies.  Fore-
casted demand from a broad range of users will exceed the capability of our system 
despite  the  best  efforts  of  our  skilled  controller  staff.  Unfortunately,  today’s  system 
is  not  scalable—adding  more  towers,  TRACONs,  or  centers  full  of  controllers  will 
not work. We must provide today’s controllers with tools that enable them to safely 
increase the number of aircraft that they manage at a given time. 

Operational  Errors.  Creating  a  safety  culture  that  embraces  voluntary  reporting 
of  safety  information  while  effectively  managing  individual  performance  is  chal-
lenging.  The  Air  Traffic  Safety  Action  Program  (ATSAP),  FAA’s  version  of  the 
ASAPs  used  so  effectively  within  airlines,  is  a  step  in  the  right  direction.  We  are 
optimistic  that  the  ATSAP  will  generate  valuable  insight  into  the  challenges  air 
traffic  controllers  face  and  ultimately  contribute  to  the  safety  and  efficiency  of  the 
ATC system. 

Operational  errors  have  long  been  a  contentious  issue  for  controllers  and  FAA 
management. A minimum separation limit for aircraft, coupled with punishment for 
even  slight  violations  provides  a  disincentive  for  controllers  to  optimally  space  air-
craft.  On  the  contrary,  controllers  are  incentivized  to  add  a  buffer  to  ensure  that 
the limit is not violated. This wastes valuable airspace and reduces airport through-
put.  We  are  encouraged  that  FAA  is  changing  their  approach  to  aircraft  separation 
by  adopting  the  concept  of  proximity  events.  The  proximity  event  approach  estab-
lishes a window within which the controller keeps the aircraft. This approach gives 
the  controller  an  optimal  separation  target  along  with  a  buffer  ahead  and  behind 
the  aircraft  to  absorb  fluctuations  in  airspeed.  We  believe  that  this  approach  en-
sures continued safe separation of aircraft, optimizes airspace usage and will reduce 
the risk of operational errors. 

Employee Safety. Airlines continuously strive to make the work environment safer 
and  more  comfortable  for  employees,  regardless  of  whether  that  environment  is  on 
the  ground  or  in  the  air.  Flight  crews  as  well  as  passengers  benefit  from  advance-
ments  in  technology,  such  as  the  hospital-grade  HEPA  air  filters  and  ozone  con-
verters  now  installed  on  most  long-range  aircraft,  which  improve  cabin  air  quality. 

11 ‘‘We  have  always  supported  the  concept  of  risk-based  oversight  as  the  only  way  FAA  will 
be  able  to  effectively  oversee  a  large  and  rapidly  changing  aviation  industry.’’  Statement  of  the 
Honorable Calvin L. Scovel III, Inspector General, U.S. Department of Transportation before the 
House Committee on Transportation and Infrastructure, April 3, 2008. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

51 

Better data about cosmic radiation provided by the FAA CARI–6 computer program 
allows  flight  crews  to  monitor  their  cumulative  exposure  to  radiation  and  make 
changes  where  necessary  to  protect  their  health.  A  close  partnership  with  the  Cen-
ters  for  Disease  Control  and  Prevention  (CDC)  has  ensured  that  airlines  can  pass 
along  to  employees  up-to-the-minute  information  on  disease  outbreaks  and  pre-
cautionary measures. 

Ramp employees face a myriad of threats as they load, service and move aircraft. 
ATA members collect and analyze detailed data related to employee injuries, as well 
as  aircraft  and  equipment  damage.  This  data-based  approach  enables  carriers  to 
identify  risks  and  take  specific  actions  to  mitigate  those  risks.  ATA  collaborates 
with other key stakeholders to lead industry-wide changes, such as publishing safe-
ty guidelines/best practices, redesigning ground support equipment to make it more 
user  friendly,  incorporating  advancements  in  personal-protection  technologies,  and 
establishing safety protocols for ramp personnel. 
Conclusion 

Notwithstanding  the  challenging  environment  in  which  airlines  operate,  the  U.S. 
airline industry has experienced the safest period in its history. While hearings like 
this allow us to proudly reflect on this accomplishment, we understand that we can-
not  become  complacent  and  rest  on  our  accomplishments.  Aviation  safety  demands 
constant  vigilance,  review  and  improvement.  For  this  reason,  we  will  continue  to 
work with the FAA, the NTSB and the many parties with a stake in the continued 
safety of our industry. ‘‘Safety first’’ will continue to be our core principle. 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. Thank you very much. 
We do have 10 minutes left. So, Kay Bailey Hutchison and I have 
decided  that  we  are  going  to  give  our  opening  statements,  which 
will  be  brief.  We  will  then  have  our  votes,  and  we  will  come  back 
loaded for bear. 

First  of  all,  it  was  very  interesting  for  me  to  hear  the  difference 
between  the  panelists.  Everything  is  just  wonderful  from  FAA’s 
point of view. I have to point out that I assume that your testimony 
was vetted by OMB before you gave it. 

said. 

Mr. SABATINI. Yes, sir, it is. 
Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  So  that  means  that  you  are  not  speaking 
what you may think, but you are speaking what the administration 
wants you to say. I say that not to embarrass you or humiliate you, 
but  simply  to  say  this  is  what  always  goes  on  and  it  is  important 
that people understand that. 

Mr.  SABATINI.  Well,  if  I  may,  Mr.  Chairman,  I  believe  what  I 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. Yes, I am sure. 
I  also  want  to  say  that  it  is  frustrating  to  me  that  during  this 
time  in  which  things,  I  think,  have  been  spiraling  downwards—I 
agree  very  much  with  you,  Mr.  Scovel  and  Mr.  Chealander—that 
there  remains  this  terrible  tension  between  FAA  and  its  unions. 
Neither  side  can  put  out  enough  press  releases  in  order  to  down-
grade the other more. Now, I have worked with lots of government 
agencies,  but  I  have  never  seen  anything  close  to  this.  One  of  our 
witnesses  today  has  an  upcoming  contract,  and  yet,  I  cannot  re-
member  seeing  that  witness  in  my  office,  or  in  my  staff’s  office  or 
his  predecessors  in  my  office  talking  about  some  of  the  problems 
which he spoke about. This is not a way of functioning. If you want 
to  deal  with  the  Commerce  Committee  and  the  Aviation  Sub-
committee, you have got to do it straight up. 

So I think the Federal Aviation Administration’s lax oversight of 
Southwest Airlines is terrible—and, as you indicated, now we have 
American  Airlines  and  others  laying  off  employees,  canceling 
flights day after day after day. It is almost like we stopped reading 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

52 

the headlines except that it is a horrible situation. It is a perfectly 
dreadful  situation.  I  think  it  is  our  job  today  to  find  out  if  these 
are just isolated incidents, as some at the FAA and Southwest con-
tend,  or  part  of  a  large,  systemic  problem  facing  both  the  agency 
and the industry. 

When it comes to safety of the air traveling public, the American 
people put their trust in you all. In recent weeks, I think that trust 
has  been  put  to  a  severe  test.  I  know  it  has  in  my  case,  with  the 
disturbing  reports  surrounding  the  lack  of  FAA  oversight  with 
Southwest, all of these cancellations that are taking place by Amer-
ican and others, and the revelations involving the FAA’s Southwest 
Regional office. 

Almost  nightly  there  are  news  stories  of  major  commercial  air-
lines  grounding  hundreds  of  flights  for  maintenance  inspections. 
All  of  a  sudden,  hundreds  of  flights.  I  do  not  know  how  you  meas-
ure  the  damage  caused  to  people  with  the  inconvenience  of  you 
doing  your  work  a  little  bit  earlier  so  that  this  does  not  happen. 
But I know that you would come out on the losing side of that bal-
ance. 

Bottom line. Each passing day brings more questions and no an-
swers.  Despite  the  growing  questions  surrounding  FAA’s  oversight 
of  the  airline  industry—and  excuse  me  for  saying  this,  it  is  not 
meant to be political, it was probably true in the previous adminis-
tration—the  White  House  and  the  Department  of  Transportation 
remain unbelievably and inexplicably silent. Silent. They just leave 
it  up  to  you  to  take  the  blame.  The  administration  should  be  as-
sembling a task force to investigate this issue. It should have done 
so  weeks  ago  and  make  recommendations  for  improving  aviation 
safety. But they do not seem to be interested. 

The FAA has taken some steps to rebuild the public’s confidence 
in  the  Agency’s  core  mission  of  maintaining  the  safety  of  the  Na-
tion’s aviation system, and moving forward, the FAA needs to take 
a  real  good  look  at  itself.  The  FAA  is  an  agency  spiraling  down-
ward  and  I  think  is  losing  the  confidence  of  the  American  people 
and  the  Congress.  So  I  think  you  have  to  take  a  look  at  yourself, 
and  you  have  to  figure  out  your  external  relationships  with  com-
mercial  air  carriers  and  how  that  contributed  to  the  current  situa-
tion. 

Many, including myself, have long criticized the Agency for being 
too  close  to  the  industry  it  regulates,  a  point  that  Mr.  Brantley 
made. It started in 1996 with the privatization of the Agency. Con-
gress  grudgingly  accepted  provisions  that  would  allow  the  FAA  to 
operate  more  like  a  business  in  the  hope  that  it  would  cost  less  to 
compete and to operate. 

Well,  the  FAA  is  not  a  business.  It  is  a  government  agency.  The 
FAA does not provide commercial services. It provides public goods, 
which  are  air  traffic  control,  aircraft  certification,  and  safety  over-
sight. We pay taxes for these services. You are not private. You are 
the result of our taxpayers’ funds and, hopefully, our oversight. 

Clearly,  it  is  time  to  start  thinking  about  FAA  differently.  To-
ward that end, we need the FAA to operate as a most efficient and 
effective government agency. It is a subtle distinction but one that 
I  think  is  incredibly  and  deeply  important.  Bringing  about  institu-
tional  change  is  never  easy,  but  when  you  have  crises  or  near  cri-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

53 

ses facing us it is necessary. Mr. Sabatini talked about how every-
thing was getting better on incursions. Then you should look at the 
last 6 months, and you would find that incursion rates are headed 
right back up. So I do not have confidence in your analysis that ev-
erything is going well and you are striving for even higher achieve-
ments. I do not buy that for 1 second. 

The  air  traveling  public  wants  solutions.  They  want  to  be  reas-
sured  that  our  Nation’s  aviation  system  is  still  the  safest  in  the 
world. No doubt, many of the witnesses will remind the Committee 
that  there  has  not  been  a  fatal  airline  accident  in  almost  2  years. 
This  argument  makes  me  mad  because  you  have  mentioned  an 
over  99  percent  rate.  We  are  working  hard  toward  that  last  1  per-
cent.  No.  You  have  got  to  get  a  100  percent  right.  You  have  got  to 
be  100  percent  right  every  single  day.  And  you  say  this  is  statis-
tically  the  safest  time  to  fly.  Well,  let  us  hope  it  stays  that  way. 
I have very serious concerns that there are an increasing number 
of  safety  challenges  facing  the  FAA  and  the  industry  that,  if  left 
unaddressed,  could  lead  to  catastrophic  accidents.  Mr.  Chealander 
mentioned this. For instance, the number of serious runway incur-
sions  remains  unacceptably  high,  and  they  are  trending  in  a  trou-
bling  direction,  i.e.,  downwards.  We  have  all  read  and  seen  stories 
of  near  misses  at  our  Nation’s  airports.  Let  us  be  honest.  Had  it 
not been for the quick thinking and actions of a few air traffic con-
trollers  and  pilots,  our  Nation  would  have  had  one,  if  not  several, 
major incidents claiming hundreds and hundreds of lives. 

So  99  percent  does  not  impress  me.  Only  100  percent  impresses 

me, and that is all you should be talking about. 

I  do  not  mean  to  be  dramatic.  I  am  being  long.  I  will,  therefore, 

conclude my statement and turn to Kay Bailey Hutchison. 
STATEMENT OF HON. KAY BAILEY HUTCHISON, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM TEXAS 

Senator HUTCHISON. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Let me say that I do think that things could be worse than they 
are right now. I do think things are bad. But worse would be if we 
had  had  a  terrible  accident  and  that  is  how  all  of  this  came  to 
light.  I  am  glad  that  it  was  not  a  terrible  accident,  but  neverthe-
less,  it  has  all  come  to  light  and  I  think  it  means  all  of  us  have 
to work together to make sure that the oversight is proper. 

I  am  looking  at  the  cancellations  of  flights.  I  have  certainly 
talked  to  the  airlines  that  are  canceling  these  flights.  And  I  know 
they are doing it out of an abundance of caution and safety should 
be  first.  Nevertheless,  the  inconvenience  to  passengers  has  to  be 
addressed very, very promptly, and when the safety inspections are 
made  and  it  is  safe,  the  airlines  need  to  do  everything  in  their 
power to help the passengers who have been stranded. And I have 
imparted that to them. 

So  I  think  we  are  now  looking  at  a  couple  of  things.  First  of  all, 
this is the Committee that has the capability to pass the FAA reau-
thorization  bill.  There  are  some  very  important  parts  of  that  bill 
that  we  need  to  have  put  in  place.  There  are  very  tough  negotia-
tions  not  yet  able  to  be  had  because  there  are  such  disagreements 
between  the  House  and  Senate,  some  disagreements  between  the 
Senate and the Senate, but mostly the House and the Senate. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

54 

I  know  Senator  Rockefeller  and  I  have  met  with  the  Acting  Ad-
ministrator  and  with  the  Secretary  of  Transportation  together.  We 
are  both  committed  to  going  forward  on  that  bill.  But  we  are  not 
going  to  move  forward  on  the  bill  if  it  is  going  to  do  more  harm 
than  good,  and  some  of  the  House  provisions  in  our  opinion  would 
make it worse than it is now to just extend it. So we will be grap-
pling with that issue. 

When  I  was  on  the  NTSB,  the  mission  of  the  FAA  was  almost 
at  cross  purposes  in  some  ways  because  it  was  the  promotion  of 
aviation  as  well  as  safety.  That  is  no  longer  the  case.  Today  it  is 
a very clear mission of the FAA, and that is safety. 

I  do  not  disagree  with  the  concept  of  the  voluntary  coming  for-
ward  approach  rather  than  the  sort  of  crime  and  punishment  ap-
proach because I think in some ways it has worked well. However, 
it  will  only  work  well  if  there  is  a  real  safeguard  in  the  system  so 
that  if  there  is  a  lessening  of  the  companies’  vigilance  on  safety, 
that  that  would  be  captured  very  quickly  and  we  would  be  able  to 
address  it  within  the  system,  meaning  the  FAA  would  be  able  to 
address it within the system. 

So I think what I would be looking for from the FAA is that safe-
guard  because  I  think  having  the  collaborative  culture  has,  in  the 
main,  been  a  good  thing,  and  I  think  most  companies  realize  that 
safety is in their best interest as well as in the public’s best inter-
est.  So  I  think  everyone  has  the  same  goal,  but  when  you  have  a 
problem  that  we  have  seen  happen  just  in  the  last  few  months 
come  to  light,  then  it  is  not  just  letting  people  come  forward  and 
be  whistleblowers  more  readily—that  is  good—but  we  need  some-
thing  that  catches  it  in  the  system  earlier  than  that  so  that  you 
would be able to detect if there was not a proper oversight. 

So  I  think  that  what  I  am  going  to  ask  and  what  I  would  like 
to  hear  from  you  is  how  you  think  we  can  address  this  issue.  Mr. 
Brantley  brought  it  out.  I  think  everyone  on  the  panel  has  ac-
knowledged  that  we  need  to  do  more  to  assure  that  the  system 
works,  but  let  us  look  at  the  ways  we  can  do  it  and  see  what  the 
FAA is going to propose and move forward together. That would be 
my goal. 

So  I  thank  all  of  you  for  coming,  and  I  will  look  forward  to  hav-
ing  questions  to  see  if  we  can  do  what  is  Congress’  responsibility 
and then what the FAA proposes to do to police itself. 

Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Senator Hutchison follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. KAY BAILEY HUTCHISON, U.S. SENATOR FROM TEXAS 
Chairman Rockefeller, thank you for convening the hearing this morning. I would 
also  like  to  welcome  our  panel.  As  a  former  Vice  Chair  of  the  NTSB,  I  intimately 
understand the crucial mission the FAA has in overseeing the Nation’s airlines and 
aviation  system.  Aviation  safety,  and  the  public  trust  that  goes  with  it,  is  the  bed-
rock of our national aviation policy and we simply cannot allow for any degradation 
of service to the flying public. 

As  we  will  hear  from  the  FAA,  the  U.S.  commercial  aviation  industry  is  experi-
encing  the  safest  period  in  history.  I  commend  the  FAA  and  the  air  carriers  for  an 
excellent accident safety record, but there is still much room for improvement. For-
tunately,  the  recent  incidents  have  involved  oversight  issues,  not  accidents  or  the 
loss  of  life.  Everyone  here  today  knows  the  stakes,  and  the  loss  of  even  one  life  is 
too  many.  There  is  always  room  for  improvement  in  aviation  safety,  and  the  FAA 
needs to take that message seriously. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

55 

The  collaborative  safety  system  between  the  FAA  and  the  air  carriers  has  been 
effective;  however,  it  is  time  for  that  system  to  evolve  into  the  next  generation  of 
the  Air  Transportation  Oversight  System  (ATOS).  The  FAA  must  make  an  earnest 
assessment  and  review  of  the  safety  foundation  it  has  made  and  make  some  dra-
matic improvements no matter how difficult they may be. 

This  Subcommittee  understands  there  is  a  fine  line  between  voluntary  disclosure 
of  safety  violations  and  the  effective  use  of  traditional  regulatory  enforcement.  I 
think the Subcommittee also understands the movement away from a simple ‘‘blame 
and  punishment’’  culture  to  a  no  penalty  collaborative  culture  has  allowed  for  sig-
nificant  strides  in  aviation  safety.  However,  the  FAA  needs  to  be  vigilant  and  take 
quick and corrective action whenever necessary, and the agency needs to strengthen 
its current regulatory role and processes. 

Whether  they  are  cultural,  policy,  or  procedural  changes,  the  FAA  needs  to  be 
open  to  change  and  progress.  I  am  increasingly  concerned  that  the  FAA  will  not 
learn from this situation and will maintain a ‘‘bunker mentality’’ instead of making 
the  safety  changes  necessary  to  improve  the  system.  I  believe  the  FAA  needs  to 
heed  the  recommendations  made  by  the  Inspector  General  and  work  with  the  IG 
to revamp and improve FAA safety policies. 

Finally, the recent incidents that occurred between the FAA and the noncompliant 
air  carriers  were  an  absolute  failure  on  both  the  FAA  and  air  carriers’  part.  Those 
directly  responsible  should  be  held  accountable;  such  poor  decisions  by  critical  em-
ployees  are  not  acceptable  in  today’s  safety  culture.  The  recent  incidents  are  an 
aviation  safety  wake-up  call  and  everyone  involved  should  use  this  opportunity  to 
improve the operation of the aviation safety system. 

Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman;  I  look  forward  to  the  testimony  and  to  working  with 

you on these important issues. 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. Thank you, Senator Hutchison. 
I  think  it  would  be  wise  if  we  went  down  and  voted  because  by 
the time we get down there, it will be time. Let us come back, and 
then  as  I  said,  members  will  be  given  7  or  8  minutes  for  ques-
tioning  as  opposed  to  5,  and  they  can  include  parts  of  their  state-
ments in their questioning if they so choose. So we stand in recess. 
Senator  STEVENS.  Senator,  I  cannot  come  back.  I  would  like  to 

make a comment, if that is all right. 
Senator ROCKEFELLER. Yes, please. 

STATEMENT OF HON. TED STEVENS, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

Senator STEVENS. I am a pilot and I have been a pilot for a long 
time.  I  think  one  of  the  things  that  the  Inspector  General  and 
those  who  are  checking  these  systems  ought  to  examine  is  the  up-
dating of the diagnostic systems. For instance, I was just reminded 
of  the  number  of  times  that  we  have  gotten  onto  an  airplane  and 
oncoming  pilots  check  the  systems.  The  diagnostic  system  shows 
there  is  a  light  on,  and  everybody  sits  and  waits  for  that  to  be 
checked. Why should that not be the job of the people who just left 
the  airplane?  The  last  pilot  operating  a  plane  ought  to  go  through 
the  systems  and  certify  that  there  are  no  lights  and  no  reason  to 
have any maintenance. 

Second,  it  does  seem  to  me  that  what  we  need  to  do  is  develop 
the  concept  that  one  of  my  friends  told  me  about,  and  that  is  that 
we have this paradigm now in the United States that we manufac-
ture  to  perfection.  Motors  are  built  to  be  100  percent  perfect,  and 
that is what the Chairman wants. But the way you check it is with 
diagnostic systems. 

You  mentioned  the  Alaska  Airline  catastrophe  off  of  California. 
I  had  friends  on  that  plane.  I  went  out  to  check  that  myself.  The 
jackscrew  was  the  responsible  item,  and  that  did  not  have  a  diag-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

56 

nostic system on it. There was no way for the pilot to tell that that 
was fouling up. In normal operation, it could foul up. 

Now,  I  do  think  what  we  ought  to  do  in  terms  of  this  concept  of 
the  ongoing  interest  in  the  operation  of  our  airlines  is  to  assure 
that  we  do  have  the  diagnostic  systems  that  maintain  the  require-
ment for 100 percent perfection. 

We  are  all  talking  about  inspections.  Very  plainly—and  I  apolo-
gize  for  it—I  do  not  think  that  the  inspections  are  what  we  ought 
to  be  concerned  with.  I  think  we  ought  to  be  concerned  with  the 
diagnostic  systems  being  in  place  and  everyone  knowing,  before 
they get on that airplane, that the systems show that the operation 
is perfect. It does seem to me we ought to catch up with technology 
and rely on technology a great deal more than we do today in this 
maintenance system. 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
[The prepared statement of Senator Stevens follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. TED STEVENS, U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

Good  morning,  my  thanks  to  Senators  Rockefeller  and  Hutchison  for  holding  to-
day’s  hearing  on  aviation  safety.  Given  the  recent  high  profile  maintenance  inci-
dents  and  the  continued  economic  woes  of  the  airline  industry,  it  has  never  been 
more crucial that our aviation safety system is operating at its highest level. 

The U.S. aviation safety system is a complex and redundant system that includes 
layers  of  coordination  between  many  stakeholders  including  the  FAA,  air  carriers, 
manufacturers,  pilots,  inspectors  and  controllers,  amongst  others.  When  the  ‘‘safety 
first’’  culture  breaks  down,  as  in  the  Southwest  Airlines  incident,  it  is  not  accept-
able. 

The FAA and all the aviation stakeholders involved have a professional and moral 
responsibility to maintain the utmost level of aviation safety. In Alaska, the aviation 
community has worked hard to create an ever improving culture of safety. As I have 
told  this  committee  many  times,  Alaska  is  dependent  on  aviation  more  than  any 
other state. With the vast spectrum and sheer amount of commercial, cargo, combi, 
and  general  aviation  in  our  state,  it  has  been  a  challenge  to  continually  improve 
our accident rates. 

Through programs like Capstone, Alaska has been able to make dramatic strides 
in  the  area  of  aviation  safety.  The  FAA  and  Alaska  aviation  industry  stakeholders 
have  set  a  long-term  goal  of  equipping  Alaska-based  aircraft  and  installing  ADS– 
B ground infrastructure to cover 90 percent of the operations in our state. By work-
ing collaboratively to reach that goal, the FAA estimates there will be a 33 percent 
reduction in fatal accidents over the next 27 years. 

In addition, because Alaska has 6 times the number of pilots per capita compared 
to the Lower 48 and 14 times the number of aircraft, the aviation community initi-
ated the medallion foundation. Medallion is a voluntary program for air carriers and 
pilots  in  Alaska  that  establishes  safety  standards  that  exceed  regulatory  require-
ments that help the Alaska aviation community detect safety trends or needs before 
actual accidents occur. 

The benefits of Capstone and Medallion would not have been realized without the 
collaboration  between  the  Alaska  aviation  stakeholders  and  the  FAA.  The  FAA  can 
learn a valuable national lesson from the Alaska example. 

While  the  process  of  change  is  almost  always  difficult  for  both  the  FAA  and  the 
stakeholders involved, the safety benefits far outweigh the angst it took to get them. 
The FAA needs to take a renewed look at the way it implements its aviation safety 
partnership programs. FAA needs to thoroughly review the recommendations of the 
DOT IG and take quick corrective action to address the problems. 

Mr. Chairman, at this time, I also have a copy of prepared written testimony from 
the  Alaska  Air  Carriers  Association  that  I  would  like  to  submit  for  the  formal 
record. I ask that it be included as part of today’s hearing [published in the Appen-
dix of this hearing record]. Thank you, I look forward to the testimony. 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. Thank you, Senator Stevens. 
Senator Inouye has some comments. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

57 

STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 

The CHAIRMAN. I thank you very much. 
Perfection may be impossible to achieve, but I agree with Chair-
man Rockefeller that it should be our goal, even knowing that per-
fection cannot be reached. 

Having  said  that,  my  first  flight  on  an  aircraft  was  in  1944  in 
Italy.  It  was  a  thrilling  experience.  Since  then  I  have  done  much 
flying. Two weeks ago, I received a certificate from one of the major 
airlines congratulating me on 3 million miles flying. And I suppose 
if  you  add  the  other  airlines  that  I  have  flown  on,  together  with 
military  aircraft,  it  must  have  exceeded  4  million  miles,  close  to  5 
million. 

The only problem that I remember, during all these hours of fly-
ing,  was  landing  in  Honolulu  from  Los  Angeles  on  two  engines. 
Two  engines  were  put  to  rest  and  we  landed  on  two.  It  was  a  per-
fect landing. No one got hurt. 

I  want  to  say  that  I  have  concluded  that  the  safest  way  of  trav-
eling is by air. I think it is much safer than going from a residence 
to the shopping center or traveling to and from work. 

But  having  said  that,  I  would  hope  that  we  will  be  able  to  do 
what  the  Chairman  suggested  and  strive  for  better  statistics,  not 
1 in 15 million flights, but maybe 1 in 50 million flights. 

So  with  that,  I  would  like  to  thank  all  of  you  for  having  done 
your best to give us safe travel. I have other concerns which I will 
ask when my time comes around. 

I do not know why, but I suppose it is culture and tradition that 
we  frown  upon  snitches  and  whistleblowers.  But  in  this  day  and 
age, whistleblowers play a very important role, and I hope you take 
them seriously. 

Thank you very much. 
[The prepared statement of Senator Inouye follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE, U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 
The  traveling  public  has  been  very  fortunate  that  despite  the  recent  publicized 
lapses  in  safety  inspections  and  maintenance,  we  are  currently  experiencing  the 
safest period in the history of aviation. 

Safety  is  the  paramount  consideration  upon  which  our  commercial  aviation  sys-
tem  was  built.  It  should  be  the  highest  priority  for  air  carriers  and  the  core  value 
for  pilots.  This  single-minded  focus  on  safety  has  served  the  U.S.  aviation  industry 
well.  And  it  must  always  serve  as  the  primary  guide  for  all  the  decisions  made  by 
the FAA. 

Unfortunately,  the  aviation  industry’s  safety  reputation  has  been  recently  tar-
nished.  Last  year,  this  Committee’s  hearing  on  the  FAA’s  oversight  of  repair  sta-
tions  raised  significant  questions  about  whether  the  agency  has  the  ability  and  the 
resources necessary to keep track of the complex, global operations of many air car-
riers. 

Equally disturbing are the recent revelations that airlines have not complied with 
a number of Airworthiness Directives. Over the past 2 days, American Airlines was 
forced  to  cancel  approximately  2,100  flights  in  order  to  re-inspect  wiring  on  their 
MD–80  aircraft.  As  a  result  of  the  incidents  reported  over  the  last  few  months,  I 
have serious concerns about the FAA’s ability to maintain a vigilant safety oversight 
program. 

It is my hope that this hearing will provide us with a better understanding of how 
these recent lapses in safety occurred and what the FAA is doing about it. The Con-
gress will not tolerate poor oversight of the safety of air travelers. 

As  we  proceed  with  the  reauthorization  of  the  FAA,  we  must  ensure  that  Con-
gress provides the agency with the resources necessary for effective oversight of our 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

58 

commercial aviation system. We must also consider what additional authorities may 
be  necessary  for  the  FAA  to  ensure  that  safety  remains  the  hallmark  of  the  U.S. 
aviation system. 

At  the  same  time,  the  FAA  must  vigorously  ensure  that  commercial  air  carriers 

are complying with their safety mandate in a thorough and timely manner. 

The traveling public may be assured that this Committee will continue to monitor 

the FAA’s and the aviation industry’s efforts to improve on its safety record. 

Senator STEVENS. Mr. Chairman, we could do a lot if we just got 
that  renewal  of  our  aviation  bill,  the  FAA  bill  out.  I  think  some  of 
the  changes  that  are  mandated  in  that  bill  would  be  very  helpful 
in this discussion. 

The CHAIRMAN. Yes, sir. 
Senator ROCKEFELLER. We stand in recess. 
[Recess.] 
Senator ROCKEFELLER. Members are returning. We had three dif-

ferent votes, which is a lot of time, and we apologize. 

I am going to go ahead with my questioning. I will start with Mr. 
Chealander.  I  made  the  comment  in  my  opening  statement  that  I 
believe  that  the  U.S.  aviation  system  may  be  operating  on  bor-
rowed time before another major accident. Do you share that view? 
Mr. CHEALANDER. I will say that, as we pointed out in our testi-
mony,  the  runway  incursion  issue  is  one  of  our  hottest  and  major 
topics. I was asked a question just a day or so ago that goes along 
with  your  question,  Senator,  and  that  is,  where  do  I  expect  the 
next  major  accident  or  incident  to  happen.  And  I  believe  it  is  in 
that area. 

We  are  working  very  hard  on  that.  I  would  not  say  that  we  are 
all  standing  around  waiting  for  the  next  shoe  to  drop,  but  we  are 
working very hard on, as was pointed out earlier, the layers of safe-
ty  and  protection  that  we  can  recommend  be  put  in  place  to  stop 
those  runway  incursions  from  being  a  catastrophic  accident.  So 
runway  incursion  I  believe  is  the  direction  that  we  are  looking  at 
the hardest to try to prevent an accident from happening. 

Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  A  question  for  Mr.  Sabatini.  You  know, 
American  Airlines  canceled  1,000  yesterday,  900  today.  I  do  not 
know  what  all  the  other  scores  are  because  I  did  not  really  have 
a  chance  to  read  the  newspapers.  But  it  is  catastrophic  economi-
cally,  and  it  is  an  embarrassment  to  the  Nation.  I  cannot  imagine 
what  people  in  Indonesia  or  Japan  are  thinking  about  this.  Some 
people  would  say  I  do  not  care.  I  do  care  because  it  is  who  we  are 
as a Nation, and it does not strike me as impressive right now. 

American  Airlines  recently  grounded  its  fleet  of  MD–80  aircraft 
for a second time. Other carriers have done the same thing to make 
sure  they  were  in  full  compliance  with  FAA  regulations.  This  has, 
obviously,  caused  a  volcanic  disruption  which,  in  and  of  itself,  is 
unthinkably uncouth. 

If the FAA had conducted more regular and frequent compliance 
audits on the industry, would you have caught these problems ear-
lier, and had you caught them, would there have been less disrup-
tion for consumers? 

Mr. SABATINI. Mr. Chairman, that of course, would be a specula-

tion on my part, what would have happened. 

But  I  can  tell  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  that  this  is  a  system  where 
I  have  3,800  FAA  inspectors  and  there  are  hundreds  of  thousands 
of  safety  professionals  in  the  industry  who  have  the  primary  re-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

59 

sponsibility  of  the  compliance.  Our  oversight  system  is  one  of  as-
suring  compliance.  We  have  put  in  place  the  ATOS  system,  which 
is  far  more  robust  in  identifying  these  areas.  We  identified  them 
as  areas  of  risk.  And  we  are  at  a  point  in  time  talking  about—— 
Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  You  are  not  answering  my  question.  You 
do  understand  that.  I  did  not  ask  you  about  what  you  are  doing 
to prevent this from happening. I am asking if you had done a bet-
ter  job  before,  would  some  of  these  cancellations  have  been  fore-
stalled? 

Mr.  SABATINI.—if  this  had  been  identified  at  another  point  in 
time, I believe the outcome would have been the same. The carrier 
was not in compliance with an Airworthiness Directive. We brought 
that to their attention, and they made the right decision. They put 
those  aircraft  on  the  ground  until  they  could  demonstrate  compli-
ance. 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. Yes, they did, but the fault did not all lie 

with them. I would just say that for the moment. 

Let  me  go  on  as  you  defend  the  FAA.  You  have  stated  that 
Southwest  improprieties  and  safety  violations,  including  missing 
structural  inspections  on  46  jets,  resulted  from  a  ‘‘failure  on  the 
part  of  the  leadership  at  the  regional  level.’’  That  makes  me  want 
to ask a couple questions. 

What  responsibility  do  you  bear?  What  responsibility  does  the 
senior  leadership  of  the  FAA  bear  for  letting  this  situation  spiral 
out  of  control?  Is  this  one  of  those  things  like  Abu  Ghraib  where 
you  sort  of  get  rid  of  the  people  way  down  low,  but  nobody  up  top 
ever  has  to  be  accountable?  What  responsibility  do  you  bear  for 
this? 

Mr.  SABATINI.  I  am  ultimately  responsible  for  the  safety  organi-
zation,  sir,  and  I  am  taking  all  the  action  that  I  need  to  take  to 
address  what  we  have  learned.  That  was  a  failure,  as  I  have  said, 
on  the  part  of  people,  people  who  failed  to  discharge  their  duties 
as they are required to on both the FAA side and on the air carrier 
side. 

Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  So  you  are  responsible,  but  you  do  not 
have to take responsibility. You do not have to be accountable. You 
are responsible, you do not have to be accountable. 

Mr. SABATINI. I am accountable, sir. 
Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  Well,  if  you  are  accountable,  you  should 
have  been  howling  in  my  office  and  Kay  Bailey  Hutchison’s  office 
some time ago. It just gets into that whole syndrome of where pun-
ishment should occur. If you want to punish somebody, you punish 
individuals at a lower level and always refer to a regional problem. 
It  is  never  your  fault.  It  is  a  regional  problem.  Well,  the  regional 
problem  is,  in  fact,  FAA  headquarters  because  you  control  the  re-
gion. So I am not satisfied by your answer, but I will go ahead. 

What responsibility do you and the senior leadership of the FAA 

bear for letting this situation spiral out of control? 

Mr. SABATINI. I am not sure exactly what it is that you want me 
to say, Mr. Chairman. I am accountable and I am responsible, and 
I  take  my  responsibilities  very  seriously.  I  have  been  a  safety  pro-
fessional  my  entire  adult  life.  I  have  been  in  public  service  and 
have  been  dedicated  to  public  service  and  I  accept  that  responsi-
bility.  And  I  want  you  to  know  that  I  take  what  has  happened 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

60 

very, very seriously. I am not a theorist about safety. I have start-
ed  in  this  organization  as  an  inspector.  I  know  the  business  from 
the  bottom  up  and  I  take  what  happened  very,  very  seriously,  sir. 
And I do hold myself accountable. 

Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  Sometimes  when  people  have  been  in  of-
fice  for  a  very  long  time  and  they  have  worked  very  hard  to  work 
their way up through the bureaucratic ranks so they can get to be 
in  a  position  as  high  as  you,  they  have  to  make  certain  com-
promises.  I  am  not  saying  that  you  have,  but  I  am,  nevertheless, 
putting that out there. 

Why  did  other  senior  leadership  in  Washington  not  step  in  and 
address the severe management problems at the Southwest Region 
office? 

Mr.  SABATINI.  We  did,  immediately  upon  it  coming  to  our  atten-
tion. When we became aware of what was going on and the gravity 
of  what  was  taking  place,  we  took  the  action  that  we  could  take. 
Senator ROCKEFELLER. Well, Mr. Stuckey was the head of the re-
gional  Flight  Standards  office  who  supervised  government  inspec-
tors  assigned  to  Southwest.  He  works  for  the  FAA,  for  you.  You 
have  removed  him  from  all  safety  oversight  responsibilities  and 
transferred  him  who  knows  where.  Yet,  he  remains  on  the  FAA’s 
payroll.  Now  that  may  be  because  you  have  due  process  in  terms 
of  terminating  employees.  So  I  also  assume  that  once  this  process 
is completed, he will no longer be an FAA employee. Am I correct? 
Mr.  SABATINI.  Well,  let  me  make  a  statement,  sir,  that  does  not 
prejudice  any  future  outcome.  We  are  looking  into  this  and  inves-
tigating  it  thoroughly.  I  would  not  want  to  prejudice  a  future  out-
come.  As  you  well  know,  in  civil  service,  everyone  has  rights,  and 
we have got to honor those rights. 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. It sounds very much like the Department 
of Defense where nobody at the top ever gets fired. No three stars, 
no four stars, just people lower down. 

My follow up question, then I will stop. Will the FAA act against 
any  other  senior  managers  in  headquarters  office?  And  if  not,  why 
not? You are accountable. You are responsible. 

Mr.  SABATINI.  I  will  say  again,  sir,  that  we  will  examine  every-
thing surrounding this circumstance and we will take whatever ac-
tion needs to be taken. 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. Yes. I have been told to move on. 
Senator Hutchison? 
Senator HUTCHISON. I want to clarify with Mr. Sabatini that the 
regional administrator of the FAA who was responsible for the inci-
dent with Southwest Airlines has been removed. Is that correct? 

Mr.  SABATINI.  He  has  been  relieved  of  the  duties  he  had  in  the 
Flight  Standards  Division,  which  would  be  the  ranking  senior  per-
son in the Flight Standards Division in the Southwest Region. 

Senator  HUTCHISON.  Correct.  And  there  would  be  nothing  that 
you  could  do  that  would  overcome  your  legal  requirements  to  give 
that  person  all  of  the  due  process  that  the  law  requires,  which  is 
why  you  could  not  say  he  has  been  fired  or  would  be  fired  at  this 
time. Is that correct? 

Mr. SABATINI. That is correct. 
Senator  HUTCHISON.  Let  me  ask  you  this  because  I  think,  from 
what  I  have  learned,  that  the  issue  is  being  addressed  after  the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

61 

fact  with  what  happened  between  Southwest  and  the  FAA.  How-
ever,  I  do  want  to  ask  you  to  be  more  specific—and  others  on  the 
panel may come in on this—about what would be the trigger in the 
procedures  that  would  allow  this  to  come  forward  much  earlier 
than it did with the Southwest case? 

Mr.  SABATINI.  Well,  Senator  Hutchison,  you  made  a  very  impor-
tant  comment  in  your  opening  statement.  We  are  here  today  not 
post-accident, but at a point in time where the system is incredibly 
safe. And I also said it is that tiny little percentage that keeps me 
awake at night continuing to look for remaining risks. 

This  is  an  opportunity  that  has  been  brought  to  our  attention 
and  which  was  a  failure  and  requires  attention.  What  we  have  re-
alized  about  what  happened  at  Southwest  is  that  people  who  have 
a  safety  concern  did  not  have  a  direct  mechanism  to  elevate  it  to 
people like myself. 

I  am  putting  in  place  a  system  where  it  is  going  to  be  docu-
mented  with  a  control  number.  Any  safety  professional  working  at 
any level in our organization can feel free, without fear of repercus-
sion,  to  come  forward  and  document  what  it  is  that  they  want  to 
have discussed, entitled to resolution, and if not resolution, then it 
continues  to  be  elevated  all  the  way  up  to  me.  It  will  be  subject 
to  a  review  and  we  will  hold  people  accountable  that  this  process 
works. It will be finalized by the end of April, and it will guarantee 
that people in a safety culture like ours will be encouraged to come 
forward to express their concerns. We have an organization of very 
experienced  people  who  have  safety  backgrounds  and  have  dif-
ferences  of  opinion.  We  need  to  be  sure  that  we  resolve  those  dif-
ferences  of  opinion  in  a  constructive  manner  because  we  want  to 
better serve the public. 

Senator HUTCHISON. I want to bring up one other point, and then 
I  want  to  ask  anyone  else  on  the  panel  who  would  wish  to  speak 
on  this.  At  this  point,  is  it  correct  that  a  person  who  works  for  a 
company  cannot  go  into  the  FAA  system  and  oversee  or  be  in  the 
process  of  overseeing  that  same  company  for  a  period  of  2  years? 
Is that correct? 

Mr. SABATINI. That is true. 
Senator  HUTCHISON.  Do  you  think  that  there  should  be  a  com-
plete ban on that capability, or do you think there should be a dif-
ferent  number  of  years  beyond  which  a  person  could  then  go  back 
and work with the company from which they came and are now on 
the other side of the safety inspection process? 

Mr.  SABATINI.  We  are  going  to  initiate  a  rulemaking  project 
which  will  address  that,  Senator.  We  are  going  to  basically  have  a 
rule that will prevent a person who would be a former FAA person 
to  be  hired  by  an  air  carrier  and  then  have  direct  interface  with 
the  FAA.  We  are  looking  for  a  2-year  moratorium  before  that  per-
son  can  have  interaction  with  the  FAA  if  they  have  been  a  former 
FAA employee. 

Senator  HUTCHISON.  But  are  you  looking  at  keeping  2  years  as 

the time? 

Mr.  SABATINI.  Well,  currently  people  that  we  employ  who  come 
from  the  industry  have  a  2-year  moratorium  before  they  can  have 
any  direct  oversight  responsibility  of  a  previous  employer.  We  are 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

62 

going  to  basically  just  have  a  mirror  image  of  that  when  someone 
leaves the FAA. 

Senator  HUTCHISON.  And  you  think  2  years  is  the  right  amount 

Mr. SABATINI. I believe it is. I think history has shown that that 

seems to be an adequate period of time. 

of years? 

just—— 

Senator  HUTCHISON.  I  would  like  to  have  any  other  views  on 

that. Mr. Brantley or Mr. Chealander? 

Mr. BRANTLEY. Senator, yes. We do believe that having the same 
cooling-off period going both ways would be appropriate, and some-
thing in the 2- to 3-year time-frame would be adequate, yes. 

Senator  HUTCHISON.  And  do  you  think  that  a  complete  ban 

would be not reasonable, not realistic? 

Mr.  BRANTLEY.  By  complete,  are  you  referring  to  no  timeframe, 

Senator  HUTCHISON.  Just  that  a  person  who  comes  either  way, 
industry to FAA or FAA to industry, that it would not be the same 
company ever. Is that not realistic? 

Mr. BRANTLEY.—to be honest, I had not considered that, but that 
is certainly a possibility. It is not as if there are not plenty of other 
companies  to  work  for  or  to  do  oversight  on.  So  I  would  consider 
that and get back to you. 

Senator HUTCHISON. We would have to think it through, I know, 
but  I  just  wondered  if  there  are  enough  professionals  capable  of 
going either way. But I think we ought to look at—if you are going 
to  do  a  rulemaking  at  2  years,  I  think  we  should  certainly  look  at 
comments on whether that is the realistic time. 

Mr. Chealander, did you have anything to add to that? 
Mr.  CHEALANDER.  Only  that  in  my  own  instance,  which  is  about 
all I can draw on because from the NTSB’s purview, we do not in-
vestigate accidents and find whether a moratorium on employment 
was  an  issue  or  not,  nor  do  we  any  data  to  identify  that.  But  in 
my situation, for instance, coming from private industry, an airline 
in  specific,  and  coming  to  the  Federal  Government  and  the  NTSB, 
I had to sign an ethics agreement that recused me from that airline 
for  ethical  reasons.  So  I  can  just  only  cite  the  example  of  myself 
and  use  that  in  the  thinking  as  to  whether  or  not  that  is  a  good 
idea. 

Senator HUTCHISON. Thank you very much. 
Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Senator ROCKEFELLER. Thank you, Senator Hutchison. 
Senator Lautenberg actually came in. So, Senator, you are up. 

STATEMENT OF HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM NEW JERSEY 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Thanks very much, Mr. Chairman. I would 
like  to  proceed  first  with  my  opening  statement.  As  I  understand 
it,  we  will  have  the  questions  included  in  the  same  timeframe.  So 
I thank you, Mr. Chairman. 

Since  we  are  now  discussing  some  things  that  I  have  talked 
about on a continuing basis, I appreciate the fact that we have got 
a  chance  to  review  some  of  the  specifics.  Some  of  them  are  so  cur-
rent that it is hard to believe that, though the reasons for the prob-
lems were obvious, so little was done at the FAA. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

63 

Every  day  more  than  2  million  men,  women,  and  children  board 
planes  across  America  with  a  trust  and  an  expectation  that  those 
airplanes in our aviation system are safe. 

And  Mr.  Sabatini,  I  refer  to  some  part  of  your  testimony.  You 
said a total 1,451 commercial operations were conducted by South-
west  Airlines  in  violation  of  the  law,  putting  thousands  of  people 
at risk. And I want to keep that in mind as we go further because 
that issue does not square with the activities of FAA and with the 
safety inspectors. 

The Bush administration’s FAA has abused trust by putting peo-
ple’s  time  and  their  safety  at  unnecessary  risk.  Now,  some  may 
argue,  as  you  said,  that  this  has  been  one  of  the  safest  periods  in 
aviation  history.  Thank  goodness  it  has  happened,  but  it  has  hap-
pened in spite of FAA policies, not because of them. 

Far  too  often  we  have  had  to  rely  on  quick  actions  of  pilots,  air 
traffic controllers, other professionals, even people who are working 
for  the  airlines  on  the  ground  to  keep  our  families  safe.  We  also 
had the benefit of some improved technology over these last years, 
some of it fairly small in terms of increments, but nevertheless im-
portant, and we have to continue that. 

But we have seen record flight delays, increases in near collisions 
on  our  runways,  understaffing  of  controllers  and  safety  inspectors. 
And  the  FAA  has  mismanaged  the  redesign  of  the  New  Jersey- 
New York airspace, and that has led to planes flying in the wrong 
direction  over  a  highly  congested  region,  creating  potential  safety 
problems. 

Recently we have seen disturbing reports about safety inspection 
failures,  letting  planes  filled  with  passengers  take  off  with  cracks 
in their hulls. These failures were not isolated to just a few planes, 
as  now  we  all  know.  In  fact,  one  airline  alone  missed  hull  inspec-
tions on 47 different airplanes. 

Similar inspection failures have caused five of our country’s larg-
est  airlines  to  cancel  thousands  of  flights,  most  recently  American 
Airlines,  with  over  2,000  flights  canceled.  The  pattern  is  not  only 
disturbing,  but  obviously,  it  is  unacceptable.  There  are  several 
pending  investigations  of  these  failures,  including  ones  by  the  In-
spector  General,  the  FBI,  and  Congress.  And  I  look  forward  to 
hearing their findings and to acting upon them. 

Mr. Chairman, I regret to say that this is a management failure 
at the highest level of the FAA, but instead of providing innovative 
leadership  and  changing  the  way  the  agency  does  business,  Presi-
dent  Bush  is  opting  for  more  of  the  same.  And  he  has  nominated 
Robert  Sturgell,  FAA’s  second  in  command  for  the  past  5  years,  to 
take  over  at  the  agency.  Now,  I  do  not  get  that,  I  must  tell  you. 
Mr. Sturgell has to be held accountable, not promoted. 

And these recent problems also make it clear that we must pass 
a  reauthorization  bill  for  the  FAA  pretty  soon.  Chairman  Rocke-
feller  has  worked  hard  on  this  subcommittee  and  the  full  Com-
merce  Committee  to  accomplish  this  goal,  and  I  applaud  your  ef-
forts.  And  I  am  going  to  do  my  part  to  get  that  bill  passed,  which 
I  hope  will  include  runway  safety  legislation  that  I  have  proposed 
for some time now, and will soon introduce. 

I  thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  for  the  opportunity  to  move  along 

with this. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00067 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

64 

Since  2003,  Mr.  Sabatini,  the  FAA’s  customer  service  initiative 
has let airlines blow the whistle on who they think are bad inspec-
tors,  but  it  took  until  last  week  for  the  FAA  to  create  a  way  for 
its own inspectors to blow the whistle on bad airlines. Why has the 
FAA  been  putting  the  concerns  of  the  airlines  ahead  of  the  con-
cerns  of  your  own  safety  inspectors?  I  do  not  get  it.  Please  tell  me 
why. 

Mr. SABATINI. Mr. Chairman, our primary motivation here is the 
safety of the public. We absolutely know that the public is our cus-
tomer. 

And  I  believe  there  is  a  misunderstanding  about  the  customer 
service  initiative.  I  will  be  very  happy  to  change  the  name  of  this 
initiative, but it was primarily designed, sir, so that we could have 
consistency.  What  was  known  about  our  organization  is  that  you 
could  have  one  decision  made  on  the  East  Coast,  for  example,  and 
on the very same regulation, a different decision made on the West 
Coast. And we need to be consistent and standardized. And that is 
the purpose of that initiative, that any decision made anywhere in 
our organization by the FAA needs to be consistently applied every-
where  throughout  the  system.  It  was  not  intended  nor  ever  de-
signed to allow people to complain to have inspectors removed from 
their areas of responsibility. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Well,  it  certainly  has  not  encouraged  peo-
ple  to  blow  the  whistle,  people  who  have  no  funded  interest  in 
these things. 

Mr. Brantley, do you have a comment to add on this? 
Mr. BRANTLEY. Yes, thank you, Senator. I think regardless of the 
intent  when  it  was  developed,  the  customer  service  initiative  has 
become  a  bit  of  a  weapon  rather  than  a  tool  for  inspectors.  And  I 
would  be  hard-pressed  to  imagine  how  any  kind  of  good  is  coming 
out of it at this point because people do not trust it, the inspectors 
that should be able to rely on it to help them. 

I  think  one  big  thing  not  to  overlook—and  I  think  you  alluded 
to  it,  Mr.  Chairman—there  is  a  culture,  a  philosophy  within  the 
FAA right now that encourages this type of activity. And until that 
changes,  all  the  programs,  all  the  hotlines  in  the  world  will  not 
make a bit of difference. People right now feel they do not have the 
right to speak out, and if they do, they will be targeted. And adding 
another hotline will not help that. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Thanks, Mr. Chairman. 
Senator ROCKEFELLER. Thank you, Senator Lautenberg. 
Senator Klobuchar? 
Senator KLOBUCHAR. Are we going every other one? I am glad to 

go. I just wondered if it was Senator Snowe’s turn. 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. Do you want to fight? 
[Laughter.] 
Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  No.  I  think  in  the  proper  order  that  per-

haps she would go. 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. Were you here first? 
Senator SNOWE. Yes. 
Senator KLOBUCHAR. Yes. 
Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  Then  Senator  Snowe.  The  Chairman 

made a mistake. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00068 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

65 

STATEMENT OF HON. OLYMPIA J. SNOWE, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM MAINE 

Senator  SNOWE.  I  thank  the  Senator.  See,  there  are  senatorial 

courtesies. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 

I want to thank you all for being here. 
This is, obviously, a crucial hearing with respect to aviation safe-
ty,  without  question.  I  think  we  are  all  stunned  by,  I  think,  the 
breath-taking  lapses  in  leadership  in  enforcing  safety  standards 
within the FAA. 

We have had this debate within this committee, I well remember, 
10  years  ago  after  the  crash  of  ValuJet.  We  debated  and  I  was 
championing  the  initiative  about  eliminating  the  dual  mandate 
within  the  FAA  charter  to  promote  the  aviation  industry,  but  at 
the  same  time,  it  had  the  responsibility  for  being  dedicated  to  up-
holding  safety  standards.  And  it  seemed  to  be  conflicting  and  con-
tradictory  missions  and  responsibilities,  and  I  wanted  them  to 
transferred to other offices in the Department of Transportation so 
that the FAA could singularly focus on the question of safety. 

And  I  see  a  systemic  breakdown  here,  as  I  think  has  already 
been  illustrated  in  Mr.  Scovel’s,  Mr.  Chealander’s,  Mr.  Brantley’s 
testimony.  I  know,  Mr.  Sabatini,  you  indicated  in  your  remarks 
that  this  is  an  isolated  incident,  but  I  certainly  do  not  see  it  that 
way. 

I  think  at  the  heart  of  the  problem  is  the  culture  at  FAA,  and 
hearing here today not only that—the whole idea on Southwest and 
then  it  is  Northwest—I  mean,  the  breadth  of  the  problem  and  the 
dimensions of the problem and the fact that inspectors were fearful 
bringing  to  superiors’  attention,  and  when  they  did,  they  feared 
penalties.  They  had  to  resort  to  whistleblower  protections  in  order 
to do their jobs. I mean, that is unconscionable. 

So there is a breakdown. There is a breakdown within FAA, and 
the  sooner  that  you  and  all  the  leadership  at  FAA  recognize  that, 
the better off we will be and, more importantly, the passengers who 
are flying across this country by the millions. 

I mean, that is what we have to deal with now because it is clear 
that passenger safety was put at risk. I mean, when 46 Southwest 
Airline  aircraft  were  flying  even  in  spite  of  failing  inspections  and 
even was encouraged to fly by a supervisor, I think it is an indica-
tion  of  the  depth  of  the  problem  within  FAA.  It  is  not  an  isolated 
incident. 

And  in  looking  at  the  Inspector  General’s  testimony  and  report, 
it seems to me it speaks volumes about the actions that need to be 
taken  to  reverse  the  situation  within  FAA.  I  would  like  to  hear 
from  you  today  that  you  are  going  to  embrace  those  recommenda-
tions  and  going  to  reverse  the  situation  within  FAA  because  if  it 
is a collaborative, cozy relationship which, by all indications, it ap-
pears  to  be  and  that  safety  was  placed  secondary  to  all  other 
issues,  whether  or  not  to  allow  airlines  to  avoid  penalties  through 
the self-disclosure mechanism, whether or not to rely on self-disclo-
sure,  knowing  full  well  that  the  FAA  inspectors  were  not  con-
ducting those inspections. When more than 70 percent, I think Mr. 
Brantley  indicated,  were  sitting  at  their  desks  rather  than  con-
ducting the inspections, we truly have a major problem. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00069 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

66 

And  I  think  more  than  anything  else,  in  order  to  rectify  a  prob-
lem,  you  have  got  to  recognize  it,  acknowledge  it,  understand  it, 
and do something about it. And I hope that in this hearing and the 
other  hearings  that  you  are  a  part  of,  that  you  will  express  that 
because  if  you  do  not,  then  we  are  going  to  continue  to  have  the 
problems that are pervading FAA today. And that is just the begin-
ning. 

I  mean,  we  not  only  have  a  lack  of  inspectors,  but  we  are  also 
deficient  in  air  traffic  controllers.  I  know  that  has  happened  in 
Maine,  but  it  is  throughout  the  country.  Many  of  them  are  going 
to be retiring and they are retiring in unprecedented numbers, and 
many  of  the  trainees  are  being  rushed  through  a  program  without 
understanding the comprehensive dimensions of the air traffic con-
trol  system.  If  you  have  a  lack  of  inspectors,  which  has  basically 
been  the  backdrop  for  the  safety  regime  within  the  FAA,  and  now 
that we are learning all that we are currently, clearly this is a cri-
sis. 

So  I  would  like  to  have  you  explain  to  me  exactly  how  FAA  is 
going to go about redressing these issues and accepting the Inspec-
tor General’s recommendations. What steps are going to be specifi-
cally  taken  in  order  to  address  that?  Because  clearly,  it  is  a  cul-
tural  problem.  Before  it  was  promoting  the  aviation  industry  and 
also doing the dual responsibility of upholding safety standards. 

Now  it  is  the  customer  service  initiative  that,  obviously,  is  com-
plicating  matters  here.  It  is  one  thing  to  have  a  working  relation-
ship  with  the  aviation  industry,  but  you  can  never  lose  sight  of 
your  primary  mission  and  what  the  intent  and  purpose  is  of  the 
FAA  and  what  your  responsibilities  are  designed  to  do  and  to  up-
hold, given what is at stake. 

So  what  do  you  intend  to  do  within  your  position  at  FAA  to  em-
brace the Inspector General’s report and all the other recommenda-
tions  that  have  been  made  here  today  with  respect  to  what  has 
happened within the FAA? 

Mr. SABATINI. Thank you, Senator. 
I would first like to say that my organization is the largest it has 
ever  been,  thanks  to  the  help  of  the  Congress  in  getting  us  to  the 
size  of  an  organization  that  we  are  today.  Over  the  past  3  years, 
we  have  added  over  400  people,  about  430  people,  to  the  FAA  in-
spector ranks. 

And  I  will  tell  you  that  what  we  see  in  terms  of  real  evidence 
of what failed, it happened in the Southwest Region. Please do not 
take  that  to  mean  that  I  am  discounting  that  it  could  potentially 
be  happening  elsewhere.  No  one  today  has  provided  me  the  objec-
tive evidence to, in fact, say it has. 

But having said that, I can assure you that I am addressing this 
from  a  systems  perspective.  I  am  going  to  put  in  place,  as  I  men-
tioned earlier, a process. Some may not like it in terms of referring 
to it as just another hotline. It is not. I will hold myself and every 
person in the management chain of command accountable to assure 
that we have an atmosphere where inspectors, safety professionals 
can  come  forward  and  air  their  differences  and  have  it  resolved. 
And  I  will  have  a  process  in  place  that  will  assure  regular  review 
of  these  situations  that  arise.  They  will  have  control  numbers  and 
they will be known to me. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00070 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

67 

I will also put in place, as I have mentioned, actually requesting 
a project for rulemaking, and that is, requiring that inspectors who 
are  hired  by  an  air  carrier  cannot  have  direct  interaction  with  the 
FAA for a 2-year period. 

And  we  are  going  to  change  how  a  voluntary  safety  disclosure 
can  be  given  to  the  FAA.  We  are  going  to  require  that  only  people 
who  are  officials,  high  level  officials,  in  the  airline  can  be  the  per-
sons who can come forward to the FAA and submit a self-disclosure 
that  has  not  been  previously  known  to  the  FAA.  And  on  the  FAA 
side, we are going to require that only an office manager can accept 
that. And those will be subjected to review. 

As far as Airworthiness Directives, which, as you well know, are 
very  technical  and  complex  engineering  documents,  what  we  have 
learned  here  is  that  there  are  technical  interpretations,  but  you 
have  got  to  be  fully  compliant.  You  cannot  just  be  a  little  bit  com-
pliant. And that is basically what you are seeing here with carriers 
canceling some flights. They must be in compliance. 

So  we  are  going  to  review  that  entire  process  and  have  greater 
involvement  so  that  we  do  not  face  this  kind  of  a  situation  again. 
Senator  SNOWE.  May  I  ask,  Mr.  Scovel?  Because  I  think  this  is 
a  critical  issue  as  to  whether  or  not  you  feel  that  FAA  is  on  track 
to  adopt  many  of  the  recommendations  that  you  have  made  and 
many  of  the  issues  that  you  have  disclosed  within  your  report  be-
cause this wink and a nod by inspectors and supervisors within the 
FAA is clearly disturbing when it comes to what the potential down 
side  would  have  been  for  placing  people  in  life-threatening  situa-
tions. 

Mr.  SCOVEL.  Thank  you,  Senator.  I  appreciate  that  you  have 
clearly  read  our  testimony  and  endorsed  our  recommendations. 
They  were  very  carefully  planned  as  a  ‘‘road  map’’  for  FAA  to  im-
prove  safety  oversight.  We  believe  the  Agency  can  do  so,  but  it  re-
quires  will,  and  we  have  seen  on  too  many  occasions,  as  you  just 
put  it,  a  wink  and  a  nod  from  FAA  instead  of  a  demonstration  of 
true will. 

My  testimony  references  a  couple  of  our  reports  that  examined 
the  ATOS  system  and  its  nationwide  implementation.  In  2002,  we 
reported that CMOs were inconsistently applying the ATOS system 
across  the  country.  We  recommended  that  FAA  provide  stronger 
national  oversight  and  implementation  and  we  were  assured  in 
2002  that  the  newly  appointed  Flight  Standards  Division  Director 
would undertake that responsibility. It did not happen. 

In 2005, we again examined the ATOS system and found that 26 
percent  of  key  inspections  were  not  conducted  and  that  half  of 
those were in risk areas. Our recommendation was the same as in 
2002: FAA needs to provide national oversight and should not push 
it  down  to  the  region  or  decentralize  it  to  autonomous  CMO’s.  In-
stead,  FAA  should  bring  it  up  to  the  national  level  and  exercise 
some control. That recommendation from 2005 remains open. 

Had  FAA  implemented  our  recommendations  from  2002  and 
2005,  it  is  possible  that  we  would  not  be  here  today  because 
Southwest’s  AD  compliance  program  would  have  been  included  in 
a  robust  national  oversight  program  to  help  FAA  follow  its  own 
procedures with regard to ATOS. 

Senator SNOWE. Thank you, Mr. Chairman, and thank you. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00071 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

68 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. Thank you, Senator Snowe. 
Senator Klobuchar? 

STATEMENT OF HON. AMY KLOBUCHAR, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM MINNESOTA 
Senator KLOBUCHAR. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
This hearing comes at a critical time for the FAA with the recent 
GAO  report  that  revealed  that  air  travelers  really  do  face  a  high 
risk of catastrophic collision on U.S. airport runways. It highlighted 
the  malfunctioning  technology.  It  highlighted  the  issues  with  the 
FAA, as well as overworked air traffic controllers. 

On  top  of  the  study,  in  recent  weeks  we  have  learned  of  aircraft 
skidding off of runways and crossed wire sections and pieces of air-
planes falling off in mid-air. 

Most  recently  we  learned  of  the  Southwest  issue  with  nearly  50 

planes in need of required inspections for fuselage cracks. 

And  just  yesterday,  American  Airlines  grounded  1,000  planes, 
and today they have canceled more than 900 additional planes. All 
of this in order to double back and conduct inspections that should 
have been done as a matter of routine. 

The  disclosure  of  these  safety  lapses  and  the  thousands  of  flight 
cancellations—you  just  turn  on  any  news  program  today  and  you 
see the people stranded there—leads to questions about the current 
inspection policy. 

Now,  as  I  understand  it,  this  voluntary  inspection  policy  has 
some  merit,  but  it  was  designed  to  go  hand  in  hand  with  rigorous 
enforcement. Unfortunately, in recent weeks we have heard, as Mr. 
Scovel  described  it,  of  an  overly  collaborative  or,  some  might  say, 
cozy  relationship  between  the  inspectors  and  those  that  they  are 
supposed to enforce the law against. And to some inspectors’ views, 
the  FAA  considered  these  airlines  to  be  their  customers.  And  I 
think  one  underlying  principle  that  has  to  be  clear  here  is  the 
American public is the customer and not the airlines. 

So  with  that  in  mind,  one  of  the  things  I  wanted  to  know  from 
you, Mr. Sabatini, is do you think it is time for some soul-searching 
like  we  had  after  some  of  the  crashes  in  the  mid-1990s  to  make 
some changes? 

Mr.  SABATINI.  The  safety  model  is  always  subject  to  review,  and 
it is an ongoing 24/7/365 activity not just by the FAA but the other 
safety  professionals  in  the  industry.  And  I  want  to  make  it  clear 
we know that the public is our customer and that safety of that fly-
ing public is what we are addressing each and every day. 

And if you take a look at what happened since 1997, we have sig-
nificantly  reduced  the  accident  rate  to  where  we  are  today.  And 
again,  that  is  not  to  rest  on  our  laurels.  It  is  just  that  you  have 
to know history to understand where you are going into the future, 
and  the  safety  model  is  a  very  good  model.  Can  it  be  improved?  It 
absolutely can. I take this as an opportunity to learn more, and we 
are taking steps. 

And I would like to address what the Inspector General said. He 
has  proposed  certain  initiatives  to  undertake.  We  are  undertaking 
most  of  those,  and  I  would  also  like  to,  for  the  record,  say  that  we 
have  made  a  change  in  one  of  those  recommendations  that  were 
brought to our attention in 2002 and 2005. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00072 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

69 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  But  I  think  Mr.  Scovel’s  point  was—I  do 
not  want  to  put  words  in  his  mouth—that  some  of  these  rec-
ommendations  were  made  before.  They  were  not  followed.  I  guess 
I  would  ask  Mr.  Scovel.  You  heard  what  Mr.  Sabatini  said.  I  went 
through  all  of  your  recommendations.  One  was  that  there  should 
be  a  cooling-off  period.  Do  you  think  that  his  proposal  addresses 
that? 

Mr.  SCOVEL.  It  will.  Of  course,  we  will  need  to  examine  the  de-
tails.  We  think  it  is  the  key  one  because,  again,  it  comes  straight 
from  the  Southwest  incident,  in  which  an  FAA  inspector  went  to 
work for the airline he used to oversee in September 2006. Shortly 
after that, there were AD overflights or violations reported to FAA 
under the Voluntary Disclosure Reporting Program. 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  And  how  about  this  idea  that  you  rotate 
where the inspectors are? Do you think Mr. Sabatini has addressed 
this? 

Mr. SCOVEL. We intend to work that out. 
Senator KLOBUCHAR. So he has not addressed that yet. 
Mr.  SCOVEL.  We  have  discussed  it.  In  fact,  he  and  I  have  talked 
on  the  telephone  at  least  twice  in  the  last  week  since  our  appear-
ance  together  over  on  the  House  side.  We  understand  that  there 
are union concerns and contract concerns with FAA when it comes 
to their inspectors. 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  One  of  the  things  that  I  have  heard  about 
is this gaming of the inspection process. For instance, the FAA may 
tell  the  airline  on  Monday  they  are  going  to  inspect  it  on  Wednes-
day, and the airline then discloses its safety problems on Tuesday. 
And  the  airline  then  avoids  the  penalty  under  the  Voluntary  Dis-
closure Reporting Program. 

Do  you  see  this  as  a  problem?  I  guess  I  would  like  both  of  you 

to address that. 

Mr.  SCOVEL.  I  can  say  that  there  is  certainly  the  appearance  of 
that  at  Southwest.  We  have  not  been  able  to  determine  that  exact 
sequence. Customarily, I know that. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. But if it was occurring, would you see that 

as a problem? 

Mr. SCOVEL. Absolutely. 
Senator KLOBUCHAR. Mr. Sabatini? 
Mr.  SABATINI.  If  that  was  occurring,  I  would  absolutely  agree 
with  the  Inspector  General.  That  is  a  problem.  But  the  guidance 
is very clear, and we are going to reinforce that guidance that that 
is absolutely unacceptable. 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  Another  issue  that  has  come  up  is  that 
under  the  Voluntary  Disclosure  Reporting  Program,  airlines  are 
not  penalized  for  self-disclosing  the  same  item  repeatedly  as  long 
as it is determined that a comprehensive fix was satisfactorily com-
pleted and followed. 

To what extent do the airlines repeatedly disclose the same safe-
ty  problem  under  the  Voluntary  Disclosure  Reporting  Program?  In 
other words, does this allowance for the disclosure of repeated safe-
ty  problems  without  penalty  effectively  encourage  airlines  to  ad-
dress the underlying safety problem? Mr. Scovel, first. 

Mr.  SCOVEL.  Yes,  that  certainly  is  a  problem,  as  highlighted  by 
the events at Southwest. We have not had an opportunity to exam-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00073 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

70 

ine the rest of the industry. We are anticipating a request from the 
House  Transportation  and  Infrastructure  Committee  to  do  exactly 
that. 

In taking Southwest as a case study, however, we had eight vio-
lations  of  four  ADs  since  December  of  2006.  Had  there  been  com-
prehensive fixes to the entire AD compliance system within South-
west,  there  may  not  have  been  future  AD  violations  including  the 
one in March that brings us here today. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. Mr. Sabatini? 
Mr.  SABATINI.  Let  me  say  that  what  happened  in  Southwest 

causes me to be outraged. I am absolutely outraged. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. But do you see it as an individual problem, 
or do you see it as systemic when you know that American Airlines 
has now grounded almost 2,000 flights? Is it not more than just one 
incident, but a systemic problem with the way the system is work-
ing? 

Mr.  SABATINI.  Well,  the  issue  with  American  is  not  a  voluntary 
disclosure.  That  was  a  finding  by  our  own  inspectors.  But  I  would 
agree  this  is  not  what  was  intended,  and  I  do  not  have  any  evi-
dence  that  it  is  happening  on  a  widespread  basis.  But  having  said 
that, we are going to take steps to make certain that that does not 
become a widespread circumstance. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. Thank you very much. 
Senator ROCKEFELLER. I should be calling on Senator McCaskill, 
but  I  have  to  leave  and  Chairman  Klobuchar  will  be  running  the 
deal. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. Now I am in real trouble. 
That is what I get for getting here late. 
Senator ROCKEFELLER. Three points to make. 
The NTSB has 400 open recommendations that the FAA has not 

acted on. Comment? 

Mr. SABATINI. I will have to review that data, Mr. Chairman. 
Senator ROCKEFELLER. Yes, I think you will. 
Second,  you  sort  of  credited  yourself  with  getting  more  money 
into the FAA system. You did not do that. We did that. The Presi-
dent  never  requested  it.  The  Congress  injected  that  money.  Keep 
that clear in your mind. 

Mr. SABATINI. I believe I acknowledged that. 
Senator ROCKEFELLER. No. I do not think you did. Well, so be it. 

It is for the record. We did that. 

That is the whole pattern—I could ask you how many times has 
Mary  Peters  gone  to  the  President  of  the  United  States  to  protest 
certain  things.  Why  was  there  not  any  Presidential  interest  in  all 
of this that is going on, except as exercised through the FAA, which 
some of us seem to be a little bit skeptical about? 

Third,  this  will  seem  like  a  self-serving  point,  and  I  therefore 
apologize.  I  believe  that  in  big  organizations—I  believe  this  vio-
lently in the Department of Defense, and I am beginning to believe 
it in the FAA—that sometimes you have got to fire people to make 
a point. And I am going to give you two examples. 

I  was  a  Governor  for  8  years  in  West  Virginia  and  I  had  a  very 
good  head  of  a  department.  He  was  doing  a  wonderful  job.  And  he 
did  something  which  was  probably  not  criminal,  but  he  went  out 
hunting  in  Wyoming  with  a  group  of  people  who  represented 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00074 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

71 

groups over which he had oversight jurisdiction and control. I fired 
him. I fired him in Wyoming. And nothing like that ever happened 
again. 

Second,  I  was  president  of  a  college  for  almost  4  years,  a  really 
good  college.  It  was  a  private  college  in  West  Virginia.  But  every-
body  was  afraid  to  dismiss  students  that  were  nonperforming  or 
had  sort  of  racial  preconceptions  that  were  not  helpful  to  the  na-
ture of the institution. And I very quietly over a period of time did 
homework  with  my  team,  and  1  day  we  dismissed  60  students, 
which  was  I  think  about  5  percent  of  the  student  body.  The  next 
day  everybody  was  at  their  work  stations  teaching  math,  learning 
English, learning everything else at 200 percent of the intensity of 
the day before. They were relieved because somebody had put down 
a marker. I just want to leave that thought. 

I yield now to, well, the chairman, Senator Klobuchar. 
Senator KLOBUCHAR [presiding]. Senator McCaskill? 

STATEMENT OF HON. CLAIRE MCCASKILL, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM MISSOURI 

Senator  MCCASKILL.  I  have  two  areas  I  want  to  cover.  One  is  to 
follow up on what the Chairman talked about in terms of account-
ability, and the second is foreign repair stations. 

The  head  of  the  Office  of  Special  Counsel,  who  represents  Fed-
eral  whistleblowers,  has  given  a  very  damning  indictment  of  the 
FAA  in  terms  of  accountability.  And  I  want  to  read  for  the  record 
what  the  Office  of  Special  Counsel  testified  to  in  a  hearing  in  the 
House.  ‘‘FAA  lied’’—no  sugar  coating  here.  ‘‘FAA  lied  to  OSC  and 
the  Inspector  General  in  the  2004–2005  investigation,  and  during 
this  new  one,  they  disregard  the  seriousness  of  the  charges  that 
operational  error  numbers  were  lowered  by  covering  them  up  and 
blaming the pilots instead. The more things change, the more they 
stay the same in FAA.’’ 

Also,  the  Special  Counsel  said,  ‘‘The  culture  of  complacence  and 
coverup goes very high in management circles.’’ A serious discipline 
and shakeup of the FAA, in order to send a proper message inside 
what appears to be a very insular organization. 

Now,  I  have  got  to  tell  you  that  is  an  amazing  testimony.  That 
is  amazing  testimony,  that  the  Office  of  Special  Counsel  has  said 
that  FAA  lied.  And  what  I  would  like  someone  to  say  to  me  today 
is that someone is going to be fired for lying to the OSC and to the 
Inspector  General.  Will  anyone  be  fired  for  lying,  or  do  you  dis-
agree that someone lied? 

Mr. SABATINI. Well, the Special Counsel has not brought any in-
formation  to  me  personally  about  anyone  lying.  Certainly  if  some-
one lied, we would take the appropriate action. 

Senator MCCASKILL. Well, this testimony was given on April 3rd. 
Now  if  I  were  in  your  position,  Mr.  Sabatini,  and  somebody  with 
this job came in front of the House and said this about my agency, 
I  would  be  asking  them  who  lied.  Have  you  asked  them  who  lied? 
Mr.  SCOVEL.  Senator,  if  I  may  shed  some  light  on  that  question. 
The head of Special Counsel, when he was testifying, was referring 
first  to  an  investigation  conducted  by  my  office.  We  were  referred 
to  the  case  by  the  Secretary  on  a  referral  to  her  from  the  Office 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00075 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

72 

of Special Counsel. It had to do with operational errors at the Dal-
las-Fort Worth TRACON. 

Subsequent to that, there has been a renewal of problems within 
the same facility. We are now completing our investigation on that. 
I  do  not  know  that  Mr.  Sabatini  has  knowledge  of  the  findings  of 
our current investigation, and because it is ongoing I am unable at 
this point, to comment on the record. 

Senator  MCCASKILL.  I  think  you  understand  my  concern,  Mr. 
Scovel,  that  we  would  have  someone  in  this  position  say  to  Con-
gress that someone is lying in the investigation and immediately— 
I mean, this is pretty—that does not happen very often. 

Mr. SCOVEL. It certainly does not. 
Senator  MCCASKILL.  And  for  someone  to  make  that  statement, 
especially  someone  in  this  job,  I  think  is  something  that  everyone 
should  react  to.  You  talk  about  the  red  lights  flashing  and  the  si-
rens  at  full  bore,  it  seems  to  me  this  is  the  moment  that  there 
needs  to  be  a  sense  of  urgency  about  accountability.  And  I  wanted 
to begin with that. 

Let  me  ask  you,  Mr.  Sabatini,  can  someone  explain  to  me  why 

certification of a repair facility is a valuable thing? 

Mr.  SABATINI.  Well,  for  many  reasons.  One,  it  requires  that  for 
people  who  apply  for  a  repair  station  authorization,  certification 
demonstrates that they have the competence and the qualifications, 
the  facilities,  the  housing,  et  cetera  to  perform  the  work  that  they 
are going to perform. 

Senator  MCCASKILL.  And  I  am  assuming  the  government  incurs 
expenses  in  terms  of  the  certification  process  and  the  oversight  of 
the certification process. 

Mr. SABATINI. Yes, we do. 
Senator  MCCASKILL.  But  yet,  we  do  not  require  people  to  use 

FAA certified facilities. 

Mr.  SABATINI.  Well,  an  air  carrier  is  going  to  either  perform  the 
work  itself  or  it  can  require  or  engage  with  another  facility  like  a 
repair station that is authorized to perform that work. 

Senator MCCASKILL. But not certified. 
Mr. SABATINI. An air carrier must deal with a certificated entity 

to have maintenance performed on its aircraft. 

Senator  MCCASKILL.  Well,  you  are  aware  of  all  the  reports  that 
have been done about foreign repair stations and the lack of certifi-
cation  thereof  and  the  problems  associated  with  those  foreign  re-
pair stations, I assume. 

Mr. SABATINI. Well, yes, I am. 
Senator  MCCASKILL.  So  what  I  am  trying  to  get  at  is  if  certifi-
cation  is  important  and  if  the  American  taxpayers  are  spending 
money to get facilities certified, what is the point if you do not need 
to?  I  mean,  why  do  it?  Why  do  we  not  just  do  away  with  certifi-
cation  of  repair  facilities  unless  we  are  going  to  require  the  same 
standards of all the repair facilities? 

Mr.  SABATINI.  Well,  certification  is  required  for  many  reasons, 
one of which I stated. If an air carrier is traveling abroad—and cer-
tainly  aircraft  are  global  by  their  very  nature—we  have  a  require-
ment  that  any  air  carrier  can  only  have  repairs  done  or  mainte-
nance performed on its aircraft by an authorized repair station. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00076 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

73 

If  I  may,  what  I  think  you  are  addressing  is  downstream,  can  a 
repair  station  contract  out  with  an  entity  that  is  not  necessarily 
certified by the FAA? And the answer to that is yes. However, that 
repair  station  or  that  air  carrier  that  might  have  work  outsourced 
to  one  of  those  entities,  must  assure  that  that  work  is  done  under 
the  quality  control  system  of  the  repair  station  or  the  air  carrier. 
And  we  hold  the  repair  station  and  the  air  carrier  accountable  to 
that. 

Senator  MCCASKILL.  Well,  my  understanding  is—and  correct  me 
if I am wrong—that most major airlines in this country are having 
work  done  at  foreign  repair  stations  and  that  there  is  no  require-
ment that those foreign repair stations be certified and that reports 
have  indicated  that  although  one  person  is  required  to  be  on  site 
and  know  what  needs  to  be  done,  a  lot  of  the  checking  is  being 
done by phone, that there is never an FAA inspector on site. 

I  am  just  trying  to  figure  out  how  many  people  are  lined  up 
wanting to be certified that we have not certified. Are there a num-
ber of foreign repair stations that have requested certification that 
we have not certified? 

Mr.  SABATINI.  Yes,  there  are.  I  do  not  have  that  number  readily 
available,  but  I  can  tell  you  that  there  are  applicants  at  different 
locations where we have FAA inspectors in-country in foreign loca-
tions that have a pending list. 

Senator  MCCASKILL.  OK.  This  is  the  second  hearing  where  I 
have  requested  how  many  pending  requests  for  certification  does 
the  FAA  currently  have,  and  your  agency  got  this  question  yester-
day. Your agency got it at a previous hearing. 

Should it worry me that nobody can give me the number of facili-
ties  that  want  to  be  certified  that  are  waiting  to  be  certified  and 
cannot  be  certified?  Should  that  concern  me  that  nobody  can  come 
up with that number? 

Mr. SABATINI. Well, I can get you that number, Senator. 
Senator  MCCASKILL.  OK.  I  hope  you  can.  I  am  a  little  skeptical 
at  this  point  because  I  have  been  talking  about  this  for  a  while 
now,  and  I  have  not  yet  got  any  sense  of  urgency  from  the  FAA 
that you are concerned. 

As you know, they found a member of Al Qaeda working at a re-
pair facility in Singapore. As you know, they had access issues that 
were cited both by IG’s and GAO about access to facilities in terms 
of gaps in fencing, a lack of background checks. Then you have got 
the  whole  additional  problem  that  the  outsourcing  of  labor  to  for-
eign  repair  stations,  those  that  are  certified—the  costs  of  that  are 
being borne by the taxpayer. 

So  I  do  not  begrudge  companies  for  a  lower  labor  cost  by  going 
outside  of  the  country,  but  I  do  begrudge  taxpayers  underwriting 
it.  And  I  have  asked  for  those  numbers  repeatedly.  How  much  are 
taxpayers  paying  to  help  these  companies  have  their  airplanes 
worked  on  in  other  countries?  If  you  can  assist  me  in  getting  that 
information, I would be greatly appreciative. 

Mr. SABATINI. Well, Senator, I am actively engaged in addressing 
that  question  you  raised  last  time,  and  I  can  tell  you  that  we  are 
actively  reviewing  how  we  assess  foreign  applicants  for  certifi-
cation. So I will be able to give you that information—just give me 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00077 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

74 

a  little  bit  more  time,  but  I  can  assure  you,  Senator,  we  are  ac-
tively engaged in looking at that. 

Senator  MCCASKILL.  I  think  we  need  to  keep  a  central  list,  do 

you not? 

Mr. SABATINI. A pending list? 
Senator  MCCASKILL.  Yes.  I  mean,  should  you  not  be  able  to  say 
how  many  people  want  to  be  certified  that  we  have  not  certified? 
This is not a hard question. 

Mr.  SABATINI.  Well,  you  know,  I  will  go  back  about  10  years 
when  we  started  into  basically  certifying  foreign  repair  stations. 
We  were  told  by  the  Congress  not  to  certify  any  more  repair  sta-
tions than we can properly surveil. 

So  an  example  from  the  pending  list  is  an  applicant  who  is  not 
a  threat  to  safety.  It  is  an  applicant  who  is  waiting  to  be  certified 
as  a  repair  station.  So  the  pending  list  does  exist.  I  do  not  believe 
we  could  ever  eliminate  that  pending  list.  We  simply  do  not  have 
the numbers of people—— 

Senator MCCASKILL. That is what I thought. So it is a matter of 
resources.  It  is  a  matter  that  we  do  not  have  enough  inspectors  to 
actually send to all these certified facilities. 

Mr. SABATINI.—well, we have them today in Singapore, in Frank-
furt, in London, and we have a small group in Beijing, and we are 
adding  people  there.  We  have  added  10  people  in  Frankfurt  and  6 
people  in  Singapore  and  2  in  Beijing.  And  I  would  tell  you,  you 
could  give  me  a  1,000  people.  There  will  always  be  a  pending  list, 
and  we  will  not  allow—an  inspector  to  be  responsible  for  any  par-
ticular  group  or  number  of  certificates  than  they  can  properly  and 
adequately surveil. 

Senator MCCASKILL. I think that is a great position to take, and 
I  appreciate  it.  I  think  it  is  the  right  position.  But  I  am  very  con-
fused  that  no  harm,  no  foul  if  you  use  a  non-certified  facility.  So 
it is like we are saying we do not have enough people to really look 
at all these facilities, but that is OK. You can go to one that is not 
certified. It seems to me that is kind of counterproductive. 

Mr. SABATINI. Well, for clarity, those people who are on the pend-
ing  list  are  not  performing  any  repair  station  activity.  That  would 
be contrary to our rules, and we would not permit that. For exam-
ple,  a  repair  station  or  an  air  carrier  can  go  to  an  entity  that  spe-
cializes  in  plating  of  blades  or  welding,  which  does  not  necessarily 
require FAA certification. But that air carrier or that repair station 
is responsible for assuring that the work that is done is done in ac-
cordance with the standard for which we apply and hold that enti-
ty, the air carrier or the repair station, responsible and accountable 
for. They bear that responsibility. 

Senator  MCCASKILL.  I  think  that  is  great  for  the  subcontracting 
specialists, but we have facilities that are doing all kinds of repairs 
that  are  not  certified  where  we  are  not  certain  of  the  background 
checks,  the  access  issues,  and  all  of  those.  And  those  are  the  ones 
I am concerned about, Mr. Sabatini. 

Mr.  SABATINI.  Well,  I  can  tell  you  that  we  have  put  in  place  a 
requirement that the air carrier make available to an FAA inspec-
tor, upon request, those entities that they are doing business with, 
so that we know who they are and can determine whether they are 
performing  the  work  in  accordance  with  that  carrier’s  procedures. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00078 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

75 

And  with  regard  to  repair  stations,  any  work  that  they  extend  to 
others  outside  the  repair  station,  they  must  demonstrate  to  us 
through  the  repair  station  that  we  have  access  to  those 
uncertificated entities. 

Senator  MCCASKILL.  And  I  appreciate  that.  I  think  you  realize 
this is a problem and I think you are trying to deal with it. I think 
that  the  cow  got  out  of  the  barn  on  foreign  repair,  and  I  think  we 
have got some work to do in terms of credibility at this point. And 
I  appreciate  whatever  information  you  can  get  to  me  as  quickly  as 
possible so we can begin to look at whether or not there is, indeed, 
a  problem  here  that  the  American  flying  public  needs  to  be  con-
cerned about. 

Mr. SABATINI. We will do that, Senator. 
Senator MCCASKILL. Thank you very much. 
Senator KLOBUCHAR. Thank you, Senator McCaskill. 
Mr.  Sabatini,  when  I  ended  my  last  questions,  we  were  talking 
about  the  cozy  relationship.  In  my  time  here  now—I  have  been  in 
the  Senate  for  a  year  and  a  half,  I  have  noticed  that  a  lot  of  the 
issues  that  can  arise—and  you  cannot  always  tag  it  on  them—are 
due  to  regulators  who  have  other  interests  and  then  they  go  and 
they  work  at  the  place  that  they  were  supposed  to  regulate.  We 
have some issues with the Surface Transportation Board, the num-
ber  of  people  working  at  railroads.  We  saw  it  in  the  Consumer 
Product Safety Commission in terms of a different problem with in-
dustry  paying  for  trips  while  the  regulation  of  these  industries 
lagged. 

I  just  wondered  if  you  had  statistics  and  data  on  the  number  or 
percentage of FDA inspectors who later take jobs with the airlines. 

Mr. SABATINI. FDA? 
Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  FAA.  I  misspoke.  If  you  have  numbers  or 
statistics on the number of FAA inspectors who then go on to work 
at the airlines. 

Mr.  SABATINI.  Not  readily  at  hand,  but  I  will  certainly  get  that 

information to—— 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  If  you  could  get  those  for  me  for,  say,  the 

last 10 years, that would be very helpful. 

Mr. SABATINI.—I will, assuming those records exist. I will do my 

very best. 

[The information referred to follows:] 

U.S. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION 
FEDERAL AVIATION ADMINISTRATION 

Washington, DC, July 11, 2008 

Hon. AMY KLOBUCHAR, 
Member, 
Commerce, Science, and Transportation Committee, 
U.S. Senate, 
Washington, DC. 
Dear Senator Klobuchar: 

At  a  hearing  held  on  April  10,  you  asked  if  the  Federal  Aviation  Administration 
(FAA)  keeps  records  of  whether  aviation  safety  inspectors  go  to  work  for  airlines 
after  leaving  the  FAA.  At  the  time  of  the  hearing,  I  did  not  know  the  answer  to 
your question. 

I  want  to  confirm  that  the  FAA  does  not  have  records  on  where  aviation  safety 
inspectors,  or  any  former  employees,  are  employed  after  they  leave  the  FAA.  For 
those employees who have post-employment restrictions, they are informed of those 
restrictions before they leave the FAA and are expected to comply. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00079 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

76 

At  this  time,  aviation  safety  inspectors  do  not  have  any  post-employment  restric-
tions.  We  have  initiated  a  rulemaking  project  to  propose  that  inspectors  be  prohib-
ited from working with the FAA on behalf of an airline for a period of 2 years after 
they  leave  the  FAA.  This  proposal  would  permit  inspectors  to  be  employed  by  an 
airline,  but  would  not  allow  them  to  represent  the  airline.  to  the  FAA  for  2  years. 

Sincerely, 

Associate Administrator for Aviation Safety. 

NICHOLAS A. SABATINI, 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  Mr.  Chealander,  you  have  been  nicely 
quiet.  I  thought  maybe  you  would  like  a  few  questions  over  there. 
I was thinking of what you had said when you cited some of these 
past  disasters  or  where  things  went  wrong  where  it  showed  that 
there was a record of a lack of inspections. Was that right? 

Mr.  CHEALANDER.  Yes,  that  is  correct.  We  have  been  looking  at 
maintenance  oversight  or  oversight  by  the  FAA  for  25  years  and 
making recommendations there. 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  Yes,  and  a  lot  of  it  is  based  on  lack  of  in-

spections, that if the inspections had occurred—— 

Mr. CHEALANDER. Correct. 
Senator  KLOBUCHAR.—and  as  I  was  sitting  here  listening  to  all 
this, I was thinking of my former life when I was a prosecutor, the 
murder  rate  would  be  low  and  everyone  would  be  celebrating  this 
great  record,  but  then  you  would  always  see  signs  that  problems 
were  ahead  when  you  saw  an  increase  in  drug  dealing  or  an  in-
crease  in  property  crimes.  And  then,  sure  enough,  you  would  see 
the murder rate creep up shortly after that. 

As  you  listened  to  everything  that  the  other  witnesses  have 
talked  about  in  terms  of  these  problems  and  Mr.  Scovel’s  rec-
ommendations, could you talk about your reaction to all of this and 
if we just rest on our laurels and say, hey, we have not had a crash 
for  2  years?  Or  if  you  see  the  fact  that  we  now  have  thousands  of 
passengers that are grounded at these airports, the flights were not 
inspected, and you have pieces of airplanes falling off, and near col-
lisions  on  runways,  if  that  leads  for  you  to  have  more  concerns 
about what could ensue. 

Mr.  CHEALANDER.  I  will  give  it  a  shot.  There  are  a  lot  of  issues 

involved with what you just said. 

We  have  a  different  perspective  at  the  NTSB  than  the  IG  has 
when  they  do  audits  and  investigations  from  their  perspective.  We 
are  an  after-the-fact  agency.  We  come  in  after  the  disaster  hap-
pens. We investigate the accident. We determine the findings, con-
clusions, probable cause, and then make recommendations. 

Over  the  last  25  years,  as  I  alluded  to  in  my  oral  testimony,  we 
have  investigated  accidents  and  determined  that  oversight,  wheth-
er  it  be  operational  or  maintenance  oversight,  has  been  an  issue. 
And  we  have  cited  the  FAA  in  that  regard  in  a  lot  of  our  rec-
ommendations as well. 

As a matter of fact, we did a data search for this testimony, and 
in the written testimony that we gave you, you will see a table [not 
printed] in there that discusses that for the last 25 years gives you 
some  numbers  of  how  many  times  that  has  appeared  in  either  our 
findings and conclusions, probable cause, or recommendations. 

As  I  said  in  my  oral  remarks,  we  have  made  recommendations. 
Over  the  last  10  years,  we  have  made  29  of  those  on  maintenance 
oversight  alone  to  the  FAA.  Of  those  29  recommendations  that  we 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00080 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

77 

have  made,  75  percent  of  those  are  still  open,  still  in  the  letter- 
writing campaign—— 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  Could  you  give  me  some  examples  of  some 

of the ones you think are most important? 

Mr.  CHEALANDER.—well,  if  you  will  give  me  a  second  here,  I 

can—— 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. And probably the ones that are most perti-

nent to what we have been talking about today. 

Mr. CHEALANDER.—I can cite right now for you five aircraft acci-
dents that have recommendations that have come from them in the 
last  10  years  of  these  29  that  I  am  talking  about.  And  the  most 
recent  for  sure,  but  one  that  is  really  a  characteristic  example  of 
what we are talking about was the Chalk’s accident that I alluded 
to  in  my  oral  remarks.  That  was  a  Grumman  Mallard  airplane 
down  in  Miami  where  a  wing  came  off  and  18  passengers  were 
killed  and  2  crew  members.  So  20  people  were  killed  in  this  acci-
dent when the wing came off and it fell on the beach. You may re-
call the videos of that accident. 

In  that  accident,  we  found  that  maintenance  was  sorely  lacking 
at  the  airline  in  question,  but  moreover,  maintenance  oversight  of 
that airline was lacking. 

Again,  we  look  at  it  in  a  different  perspective  than  the  IG  does. 
We  look  at  it  after  the  fact.  We  look  at  it  and  see  that  possibly 
proper oversight of the maintenance of that airline would have pre-
vented  this  accident  from  happening.  They  would  have  found  the 
corrosion that was in these wings and the wing may not have come 
off.  So  that  is  where  we  lead  in  our  investigations,  our  rec-
ommendations. 

There are other examples. 
Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  So  the  implication  here  is  that  you  made 

that recommendation and it was not taken. 

Mr.  CHEALANDER.  Well,  that  is  still  ongoing.  That  one  is  still 
open  because  it  is  a  recent  one,  and  we  are  still  in  the  campaign 
of  writing  back  and  forth  with  the  FAA  to  determine  how  we  are 
going  to  handle  this  recommendation.  The  way  we  do  that,  we 
write  them  a  letter  and  tell  them  these  are  the  recommendations 
we are making based on this accident, and they then write us back 
and  tell  us  how  they  are  going  to  implement  our  recommendation. 
So  that  stays  open  until  we  get  satisfactory  conclusion  to  that  rec-
ommendation. 

And  there  are  several  others  I  can  talk  about.  But  one  I  also 
talked about in my testimony was the Alaska accident, Flight 261, 
off  the  coast  of  California  where  the  jackscrew  in  the  back  that 
Senator  Stevens  talked  about  was  lacking  of  maintenance  and 
oversight by the FAA that would have caught that. So a lot of pro-
cedures have come out subsequent to that, but 88 people had to die 
so that we could make that recommendation. 

So  that  is  where  we  come  from  as  an  agency,  the  NTSB,  as  op-
posed to where the IG comes from. And that is why I say we have 
29 recommendations in the last 10 years on maintenance oversight, 
and 75 percent of those are still open in one way or another. 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  Why  is  that,  Mr.  Sabatini,  that  75  percent 

of them have not been responded to? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00081 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

78 

Mr. SABATINI. Well, we take the recommendations very seriously, 
and  we  evaluate  them.  As  Mr.  Chealander  has  said,  on  this  most 
recent  one,  the  Chalk,  we  are  in  the  process  of  addressing  what 
they have recommended and what we think is a proper solution to 
that. 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  Well,  my  problem  with  the  adverb  ‘‘seri-
ously’’ is that he said that 75 percent of them have not been imple-
mented.  So  it  does  not  really  seem  like  they  are  taken  seriously. 
If they were taken seriously, maybe 70 percent of them would have 
been implemented. 

Mr. SCOVEL. Senator, can I interject briefly? Seventy-five percent 
of  the  NTSB  recommendations  remain  open.  That  does  not  mean 
they  have  not  been  implemented.  That  means  they  are  still  open 
and awaiting a satisfactory or unsatisfactory conclusion. 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  Do  you  think  that  they  need  to  move  more 

Mr. SCOVEL. In some cases, yes. 
Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  Is  there  a  specific  case  that  is  your  worst 

quickly? 

example? 

Mr. SCOVEL. We can get you that data. There are reams of letter- 
writing  campaigns  that  have  gone  on.  I  have  got,  as  a  matter  of 
fact,  our  recommendations  expert  sitting  right  behind  me,  and  we 
can  get  that  answer  for  you  and  get  it  pretty  quickly,  if  you  like. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. Thank you. 
Mr.  Brantley,  you  indicated  maybe  in  your  prepared  remarks 
that inspectors—spend more than 70 percent of their time at their 
desks. This, of course, means that for more than two-thirds of their 
week,  these  FAA  inspectors  are  not  in  the  field  performing  actual 
hands-on  inspection.  What  do  you  think  is  the  right  mix  of  work, 
and are we operating under the right mix today? 

Mr.  BRANTLEY.  Well,  I  think  the  right  mix  may  very  well  differ 
from  case  to  case.  It  depends  on  the  type  of  oversight  they  do  and 
the  particular  job.  But  I  think  it  has  to  be  more  than  30  percent 
of their time in the field. 

I think the inspectors are very experienced. They are very knowl-
edgeable. And I think there needs to be a lot more trust in not just 
their  instincts  but  their  experience  and  allow  them  to  determine 
how often they need to go out. 

I think systemically it needs to be a greater part of the agency’s 
oversight program. They need to emphasize the hands-on checking. 
One of the things that I am very concerned about is I hear a lot 
that  the  airlines  or  a  repair  facility  are  responsible  for  ensuring 
compliance,  and  that  is  true.  But  in  the  end,  they  seem  to  be  ac-
countable  for  it,  and  the  FAA  is  not.  I  think  the  FAA  is  not  ac-
countable for tracking compliance. They are accountable for ensur-
ing  it.  And  without  getting  out  and  looking  at  things,  kicking 
tires—I  do  not  like  the  phrase,  but  I  will  use  it  because  it  is  easy 
and  everyone  understands  it.  They  need  to  be  able  to  get  out  and 
kick the tires. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. Well, also we talked earlier about this gam-
ing  the  system,  whether  or  not  we  have  the  facts  to  support  this, 
but  there  is  some  thought  that  what  sometimes  goes  on  is  people 
are told that they are going to show up and inspect and things like 
that.  It  would  seem  to  me  if  you  had  a  higher  percentage,  even  a 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00082 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

79 

slightly higher percentage, out in the field, you could do more sur-
prise inspections. 

Mr. BRANTLEY. Yes, ma’am, absolutely. And I think unannounced 
inspections  are  one  of  the  most  important  tools  that  an  inspector 
has  to  ensure  compliance.  But  even  that  is  very  much  frowned 
upon  because  if  they  show  up  unannounced,  an  airline  can—and 
not  all  do  all  the  time,  but  the  airline  or  repair  facility  can  com-
plain and say they showed up without notice. They are asking peo-
ple  questions.  It  is  slowing  us  down.  It  is  costing  us  money.  And 
they will be told not to do it. 

We  have  an  example  where  in  Hawaii,  Hawaiian  Airlines  had 
complained  to  the  local  FAA  management,  and  they  instructed 
their inspectors to no longer do a ramp inspection unless the turn-
around time was at least 90 minutes or more because they did not 
want to impact their operations. 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  Now,  Mr.  Sabatini,  is  this  consistent  with 

what the policy should be of the FAA inspectors? 

Mr.  SABATINI.  Senator,  if  you  would  just  bear  with  me  for  just 

a few minutes, I would like to put this in perspective. 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  Sure.  You  and  I  are  the  only  things  that 

come between everyone’s lunch. So that is OK. 

Mr.  SABATINI.  I  apologize  for  a  late  lunch,  but  I  think  this  is 

critically important for everyone to understand. 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  That  is  why  I  am  asking  the  questions.  I 
mean,  I  think  earlier  you  talked  about  how  it  was  important  that 
we not have all these planned inspections the day before. And then 
Mr.  Brantley  just  gave  me  some  actual  examples  of  where  airlines 
have  pushed  back  and  said,  ‘‘oh,  you  have  got  to  give  us  enough 
notice.’’ 

Mr. SABATINI. Well, I would suggest that if Mr. Brantley were to 
bring  forward  the  actual  evidence,  the  objective  evidence  con-
cerning  what  he  just  stated,  I  think  the  facts  would  prove  to  be  a 
little bit different. But let us put that aside. 

What  I  would  like  to  share  with  you—I  am  not  a  theorist.  I  am 
an actual practitioner of this business. I started as an FAA inspec-
tor  in  Charleston,  West  Virginia.  And  back  then,  I  was  left  to  my 
own  devices  to  determine—and  I  was  a  principal  inspector—I  was 
left  to  my  own  devices  to  decide  how  I  would  inspect  that  carrier. 
I would also say that during that time, there were 110 field offices, 
and  anyone  applying  for  an  air  carrier  certificate  could  be  certifi-
cated  in  110  different  ways,  all  in  accordance  with  the  rules,  but 
the  degree  of  the  depth  of  what  was  required  to  meet  the  regula-
tion had variation to it. 

We now have an ATOS system. Thank goodness for that. It is far 
more robust than we ever had. It has produced for us what we now 
know  to  be  a  very  safe  system.  And  I  will  say  again  I  do  not  rest 
on that laurel. 

But what is important to know and is clearly stated in the guid-
ance—and it is open to anyone who wishes to know about it to read 
it—it  clearly  says  that  an  FAA  inspector  in  the  conduct  of—let  us 
just take what just happened: Airworthiness Directives. In the con-
duct  of  that  oversight,  that  assessment  of  the  performance  of  the 
carrier,  that  inspector  can  look  at  the  airplane  as  many  times  as 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00083 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

80 

they  want.  There  is  no  limitation.  There  is  no  requirement  to  be 
at your desk 70 percent. 

And  let  me  again  draw  a  comparison.  When  I  was  an  inspector, 
I  went  out  into  the  field  and  it  was  random.  Today  what  we  are 
doing  is  collecting  data  so  that  before  you  go  out  to  conduct  an  in-
spection,  you  need  to  be  well  informed.  You  need  to  download  the 
information  that  pertains  to  your  carrier  so  that  you  know  exactly 
what it is that you will be looking for. And while you are out there, 
let  us  take  an  evening  surveillance  of  maintenance.  When  you  are 
conducting  maintenance,  no  one  says  you  cannot  look  someplace 
else.  You  have  a  duty  and  obligation  to  report  everything  that  you 
see,  and  inspectors  are  free  to  do  that.  Again,  they  can  touch  as 
many  airplanes  as  they  like  within  the  construct  of  the  perform-
ance  assessment  of  whatever  it  is  that  has  been  determined  to  be 
an area to be examined. 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  Well,  it  is  just  this  really  concerns  me, 
though,  about  the  surprise  visits.  I  think  about  like  if  I  know  my 
mother-in-law  is  coming  over  with  4  hours’  notice,  my  house  is 
cleaner  than  if  she  just  shows  up.  So  what  Mr.  Brantley  has  been 
pointing  out  here  is  that  when  you  have  advance  notice,  it  is  a  lot 
different situation than if you just randomly show up. 

Would  you  be  troubled  if  you  found  out  that  what  Mr.  Brantley 
was  saying  was  true,  that  there  was  what  Mr.  Scovel  called  an 
overly collaborative relationship to the point where there was much 
advance notice of when these inspectors would show up? 

Mr. SABATINI. There is no requirement for advance notice. 
Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  I  just  wondered  if  it  would—I  am  not  say-
ing there is, but it sounds like it is possible that it has been going 
on. So does it trouble you if it has been going on? That is my ques-
tion. 

Mr.  SABATINI.  Not  necessarily  because  what  that  would  imply  is 
that people on an ongoing basis are in noncompliance and because 
the FAA inspector shows up, suddenly they are going to be in com-
pliance. This is a very complex business. You cannot fix something 
in just a few hours because you heard an FAA inspector is coming. 
It is clearly obvious. We have very experienced safety professionals, 
our inspectors. They can tell the difference whether someone is hid-
ing something or whether it is as a matter of routine and is embed-
ded in the system. And our processes today clearly identify whether 
you  are  faking  it  or  whether  it  is  ongoing  on  a  regularized  basis. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. Mr. Scovel, do you think that is true? 
Mr.  SCOVEL.  Mr.  Sabatini  talked  about  faking  it  or  hiding  it.  I 
think in one of your earlier questions, you made the point that this 
is really not the issue. It is whether the carrier is going to use the 
opportunity to voluntarily self-disclose and perhaps avoid a penalty 
that FAA might levy had they—— 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. Because of that advance notice. 
Mr. SCOVEL.—perhaps. Right. 
Let  me  make  one  more  point.  We  are  talking  about  requests  by 
carriers  back  to  FAA  for  advance  notice.  That  is  certainly  trou-
bling,  but  what  is  even  more  troubling  to  me  is  what  we  saw  hap-
pen in the Southwest and Northwest cases, both of which I referred 
to in my testimony. In these cases, a carrier either used subterfuge, 
made  an  anonymous  complaint  to  FAA,  or  simply  pulled  creden-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00084 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

81 

tials  from  an  inspector  so  that  he  was  unable  to  access  mainte-
nance  facilities.  In  effect,  carriers  were  deciding  which  inspector 
was going to get to do their inspections. That is very troubling. 

In  his  House  testimony  last  week  the  whistleblowers  called  that 
‘‘cherry picking.’’ I called it putting an inspector on the bench with 
FAA’s  complicity.  That  is  troubling.  It  is  a  dismissive  attitude  on 
the  part  of  the  carriers,  and,  as  I  mentioned  last  week,  it  signals 
a  regulator  that  no  longer  commands  the  respect  of  the  regulated 
entity. That should be very troubling to all of us. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. Mr. Sabatini, are you troubled by that? 
Mr. SABATINI. Absolutely. I am outraged. 
Senator KLOBUCHAR. What are you going to do about it? 
Mr. SABATINI. Well, I have taken steps already with the individ-
uals  concerned,  and  I  am  putting  steps  in  place  to  make  sure  that 
does not happen again. 

Again,  we  are  a  learning  organization.  We  are  in  that  level  of 
that  chart  where  we  keep  identifying  remaining  risks.  Those  are 
risks, and we are actively and proactively addressing those. 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  Mr.  Barimo,  as  we  have  this  hearing  and 
we  are  all  sitting  here  comfortably  asking  questions,  we  have  got 
thousands  of  airline  passengers  that  are  stranded  because  routine 
inspections were not taking place, and instead it was just suddenly 
the flights were stopped so that things could be looked at. I do not 
think anyone questions that we should have safety inspections, but 
clearly  members  of  this  committee  question  know  how  this  was 
handled. 

What is going on for these passengers right now? Are they going 
to  get  redemption  coupons?  Are  they  going  to  get  expenses  paid? 
What is happening? 

Mr.  BARIMO.  I  will  address  that  as  best  I  can,  and  then  I  would 

like to add a comment just to what we talked about earlier. 

Each carrier will determine what is appropriate from a customer 
service  standpoint.  I  am  not  up  to  speed  on  the  specifics  of  how 
each  carrier  in  this  particular  instance  is  going  to  address  taking 
care of their customers. I am certain that they will. Some have al-
ready  announced  plans  on  how  they  will  address  their  customer 
issues. 

So just if I could take a step back, let me just point out that air-
lines  do  not  rely  on  the  FAA  or  the  ATOS  system  to  keep  them 
safe.  Airlines  are  not  safe  because  they  are  trying  to  avoid  a  fine, 
and  they  are  not  cleaning  house  because  they  hear  that  tomorrow 
the  FAA  is  coming  over.  Safety  is  good  business  for  airlines.  It  is 
essential  for  airlines.  It  is  taken  very  seriously.  And  we  recognize 
that.  As  we  talked  about  earlier,  the  goal  is  100  percent  and  we 
will not stop until we get there. 

But  let  us  keep  in  mind  that  this  is  a  collaborative  effort,  and 
the last thing we want to do is rebuild the wall that existed a cou-
ple of decades ago between airlines and the regulator. What scares 
me  is  that  we  return  to  an  era  where  we  had  accident  rates  that 
at  today’s  volumes  would  generate  a  fatal  accident  every  month.  I 
do  not  want  to  go  there.  I  know  that  there  are  changes  that  need 
to  be  made  to  the  tools  that  we  are  using  today  and  we  will  abso-
lutely support those changes. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00085 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  Well,  thank  you,  Mr.  Barimo,  for  pointing 

82 

that out. 

I  will  say  this.  I  believe  that  things  have  tilted  too  far  in  the 
other  direction.  I  believe  you  that  there  have  been  improvements 
made  to  safety.  Our  State  of  Minnesota  has  Northwest  Airlines, 
and  we  are  proud  of  the  work  that  they  do.  And  they  have  not 
grounded  any  flights  yet  as  of  this  moment.  That  is  a  knock  on 
wood for the record. 

But  I  will  say  this.  Just  as  we  saw  with  the  tainted  dog  food  or 
the  toys  from  China  or  a  bridge  that  falls  down  in  the  middle  of 
the Mississippi River, perhaps we have gone too far in terms of the 
collaboration  being  on  one  side,  and  that  is  the  side  of  industry. 
And  I  agree  there  should  be  collaboration.  I  think  that  is  the  way 
to go, but the whole system was set up so that there is backup en-
forcement. 

I  can  tell  you  that  Target  and  Toy-R-Us  did  not  want  these  toys 
to  come  over.  They  have  a  market  reason  to  want  to  do  well.  But 
they most likely, like the rest of us, thought that there were going 
to  be  inspectors  that  were  looking  at  things,  just  like  I  would  as-
sume the airline CEOs believe that there are going to be competent 
inspectors  that  really  balance  the  system  that  are  going  to  call 
their  employees  that  they  cannot  watch  every  day  just  to  make 
sure things are going well. 

And  I  think  that  is  what  seems  to  have  broken  down  here,  not 
that  we  want  to  throw  out  the  whole  system,  but  that  we  want  to 
talk  intelligently  about  what  we  need  to  do  with  some  of  the  rec-
ommendations that Mr. Scovel has made to try to move in the right 
direction. 

And then I just have one more question related to the air traffic 
controllers and whether some of the things that we have been talk-
ing  about  today  with  the  FAA  inspectors  are  some  of  the  same 
issues  where  they  have  voiced  their  concerns,  whether  they  were 
whistleblower  concerns  or  whatever,  that  some  of  their  concerns 
are  not  moved  up  the  chain,  so  to  say,  so  that  people  at  the  top 
can find out about things, which is all we are talking about. 

Mr. Krakowski, do you want to comment on that? 
Mr.  KRAKOWSKI.  Thank  you,  Senator.  I  think  this  has  been  a 
very  important  couple  of  weeks  in  that  effort  with  air  traffic.  As 
you may know, I come from industry as a chief safety officer of one 
of the largest airlines during a time where the airline had its worst 
time  in  5  years  in  the  company’s  history.  Two  airplanes  lost  on  9/ 
11, bankruptcy, a lot of churn in the organization. 

There are some techniques there that we used that were very ef-
fective  in  actually  improving  our  safety.  One  of  those  techniques, 
the  Aviation  Safety  Action  Program,  or  ASAP,  for  air  traffic  was 
signed  by  Acting  Administrator  Sturgell  and  Pat  Forrey  from 
NATCA  2  weeks  ago,  and  we  are  going  to  begin  rolling  this  pro-
gram out. This is going to give us some insight into the human fac-
tors and the real issues, whether fatigue is real or not, what should 
we  do  about  it,  what  are  the  human  factors  issues  around  inci-
dents, operational errors, runway incursions. 

I  believe  in  my  heart  that  my  former  company  would  not  have 
achieved  the  safety  record  it  had  without  an  effective  program  in 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00086 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

83 

this  area,  and  it  is  my  fervent  passion  to  make  this  program  suc-
cessful. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. Very good. 
Anyone else like to comment on this? 
[No response.] 
Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  Well,  thank  you  very  much.  I  will  say  that 
I  think  the  general  consensus  up  here,  whether  it  is  Democrats  or 
Republicans,  is  that  the  FAA  needs  to  do  more  than  just  trust 
these airlines, that we have to have a collaborative effort, but they 
need  to  be  vigilant  in  ensuring  that  the  airlines  comply  with  the 
regulations  and,  when  necessary,  take  the  enforcement  action.  We 
have  some  good  ideas  on  the  table,  and  I  think  we  need  to  go  be-
yond  the  letter  writing  back  and  forth  and  get  into  action.  Thank 
you very much. 

The hearing is adjourned. 
[Whereupon, at 1:24 p.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00087 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00088 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

A P P E N D I X 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF KAREN E. CASANOVAS, EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR, 

ALASKA AIR CARRIERS ASSOCIATION 

To  the  Honorable  Chairman  Inouye  and  Vice  Chairman  Stevens  and  members  of 

the Committee: 

My name is Karen Casanovas and I am the Executive Director for the Alaska Air 
Carriers  Association.  Our  Association  (AACA)  was  founded  in  1966  and  represents 
over  160  commercial  airlines  and  aviation  businesses  throughout  Alaska  and  the 
world. Our organization’s mission is to provide educational training, advocate for the 
interests of aviation in the public process, and act as a facilitator of aviation-related 
information. Additionally, we provide resources for safety, security, air-space, insur-
ance,  or  weather-related  issues,  and  act  as  a  conduit  between  government  and  in-
dustry  leaders.  It  is  an  honor  to  comment  on  crucial  safety  issues.  I’ll  address  the 
challenges  facing  commercial  air  carriers  in  our  state,  along  with  the  successes  of 
Alaskan aviation safety. 

Since  air  travel  is  a  way  of  life  for  Alaskans,  we  are  dependent  on  aviation  for 
activities  that  are  normally  accomplished  by  using  the  existing  road  system  in  the 
Lower  48  states.  As  a  consequence,  per  capita  there  are  6  times  the  number  of  pi-
lots,  14  times  the  number  of  aircraft,  and  76  times  as  many  commuter  airline 
flights.  As  a  pilot,  Senator  Stevens,  you  are  aware  of  the  wide  variety  of  services 
provided  by  the  aviation  industry.  Because  commuter  airlines  and  air  taxi  oper-
ations  need  to  provide  highly  reliable  service  for  rural  area  medevac  and  economic 
purposes (oil, fishing and tourism) in an environment of unpredictable weather and 
high  terrain,  they  need  an  air  traffic  system  that  enables  them  to  communicate, 
navigate and manage operational control of their aircraft. 

Alaska  has  been  an  ideal  location  to  implement  key  new  communication,  naviga-
tion, and surveillance technologies that improve safety. These new technologies have 
allowed  pilots  to  more  effectively  handle  navigation,  terrain,  traffic  and  weather 
hazards and enabled the Federal Aviation Administration (FAA) to provide more ef-
ficient and cost effective services. 

The  FAA  Capstone  Program  was  a  technology-focused  research  and  development 
(R&D) safety program in Alaska, which sought near-term safety and efficiency gains 
in aviation by accelerating implementation and use of modern technology. The Cap-
stone  Program  linked  multiple  programs  and  initiatives  under  a  common  umbrella 
for  planning,  coordination,  focus  and  direction.  ADS–B  was  a  major  component  of 
the  Capstone  Program  and  much  success  was  achieved  in  the  developmental  phase 
of  ADS–B  technology.  On  September  9,  2005,  the  FAA  selected  ADS–B  as  the  pre-
ferred  alternative  for  meeting  the  future  surveillance  needs  of  the  agency.  ADS–B 
is a critical component for meeting the Next Generation Air Transportation System 
(NGATS)  goals,  now  known  as  NextGen.  In  December  2006,  the  Capstone  Program 
transitioned  to  the  Surveillance  and  Broadcast  Services  (SBS)  Program  Office  and 
assimilated into the National ADS–B Program. 

The  Surveillance  and  Broadcast  Services  Capstone  Statewide  Plan  is  a  joint  in-
dustry-FAA  plan  with  a  goal  of  equipping  Alaskan-based  aircraft  and  installing 
ground  infrastructure  such  that  90  percent  of  Alaskan  air  operations  would  be  cov-
ered by the FAA NextGen aviation technologies. Doing so will expand the Capstone 
Program’s  demonstrated  47  percent  safety  improvement  record  across  Alaska.  FAA 
estimates  a  33  percent  reduction  in  fatal  accidents  statewide  and  $824  million  in 
combined  public  benefits  from  reduced  aircraft  accidents,  enhanced  rural  area  med-
ical  evacuation,  and  more  effective  accident  search  and  rescue  operations  (over  the 
next 27 years). 

While the FAA will make an investment in this NextGen airspace system in Alas-
ka, the funding will be limited or delayed unless Alaskan commercial operators and 
general aviation airplane owners equip approximately 4,000 aircraft. Currently, the 
increase  in  the  FAA  investment  in  Alaska  is  estimated  to  be  $493  million,  much  of 

(85) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00089 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

86 

which  will  be  used  for  ground  system  installations  over  the  next  5  years  in  accord-
ance with the Statewide Plan. 

This substantial investment by the FAA in Alaskan based aviation infrastructure 
is  directly  tied  to  equipage  of  Alaskan-based  aircraft.  In  other  words,  the  Federal 
investment  of  nearly  one-half  billion  dollars  is  contingent  upon  aircraft  equipage. 
While  most  commercial  operators  will  equip  their  aircraft,  currently,  these  avionics 
are  not  affordable  for  the  private  pilot  and  Alaska  will  not  be  part  of  any  Federal 
mandate to equip. Without incentives, equipage may never happen or will be many 
years  after  the  Lower  48  is  enjoying  NextGen  aviation  capabilities.  Alaska  des-
perately  needs  to  be  an  accelerated  part  of  the  nationwide  airspace  modernization 
plan. 

Recently,  Alaska’s  25th  State  Legislature  unanimously  approved  a  revolving  loan 
program to provide assistance for avionics equipage. This low-interest loan program, 
if  signed  by  Governor  Palin,  will  be  administered  by  the  Department  of  Commerce, 
Community and Economic Development, Division of Investments. With future addi-
tional funding from the private sector and/or the Federal Government, this could re-
sult  in  90  percent  of  all  flight  operations  across  the  entire  state  of  Alaska  enjoying 
safety  and  reliability  capabilities  proven  by  the  Capstone  R&D  Program  in  south-
western and southeast Alaska. 

I  launched  my  career  in  this  industry  33  years  ago  and  can  personally  verify  the 
widely diverse types of commercial operations in Alaska and the need for improving 
aviation access and economic viability of our rural communities. There are many dif-
ferent and unique aviation companies conducting business under Parts 91, 121 and 
135  of  the  Federal  Aviation  Regulations  (FARs).  There  are  single  engine  airplanes 
up to turbo prop equipped aircraft, wide-bodied jets, rotorcraft and float plane oper-
ators.  The  Alaska  Air  Carriers  Association  is  committed  to  assisting  all  of  them  in 
maintaining safer operations; that’s why our Safety Committee initiated the idea of 
the  Medallion  Foundation,  a  voluntary  program  based  on  best  practices  that  has 
changed the culture of aviation in Alaska. 

The  Medallion  Five-Star  Program  established  standards  that  exceed  regulatory 
requirements  for  participating  air  carriers  and  pilots.  Maintenance  Resource  Man-
agement  and  Safety  Officer  training  are  just  a  few  of  the  valuable  courses  offered 
by  the  program  managers.  By  providing  system  safety  attributes  and  showing  par-
ticipants how to collect, analyze, and share data in the Air Transportation Oversight 
System  (ATOS)  program—trends  can  be  spotted  before  accidents  occur.  Data  anal-
ysis  has  revealed  that  Medallion  participants  have  a  significantly  lower  accident 
rate.  The  Medallion  Foundation  has  partnered  with  the  FAA  on  several  initiatives 
that  have  measurably  improved  aviation  safety  in  Alaska,  which  resulted  in  a  27- 
month  period  with  no  fatal  air  carrier  accidents.  Although  fatalities  for  last  year 
were  not  zero,  the  numbers  are  still  considerably  lower  than  pre-Medallion  years. 
Medallion’s  leadership  and  the  FAA  have  worked  together  to  develop  a  detailed 
roadmap, which has assisted air carriers in implementing system safety tools. Used 
by  their  principal  inspectors  to  monitor  processes,  this  integration  has  aided  in  as-
sessing  aviation  risks,  perform  root  cause  analysis,  and  improve  pilot  training.  By 
taking  a  business-like  approach  to  Risk  Management  and  Safety,  the  Medallion 
Foundation  provides  a  framework  and  guidance  for  the  development  of  a  proactive 
corporate safety culture. 

Furthermore, Medallion performs as an objective third party for administering an 
FAA-industry  program  that  allows  aviation  employees  to  report  safety  issues  with-
out  fear  of  punishment.  This  has  allowed  the  FAA  and  industry  management  to 
solve safety or operational issues that would not have come to light had the employ-
ees not made the reports. 

The  Alaska  Air  Carriers  Association  encourages  continued  improvement  of  acci-
dent  rates  through  programs  such  as  the  Medallion  Foundation  and  the  Surveil-
lance and Broadcast Services Capstone Statewide Plan. We thank you, Senator Ste-
vens,  for  your  continued  support  of  both  programs,  which  have  improved  perform-
ance, safety and efficiency for air operations. This has allowed the delivery of goods 
and  services  to  communities  in  a  reliable  manner  through  the  use  of  technology  in 
concert with a precise risk management philosophy. 

We’ve  made  great  strides  in  Alaskan  aviation  safety  through  Capstone,  the  Me-
dallion  Foundation,  the  Surveillance  and  Evaluation  Program,  (which  uses  prin-
ciples  of  system  safety  to  identify  risk-based  inspections  of  airlines)  and  through 
operational  control  audits.  In  order  to  continue  improving  aviation  safety,  however, 
we  need  monies  directed  toward  a  Safety  Equipage  Incentive  Program  (SEIP)  for 
the Capstone Statewide Plan to step up aircraft avionics equipage statewide. Alaska 
urgently  needs  to  be  an  accelerated  part  of  the  national  airspace  modernization 
plan.  A  State-Federal-Private  investment  through  a  public-private  partnership  will 
foster economic development and aid in equipping as many aircraft as possible with 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00090 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

87 

navigational,  communications,  surveillance  and  weather  information.  Avionics  in 
airplanes can save lives. 

Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  comment  today  and  do  not  hesitate  to  call  on 
the  Alaska  Air  Carriers  Association  as  a  resource  for  aviation  issues  in  the  future. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE TO 

NICHOLAS A. SABATINI 

Question  1.  Beyond  the  ATOS  program,  what  are  the  other  keys  aspects  of  the 

FAA’s activities for ensuring system safety? 

Answer.  FAA’s  approach  to  system  safety  is  based  on  the  statutory  requirement 
of  an  air  carrier  to  demonstrate  that  it  can  operate  safely  in  order  to  hold  an  air 
operator  certificate.  This  means  that  the  systems  an  air  carrier  uses  to  conduct  its 
business must be capable of managing the risks in the operating environment. This 
concept  underpins  FAA’s  safety  regulations,  which  are  risk  controls  that  must  be 
implemented by air carriers. FAA certification and surveillance are structured to de-
termine compliance with safety regulations, thereby ensuring system safety. The fol-
lowing programs supplement certification and surveillance activities: 

corrective actions. 

• Aviation  Safety  Action  Program—identifies  systemic  problems  and  implements 
• Flight Operations Quality Assurance—provides data to validate effectiveness of 
operational  procedures  and  to  identify  hazardous  operational  trends  requiring 
intervention. 
• Advanced Qualification Program—enables air carriers to tailor pilot training to 
• Voluntary Disclosure Reporting Program—identifies inadvertent regulatory vio-
• Safety  Management  System  Pilot  Project—assists  air  carriers  and  repair  sta-

fit unique operating environments and the individual needs of pilots. 

lations and implements comprehensive corrective measures. 

tions in implementing voluntary safety management systems. 

Question  2.  What  were  the  results  of  the  FAA’s  recent  performance  audits  of  air 

carriers’ compliance with Airworthiness Directives? 

Answer.  The  special-emphasis  validation  of  FAA’s  Airworthiness  Directives  (AD) 
oversight,  ordered  on  March  13,  is  to  validate  our  system  for  overseeing  air  carrier 
AD  management.  The  audit  consists  of  two  phases.  In  their  aggregate,  the  two 
phases include a broad sample of the air carrier’s program to comply with ADs. The 
results of the audit will allow us to determine whether or not each air carrier’s pro-
gram is in compliance with our rules and whether or not our system for determining 
compliance  is  adequate  or  needs  adjustment.  Results  of  Phase  1  validated  both  the 
airlines AD management system and FAA oversight of that system. 

Phase  1  of  the  audit  required  a  sample  of  10  ADs  for  each  of  the  air  carriers’ 
fleets, including AD–2002–07–08 (to find cracking of the lower skin at the lower row 
of  fasteners  in  the  lap  joints  of  the  fuselage,  and  repair  of  any  cracking  found)  and 
AD–2004–18–06  (to  find  fatigue  cracking  of  certain  upper  and  lower  skin  panels  of 
the fuselage, and follow-on and corrective actions) for the Boeing 737 aircraft, if ap-
plicable. 

Our  audit  revealed  a  99  percent  compliance  rate  with  the  ADs  audited.  We  have 
begun investigations into those airlines where there was a question as to AD compli-
ance. 

Phase 2 of the audit requires inspectors to sample additional ADs, to total 10 per-
cent  of  the  ADs  applicable  to  the  air  carriers’  fleets.  Phase  2  will  end  June  30.  As 
of May 28, 2008, FAA inspectors had reviewed operator management of 1,597 ADs, 
revealing  a  98  percent  compliance  rate.  Again,  we  will  pursue  investigations  where 
AD compliance is questionable. 

A copy of Notice N 8900.36, Special Emphasis Validation of Air Carrier Airworthi-

ness Directives Oversight is attached. 

Question 3. Is it accurate that compensation for supervisors and managers in the 
safety unit is based on performance measures that include on-time arrival and cus-
tomer satisfaction? 

Answer from Mr. Krakowski. Yes, they are included in the many metrics that we 
use  to  assess  our  performance.  Our  mission  is  to  provide  the  safest,  most  efficient 
aerospace  system  in  the  world.  In  line  with  this  mission,  we  have  established  both 
safety and efficiency metrics by which we are measured and compensated. 

As a safety organization, our first priority is always safety, and we pride ourselves 
on  our  safety  record.  With  more  than  7,000  takeoffs  and  landings  per  hour,  and 
more  than  660  million  passengers  and  37  billion  cargo  revenue  ton  miles  of  freight 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00091 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

per  year,  the  men  and  women  of  our  organization  safely  guide  roughly  50,000  air-
craft through the National Airspace System every day. 

88 

Question 4. If so, are these performance measures consistent with the agency’s top 

priority of safety? 

Answer from Mr. Krakowski. Yes, they are consistent with our top priority of safe-
ty.  The  FAA’s  mission  is  to  provide  the  safest  and  most  efficient  aerospace  system 
in the world. The FAA’s 5 year strategic plan (the Flight Plan) provides the founda-
tion  for  achieving  this  mission  based  on  four  goal  areas:  Increased  Safety,  Greater 
Capacity, International Leadership, and Organizational Excellence. The FAA strives 
for  excellence  in  each  of  its  four  performance  measures  as  they  are  each  a  funda-
mental part of success. 

Safety  and  capacity  in  particular  are  inextricably  linked,  and  critical  to  perform-
ance  management.  As  passengers  continue  to  fly  in  ever-increasing  numbers,  and 
as  more  planes  continue  to  fill  the  skies,  performance  measures  are  specifically  de-
signed  and  implemented  to  handle  that  growth  safely  and  efficiently.  These  meas-
ures  involve  constantly  increasing  the  level  of  safety  by  implementing  new  tech-
nology  and  procedures  while  simultaneously  working  to  increase  capacity,  reduce 
airspace congestion and meet projected demand. 

Question 5. Are on-time arrivals really an adequate basis on which to judge those 

charged with ensuring aviation safety? 

Answer  from  Mr.  Krakowski.  The  metric  of  on-time  arrivals  is  but  one  of  many 

measures in our performance management system. 

Our  safety  professionals  are  charged  with  ensuring  aviation  safety  as  their  high-
est priority. The FAA’s mission is to provide the safest and most efficient aerospace 
system  in  the  world.  Through  the  Flight  Plan,  we  focus  on  implementing  measures 
that  are  designed  to  accommodate  aviation  growth  both  safely  and  efficiently.  We 
have worked to increase the level of safety by: 
• Reducing commercial air carrier fatalities. 
• Reducing the number of fatal accidents in general aviation. 
• Reducing the risk of runway incursion and collision risks. 
• Ensuring the safety of commercial space launches. 
• Enhancing the safety of FAA’s air traffic systems. 
• Implementing a Safety Management System (SMS) for the FAA. 
Question  6.  Does  the  FAA  respond  to  all  whistleblower  complaints  that  are  filed? 
Answer.  Yes,  if  FAA  is  notified  of  the  complaint,  it  opens  an  investigation.  Com-
plaints  may  be  brought  to  the  attention  of  the  FAA  from  the  Office  of  the  Special 
Counsel  or  by  other  government  agencies.  These  agencies  determine  whether  the 
complaint has merit and may conduct their own initial investigation before alerting 
the  FAA.  The  Whistleblower  Protection  Program  covers  external  complaints  by  em-
ployees  of  air  carriers,  contractors,  and  subcontractors.  The  Whistleblower  Protec-
tion  Act  covers  internal  complaints  by  government  employees,  which  are  initially 
filed with the Office of Special Counsel. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE TO 

HANK KRAKOWSKI 

Question 1. How does the FAA track and investigate runway incursions and oper-

ational errors? 

Answer. Operational errors are investigated primarily by FAA management at the 
facility-level  where  the  operational  error  occurred.  The  findings  and  corrective  ac-
tions  from  these  investigations  are  approved  by  regional  and  headquarters  FAA 
safety  personnel.  All  operational  errors  result  in  an  in  depth  final  report  that  in-
cludes causal factors and corrective action plans. These reports are retained in elec-
tronic  databases  that  may  be  searched  for  trends  and  commonalities  that  may  be 
indicators of areas for system-wide improvement. 

Question 2. What is the FAA doing to reduce near misses? 
Answer.  Investigative  reports  of  operational  errors  and  pilot  deviations  provide 
data that may be mined for trends and commonalities in root causes to many of the 
reported losses of separation within the National Airspace System (NAS). FAA safe-
ty  personnel  implement  procedural  and  technical  improvements  to  the  NAS  to  cor-
rect  identified  recurrent  causes  to  separation  losses.  Recent  improvements  include 
a revision to a graphical depiction of an approach procedure to a major airport that 
was  the  source  of  multiple  misunderstandings  by  pilots,  and  a  current  effort  to  re-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00092 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

vise air traffic controller/pilot communication procedures for acknowledging altitude 
clearances. 

89 

Question  3.  How  will  the  implementation  of  NextGen  improve  safety  in  the  Na-

tional Airspace System? 

Answer.  NextGen  provides  several  operational  changes  that  will  improve  safety. 
Some  of  these  directly  target  safety;  others  target  improved  situational  awareness, 
which  support  safety,  capacity,  and  efficiency.  A  prime  example  of  the  first  is  the 
traffic  and  flight  information  broadcast  services,  which  are  part  of  the  Automatic 
Dependent Surveillance—Broadcast (ADS–B) program. This information service will 
provide  pilots  with  real-time  traffic  display  and  weather  information  that  will  help 
pilots to avoid other aircraft and hazardous weather. 

Examples  of  changes  that  support  both  safety  and  efficiency  include:  providing 
digital taxi-clearance for display in the flight deck, which will improve the efficiency 
of traffic on the surface while reducing pilot errors and deviations; data communica-
tions between controllers and pilots, which will greatly reducing readback/hearback 
errors  while  improving  the  efficiency  of  flight  management;  and  integration  of 
weather  into  controller  tools  supporting  the  strategic  reroute  of  traffic,  improving 
both  efficiency  and  safety.  Across  the  board,  most  improvements  to  flight  efficiency 
or  airport  access  will  provide  safety  benefits  through  increased  situational  aware-
ness and improved flight path management. 

Question  4.  Why  does  the  current  rulemaking  process  that  will  require  the  use 
of  ADS–B  technology  exclude  a  requirement  for  the  use  of  ADS–B  ‘‘in’’  technology 
that  would  satisfy  one  of  National  Transportation  Safety  Board’s  top  safety  con-
cerns? 

Answer.  Currently,  the  ‘‘ADS–B  In’’  requirements  are  only  partially  defined.  The 
FAA  is  working  collaboratively  with  industry  through  the  Aviation  Rulemaking 
Committee  (ARC)  to  decide  the  appropriate  way  to  move  forward  with  mandating 
‘‘ADS–B In’’. Below is an outline of the options that were discussed: 

1.‘‘ADS–B Out’’ compliance in 2020; ‘‘ADS–B In’’ effective in 20XX (to be articu-
lated in the NPRM). 
2.‘‘ADS–B  Out’’  compliance  in  2020;  ‘‘ADS–B  In’’  voluntary  equipage  (current 
FAA strategy). 
3.‘‘ADS–B Out’’ and ‘‘ADS–B In’’ effective in 2010. 

The ARC currently believes that option 3 is not possible because ‘‘ADS–B In’’ can-
not be defined at this time. Therefore, at the present time, option 1 seems to be the 
best solution for one of the draft ARC recommendations (final recommendations will 
be  submitted  in  August  2008).  Also  as  a  potential  draft  recommendation,  the  Com-
mittee  would  like  the  FAA  to  make  a  decision  by  2012  as  to  how  to  proceed  with 
‘‘ADS–B In’’. 

In  summary,  the  FAA  is  working  collaboratively  with  industry  and  various  con-
gressional  committees  to  define  and  move  forward  with  a  potential  ‘‘ADS–B  In’’ 
mandate.  Additionally,  the  FAA  has  already  been  investing  in  the  development  of 
standards to define the symbols for pilot’s displays and is working to accelerate ac-
tivities  for  surface  alerting,  which  directly  aligns  with  the  NTSB  recommendation 
for ‘‘ADS–B In’’. 
Notice: N 8900.36 

U.S. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION 
FEDERAL AVIATION ADMINISTRATION 
NATIONAL POLICY 

Effective Date: 03/13/08 
Cancellation Date: 06/30/08 

Subject: Special Emphasis Validation of Airworthiness Directives Oversight 

1. Purpose of This Notice. This notice directs an audit of Title 14 Code of Federal 
Regulations (14 CFR) Part 121 air carrier compliance with Airworthiness Directives 
(AD).  The  audit  is  necessary  to  validate  our  system  for  overseeing  air  carrier  man-
agement of ADs. 

2. Audience. The primary audience for this notice is Flight Standards District Of-
fice  or  certificate  management  office  principal  maintenance  inspectors  (PMI)  and 
principal  avionics  inspectors  (PAI)  responsible  for  the  approval/review  and  surveil-
lance  of  air  carrier  AD  management  programs.  The  secondary  audience  includes 
Flight Standards branches and divisions in the regions and in headquarters. 

3. Where You Can Find This Notice. Inspectors can access this notice through the 
(FSIMS)  at  http:// 

Information  Management  System 

Flight  Standards 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00093 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

90 

fsims.avs.faa.gov.  Operators  and  the  public  can  find  this  notice  at  http:// 
fsims.faa.gov. 

4. Background. Current events involving one air carrier’s noncompliance with ADs 
make  it  necessary  to  validate  our  system  for  overseeing  air  carrier  management  of 
this regulatory requirement. 

a.  In  December  2007,  all  Federal  Aviation  Administration  (FAA)  Certificate 
Management  Teams  (CMTs)  for  14  CFR  Part  121  air  carriers  completed  their 
transition  to  the  Air  Transportation  Oversight  System  (ATOS)-a  systems-based 
approach  to  ensuring  air  carrier  compliance  with  regulations.  ATOS  requires 
systematic,  risk-based  surveillance  of  all  of  the  processes  that  an  air  carrier 
uses  to  comply  with  regulations  and  deliver  its  product.  ATOS  structures  air 
carrier  processes  into  97  elements.  Inspectors  use  detailed  data  collection  tools 
to  assess  the  design  and  performance  of  the  processes  represented  by  each  ele-
ment.  Inspectors  use  Safety  Attribute  Inspections  (SAIs)  to  collect  data  for  de-
sign  assessments  and  Element  Performance  Inspections  (EPIs)  for  performance 
assessments. The SAI and EPI for element 1.3.6, Airworthiness Directive Man-
agement, provide specific references to regulations and FAA policy and guidance 
for an air carrier’s management of compliance with ADs. 
b.  Element  1.3.6  is  extremely  complex.  Multiple  ADs  affect  every  aircraft  used 
in  air  transportation.  Literally  inspecting  each  of  these  aircraft  for  compliance 
with  all  ADs  affecting  it  far  exceeds  FAA  resources.  Therefore,  ATOS  empha-
sizes  the  importance  of  an  air  carrier’s  responsibility  to  have  a  process  that  ef-
fectively manages the regulatory requirement to comply with ADs. 
c.  ATOS  requires  a  performance  assessment  of  element  1.3.6  every  6  months. 
Many  recently  transitioned  CMT  have  not  yet  completed  an  assessment  of  ele-
ment  1.3.6.  For  this  reason,  as  well  as  the  highly  publicized  noncompliance  of 
one  air  carrier,  this  special  emphasis  audit  is  necessary  to  validate  our  system 
of oversight. 

5.  Action.  PMIs  and  PAIs  shall  determine  their  assigned  air  carriers’  compliance 
with ADs by auditing a sample of ADs applicable to their air carriers’ fleets, in con-
junction with a retargeted performance assessment of element 1.3.6. The audit con-
sists  of  two  phases.  Phase  1  of  the  audit  shall  sample  10  ADs  for  each  of  the  air 
carriers’  fleets,  including  AD–2002–07–08  and  AD–2004–18–06  for  the  Boeing  737 
aircraft,  if  applicable.  Phase  2  of  the  audit  shall  sample  additional  ADs  to  total  10 
percent of the ADs applicable to the air carriers’ fleets. 

a.  PMIs  and  PAIs  shall  complete  Phase  1  of  the  audit  by  March  28,  2008  and 
Phase 2 as soon as possible but no later than June 30, 2008. 
b. The audit shall: 

(1)  Validate  the  air  carrier’s  work  instructions  (e.g.,  task  cards,  engineering 
authorizations,  engineering  orders,  engineering  change  orders)  to  accomplish 
the AD by verifying that the instructions correctly describe the method of com-
pliance  contained  within  the  AD  and  any  referenced  service  information  (e.g., 
service  bulletins,  service  letters)  or  any  related  alternative  methods  of  compli-
ance; and 

(2)  Validate  the  proper  performance  of  the  AD  by  reviewing  the  complete 

work instructions ‘‘package’’ on at least one aircraft. 
c.  For  Phases  1  and  2,  PMIs  and  PAIs  shall  audit  a  different  aircraft,  to  the 
extent practicable, for each AD. This review should also ensure that entries into 
the  AD  tracking  system  were  performed  correctly.  Give  emphasis  to  sampling 
those ADs which involve required inspections of fuselage, empennage, and wing 
areas for cracking or similar issues. 
d. To initiate Phase 1 of the audit, complete the following steps: 

(1) Use ATOS automation to create a Constructed Dynamic Observation Re-

port(s) (ConDOR) for airworthiness element 1.3.6. 

(2) In the Local/Regional/National use field enter N8900.36. 
(3) In the Requested Completion Date field enter March 28, 2008. 
(4) Select EPI question 1.2. 
(5) Determine and document data collection requirements in accordance with 

the instructions above. 

(6)  Document  the  results  of  each  AD  sampled  in  the  comment  field  associ-

ated with the yes/no response. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00094 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

91 

e.  To  initiate  Phase  2  of  the  audit,  complete  the  following  steps  of  the  ATOS 
version 1.2 business process: 

(1) Step 2.4, adjust the due date of the next performance assessment of ele-

ment 1.3.6 to June 30, 2008. 

(2)  Step  2.6,  determine  data  collection  requirements  in  accordance  with  the 

instructions above. 

(3)  Step  2.7,  document  data  collection  requirements  in  accordance  with  the 
instructions  above.  Include  instructions  for  specific  ADs  to  be  sampled  and 
deadlines  to  save  EPI  activities  to  ‘‘final’’  in  ATOS  automation  to  comply  with 
Phase 1 and 2 completion dates. 

(4) Step 5.1, use the comment field to document the results of each AD sam-

pled. 

(5)  Step  7.4  or  7.5,  complete  the  performance  assessment  of  element  1.3.6. 

Include ConDOR data collected in Phase 1. 
f.  If  the  audit  affirms  the  performance  of  element  1.3.6,  take  no  further  action. 
g.  If  you  cannot  affirm  performance,  follow  the  ATOS  business  process  to  ini-
tiate  required  action,  including  scheduling  a  design  assessment  if  systemic 
issues exists. 
h.  If  the  audit  finds  evidence  of  noncompliance  with  ADs,  initiate  immediate 
corrective action. 

6. Tracking. 

a.  Document  the  results  of  this  audit  of  the  air  carrier’s  compliance  with  sam-
pled  ADs  in  the  comment  field  of  the  EPI  for  element  1.3.6,  Airworthiness  Di-
rective  Management.  Enter  N8900.36  in  the  Local/Regional/National  Use  block 
of the activity screen. 
b.  If  the  air  carrier  did  not  comply  with  any  of  the  sampled  ADs,  take  imme-
diate  corrective  action.  Use  the  ATOS  Risk  Management  Process  (RMP),  if  ap-
propriate. 

7.  Disposition.  This  is  a  special  emphasis  audit.  Therefore,  Flight  Standards  will 
not  incorporate  the  information  in  this  notice  into  FSIMS.  Direct  questions  con-
cerning this notice to the Certification and Surveillance Division, AFS–900, at (703) 
661–0550. 

Original signed by 

JAMES J. BALLOUGH, 

Director, Flight Standards Service. 

Æ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:13 Jul 19, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00095 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\GPO\DOCS\75107.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

